Is there a way to punish him?
to avoid such a thing from happening again.
Or how long will it take to get ready for the restaurant? Can I ask you?
At the academic conference of Zhejiang University, students sang the main theme, and the research results made people's brains open wide - Xinhua News Agency
Washing hands with air, judging diseases by breath, and accurately searching for the source of haze yesterday evening, a series of academic achievements with big ideas were awarded at the opening ceremony of the 2016 Academic Conference of Zhejiang University.
The main researchers of these achievements are students, and the research covers a wide range of fields, including environmental science, mechanical engineering, energy, medicine, life sciences, humanities education, and so on. Students started from a curious point and created many high-end inventions with practical value, some of which have won awards both domestically and internationally.
Bio-sensors: Your family doctor
A team of doctoral students from the School of Biomedical Engineering demonstrated a biological sensor on a smartphone, which is only half the size of a smartphone.
"You just need to take a deep breath, and this set of instruments can preliminarily detect the health condition of your body from the components of the air you exhale."
Zhang Di Ming introduced that the sensor is connected to the smart phone, and the health report will be displayed on the phone when the gas is released.
Smartwatches that can detect health conditions on the market generally detect physical parameters such as temperature and pulse.
And this set of biological sensors uses a new material, graphene, as its target, which is sensitive to chemical elements and can more deeply and accurately reflect the health condition of the body.
Smart surgical lights: Surgeons' high-powered eyes
In addition to smart phones, smart surgical lights were also used in the operating room.
The invention won a silver medal at the 44th International Invention Exhibition in Geneva this year.
The graduate student Zhu Linjing and the team of Shen Junfei from the College of Optoelectronics and Engineering opened a new idea in the defects of the traditional surgical lamp, and invented the intelligent LED surgical shadowless lamp.
"Many diseases are not detected early enough, and the light used in the doctor's operating room is related to this. "
Shen Junfei said that for example, if a doctor cannot clearly see all the tumor tissues during early cancer detection, the cancer cells will still spread afterwards.
This intelligent surgical light has four light discs, and by adjusting the spectrum, it can enhance the contrast of different tissues under light.
During the operation, the doctor can adjust the size, brightness, spectrum, color uniformity and transparency of the light spot at any time according to the needs of the operation and personal habits.
This intelligent surgical light has been used in the Affiliated Huashan Hospital of Zhejiang University School of Medicine and the Affiliated Children's Hospital of Zhejiang University School of Medicine, and has received good feedback.
Last October, this invention won the first prize in the National Challenge Cup.
Air-washing hands: save water and be cool
Ordinary people wash their hands by rinsing with water, at most wiping a little soap, while Li Qizhang and his classmates invented a "air washing device."
As long as you stand on the hand-washing station of the device, our weight can compress the air.
"It's like a firecracker.
The compressed air forms a fluid at the water tap, and is combined with water.
So we can wash our hands clean!"
The color reaction and bacterial residue experiments prove that the effect of this method of hand washing is the same as that of ordinary hand washing methods.
This device only needs our own gravity as a driving force, and can ensure the degree of cleaning while saving 90% of water. The whole process is completely energy-saving and environmentally friendly.
Last year, this invention stood out in many world-class universities in the Second Global Major Challenge Summit, and won the only gold award.
Please arrange to return it to me as soon as possible, thx
Please cancel the order and return the cash, don't use points, and don't use #PRS_ORG# in the future!
Bones and spicy pickled vegetables are not suitable for children to eat
If so, please order as soon as possible.
No, thank you
He told me to tell you where he was located #PRS_ORG#
I didn't wait, I cancelled the order
I bought #PRS_ORG#, but I wrote the wrong address
Can it be changed?
or cancel the order
Okay, sorry
A certificate that means a lot to me - the First Aid certificate.
This is one of the skills certificates that I think is important besides my driver's license!
Popularize it: First aid measures are actually emergency rescue measures in the event of an emergency, that is, rescue before the ambulance arrives.
It is known that there is still a period of time before the ambulance arrives after the accident, and it is precisely this period of time that is the most critical.
That's when you need emergency help.
If I really did have a heart attack, a stroke, or respiratory arrest, then our window of life would only be four minutes, the golden four minutes!
So, people around you should know how important it is to know first aid!
When someone falls down around us, we can use professional knowledge to rescue them, instead of standing there motionless and doing nothing, which is so terrifying.
"In China, we have 3 million accidental deaths every year, and the most dangerous is sudden cardiac arrest.
In the United States, the average survival rate is 15%.
In Las Vegas, 78 percent can be saved, while in Shanghai and Beijing, it is below 1 percent."
This is what founder Lu Le said.
If one person has a heart attack, stops breathing, and stops their heart, there's nothing you can do.
It was only possible to save the man by performing artificial respiration and chest compressions.
I found that few people now have the awareness to learn first aid, but when things happen, it is too late to learn. Therefore, I still urge everyone to learn this skill, so that we can respond in time when faced with emergencies.
Maybe it could save one person's life!
Emergency first aid certificates can be obtained at the Red Cross training center in your local area. I registered at the Red Cross training center in Zhuhai, and students also have discounts.
PS: The last picture is a record of the goals I wanted to achieve before I was 25 years old. Adding the first aid certificate to the goal list was a few months ago, but it was actually completed!
Then I went to take other certificates I wanted to take, and I planned to take a diving certificate. I saw that there was a diving first aid certificate on Little Red Book. To take this certificate, you need to have a first aid certificate. So the first aid certificate is still very useful!
I ordered #NUMBER#.
For just 13 yuan, you get one shrimp dumpling!?
Never tried
How #NAME# doesn't understand?
13 yuan?
Yesterday #PRS_ORG# sent out the wrong food, this time just gave me a shrimp dumpling!?
Because I saw that the code I entered before was valid
To sum up, I think "The Four Seas" is a bad movie in all aspects.
But you have to say that this movie is not a highlight, and the music selection is not bad at all.
There are many types of bad movies, and falling asleep in the cinema is one of them. There are also those that make you feel indignant after watching them. "The Four Seas" is like a monkey on Mount Emei, it can ignite your anger in countless ways.
In the point of insulting the audience, Han Han really has a natural talent.
The most painful thing about this movie is that it seems to be a creation in the world of Cixin Liu's novels, and it is difficult to describe, like the windbreaker on Xiaomeng's body.
Even after watching it, you may doubt whether there is a hidden metaphor in it, but when you think about it carefully, it is actually just a pile of shit.
First, I'd like to explain some of the plot points that are difficult for me to understand.
The main character's hometown should be a small island in the south, and he lives with his grandmother.
Her grandmother has a wish to see snow, and then the story arranges for a neighbor's old man to drive a small bread car to take her to see snow in the northeast.
Elderly people sit in a bread truck from the south to the north to see snow?
He and his dad were also very relieved about this.
Then the old man stopped writing.
How did the female protagonist get the business license for the hotel on the abandoned ship?
Why can the island's motorcycle gang easily block a mountain road in just a few minutes?
Then the truck carrying steel bars stopped in the middle of the road, and the drivers of the surrounding trucks couldn't find them.
It's too obvious to be a prop.
Why would a small gang of delinquents with bad credit records and criminal suspicion become a police assistant?
Why didn't the police report the high-interest loans? The police even specifically asked if there were any difficulties?
An adult knows how to use a smartphone, but doesn't know how to use a hotel card to open the door, and then forcibly arrange for the hotel boss to find nowhere to sleep outside the room?
The inexplicable plot is everywhere in the film, and the plot is so ridiculous that it makes me feel pain when I remember it.
In addition to the plot, it is even worse that the theme of the movie, or rather, this movie has no theme at all, which is just a hideous Frankenstein's monster.
At the beginning of the film, you will think that he wants to make a comedy film. After 20 minutes, you may guess that it may be a motivational film. When you watch half of it, you think it may be a story about the difficulties of growing up in a small town. After watching it, you don't know what you've seen, and you are filled with doubts. Why did you go to the cinema to watch a movie about taking a dump on New Year's Day?
For most people, they are actually quite familiar with the plot of various movies, such as if you want to shoot a motorcycle racer, then you need to be inspirational + comedy and tell the audience how a talented rookie step by step towards success.
If you want to make a love movie, then you have to be honest and talk about the grievances and conflicts between the small town young man who likes to ride a motorcycle and the waitress.
If you want to reflect reality, then at least your plot shouldn't contain anything that contradicts the normal world.
(For example, the new motorcycle that Yan Zheng played was just burned, but he can still sing), you can't go open some brain holes that Kennedy can't resist.
As for the female lead, who is not mentally retarded in some aspects, she acts like a 5-year-old child. I don't know if this is due to the actress's acting skills or the director's requirements.
There's one thing I don't understand, why Han Han, as a race car driver, is so passionate about adding a collision scene in his own movie?
Such a movie arrangement is during the Spring Festival, is it to give the audience a headache?
Application: The valve encoder is used in the battery box
Origin: Shenzhen, China
The size of the battery box is as follows:
The following are related baby products of the A2 series:
CN1 connector CN1 signal I/O connection line CN1 terminal block brake resistor
Low-power encoder cable, high-power encoder cable, low-power power line, high-power power line
Small power line belt brake, large power line belt brake, encoder and power plug, servomotor battery box
1. Our store cooperates with a courier company.
1）Cooperation delivery is based on Wangwang’s signature!
2) SF Express
2. Buyers who need the product urgently or have time-sensitive requirements are recommended to choose Shunfeng Express. It is recommended to pay in advance, and Shunfeng has a certain guarantee. Modify the shipping fee and then pay.
3. Buyers have doubts about the freight charged by the store, and can choose to pay for the freight.
4. Heavy products are generally shipped, and please contact us separately for logistics.
1. Our store supports 7-day return and exchange service, and the shipping fee is borne by our store.
2. Non-product quality problems, due to the buyer's selection of the wrong model and other factors, need to return and exchange, without affecting the functionality of the product and affecting the secondary sales, the store supports the free return and exchange service of goods (excluding shipping fees), and the return and shipping fees need to be borne by the buyer.
3. The store does not support the need to return due to delayed delivery, and the seller is responsible for the freight.
4. Customized products are not eligible for return or exchange due to quality issues.
1. Is this a genuine product?
Answer: If the brand of the original factory is not indicated, it is a domestic substitute product.
2. Do you have a copy?
Q: Sorry, our store does not sell fake products. The so-called fake products have the logo and packaging of the original factory.
3. Are domestic xxx products produced in China by the original factory?
Answer: Domestic products are substitutes, and the products produced in China by the original factory are only used in China.
Professional provides domestic servo, PLC connection cables, connectors and other peripheral accessories such as Mitsubishi, Anquan, TaiDa, Panasonic, Omron, Siemens, etc. The main products include servo encoders, power cables, control connectors, power aviation plugs, terminal blocks and cables, lithium batteries, PLC program download lines, connection lines, etc. Brake resistors, field bus, power cables, and all accessories are strictly in accordance with Mitsubishi standards, and are made by professional engineers.
And we adopt servo and PLC actual test to ensure that we provide high-quality and durable products to our customers.
Welcome to inquire!
The factory direct sales, welcome the agent to wholesale!
Other lengths are available and can be customized.
For related customized products, please contact the store!
If we just waive the cancellation fee for you, what does that mean?
Can you?
I received it, but all three of my drinks spilled out.
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in Zhengzhou, and introduce the Zhengzhou wall brick module equipment:
Zhengzhou Yixin is a domestic concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment, inspection well block machinery, inspection well wall body module machinery professional production factory, from semi-automatic to fully automatic production line.
Through years of practice and development, it has now acquired high-quality quality, mainly producing hydraulic, mobile, and fully automatic inspection well series equipment and supporting devices.
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in the inspection well: Zhengzhou wall brick module equipment assembly site:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules in the well: The characteristics and advantages of Zhengzhou well-wall brick module equipment:
Yixin checks the brick-making machine equipment widely applicable to the new construction material of the municipal underground construction such as coal, heat, water, electricity, gas and so on.
Such as drainage and storage facilities, rainwater outlets, ditches, sewage treatment pools and small constructions, wing walls of bridges, etc.
The advantage of using concrete modules to build inspection wells is that the upper, lower, left and right sides and the four sides of the modules are all concave and convex groove structures, and they are combined to form a chain lock.
The shear strength of the wall body is far superior to that of the plain masonry construction form.
The module is a hollow structure, and the vertical and horizontal holes are connected after the combination of masonry. After the core of the hole is poured with concrete, it forms a net-like structure of reinforced concrete, which plays the role of secondary reinforcement and waterproofing.
Modules are provided with slot holes in both longitudinal and transverse directions, which increase the overall strength of the structure in both the longitudinal and transverse directions.
In addition, the inspection well and drainage well made of reinforced concrete are less likely to collapse, sink, leak, etc. The mechanical performance of the wall body module is stable, and the operation is simple and standardized.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment is equipped with data input and output devices, which can monitor the entire process of mechanical operation through a touch-sensitive liquid crystal display, realize the ideal human-machine dialogue, automatic analysis of materials, density operation, safety logic control and fault diagnosis system.
The mechanical hydraulic system of the wall body module adopts single-cylinder hydraulic, transmission, and double-cylinder hydraulic, transmission.
The independent hydraulic integration station avoided the influence of the host vibration on the hydraulic system, thereby ensuring the reliability of the hydraulic system.
The concrete inspection pit module brick machine equipment material box moving module lifting up, the storage box door closed, the automatic transport of the pallet, all completed by the hydraulic system independently, so as to achieve the purpose of reducing the wear and maintenance of the mechanical.
The concrete inspection well module brick machine equipment adopts imported computer, electrical appliances, sealing parts, hydraulic parts, and the overall performance is stable and reliable.
The mechanical vibration platform of the wall body adopts the whole plate steel, and the cutting ratio of the platform surface is modular without welding points, so that the filler box can be freely moved and the mechanical wear is fully reduced.
Reduce the load of the mold, fill the filler and encrypt the amplitude of the two-in-one, use the unified and synchronous design, and ensure that the vibration effect is achieved.
The mechanical vibration of the wall body module is controlled by the mechanical vibration machine and the computer automatic control system according to the cost of raw materials. There is no wear and tear, and the service life is prolonged and the cost is reduced.
The wall body module has dual functions of automatic control and manual control.
Check the mold:
The inspection of the well water of Yixin brick machine:
Yi Xin Company workshop corner:
Check the production and processing equipment of concrete modules
Zhengzhou well wall brick module equipment can not only produce inspection well bricks, but also produce various standard bricks, hollow bricks, and pavement flowers.
At the delivery site:
Chongqing Middle School of Vocational and Technical Education is trying out modern apprenticeships. Admission is the same as that of a regular employee - Xinhua News Agency
Yesterday, reporters learned from the city education bureau that this year, my city will pilot the "modern apprentice system" talent training model in 60 middle vocational schools, and students who participate in the pilot will have both apprentice status and student status. After being admitted, they will be pre-recruited by the pilot enterprises.
The municipal education committee requires that the admission and recruitment of vocational schools be standardized, and the recruitment and employment procedures of enterprises be clarified. The dual identity of vocational school students and enterprise apprentices should be clearly defined, and the principle of mutual selection should be followed. The students, schools, and enterprises should sign a tripartite agreement, and for students who are 16 years old and have not reached 18 years old, the agreement must be signed by the students, their guardians, the schools, and the enterprises. The agreement should clarify the rights and obligations of each party, as well as the specific job positions, teaching content, and benefits guaranteed to the trainees during on-the-job training.
Encouraging pilot schools to adopt modern apprenticeship forms and cooperate with enterprises to conduct pre-employment training and transfer training for employees.
The trial schools should reform the talent cultivation model.
The school and enterprises jointly design the talent training plan, and jointly formulate the professional teaching standards, course standards, job standards, master standards, quality monitoring standards and corresponding implementation plans.
The trial period is used to cultivate the curriculum, and the internship time of students in the enterprise is determined according to the professional talent training plan, and the top internship is generally 6 months.
In the practice of enterprises, the enterprise team management mode should be implemented, and according to the characteristics of different professions, one master can lead 2-5 apprentices to form a learning group to ensure that students master the skills required for each training post.
According to the arrangement, from 2016 to August 2019, our city has determined 60 municipal-level modern apprenticeship trial points, with each trial point having about 50 people, and a total of about 3,000 students (apprentices) were trained.
According to the principle of starting with pilot and then expanding to the whole country, explore the long-term mechanism of establishing a school-enterprise joint enrollment, joint training and integrated education, and effectively improve students' job skills and employment rate and employment quality.
My app says it has been delivered, but I haven't received it yet.
Just called for a delivery and I don't know if it was left at the door
Then call back
Why my order was delivered to Hoi Wah Garden in Tsuen Wan
Did you get the address wrong?
This vacuum cleaner has been considered for a long time, and finally made a hard decision to cut the grass. The suction effect is good, and the dust in the house is significantly reduced. However, it is a bit heavy to hold with one hand; the wet mop needs to be improved, and there will be dust marks when going back and forth; overall, it is very satisfactory.
The cooking machine is very deep, looking up at it, it is suitable for my small kitchen, and the child says that it tastes better than what I cook, I have made two meat and vegetable dishes, the braised pork with vinegar is particularly delicious, and it takes a long time, other dishes are very short, the noise is very small, you don't have to worry about making a mess, and you don't have to worry about not being able to do it!
After receiving the goods, I was eager to cook three dishes at noon. It was really amazing that technology had changed our lives. The temperature and seasoning control were precise, and the taste of the dishes directly upgraded to the level of a professional chef. It was great, and it was a godsend for those who were not good at cooking. I highly recommend that you buy it!
I added a new member to the kitchen.
The intelligent cooking machine can automatically control the fire and automatically stir-fry.
No longer afraid of being burned by hot oil, no longer afraid of not being able to control the fire temperature and overcooking or burning the food.
The food cooked in the pot was much better than what I made, and the tomato fried eggs were especially delicious, and the egg texture was very good.
This pot is a good buy.
It is good and worth buying, and it is very good.
Overall, it was very good, very clear, and consistent with the description.
Worth having.
The customer service is also very good.
The screen is large, clear, and does not strain the eyes, and no other abnormalities have been found.
Compared with the mainstream display, it is thicker, and the bezel is wider, and the gap between the bezel and the screen is a bit large, but the screen display effect is good, and the accessories are complete.
The logistics speed is fast!
The service attitude of the shop is good!
After using it for a while, the quality is good, and the screen resolution is also very clear.
The stock market is very good, and it is very perfect to score 4 points in one minute.
The logistics is fast, the things are good, and the second machine is indeed a good thing. The picture quality is high, and it is not distorted because of the large screen. The interface is complete.
The experience is good, the color is restored well, and the quality is good!
China Children's Center will hold a series of activities to make children "high-tech" for the Mid-Autumn Festival - Xinhua Net
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, May 20 (Huang Xiaoxi, Zhou Shanshan) On May 20, a reporter from Xinhua News Agency learned from the China Children's Center that from May 28 to June 1, the China Children's Center will hold a series of activities such as children's innovation experience, children's visual art festival and parent-child book fair, so that children can spend "Children's Day" in the charm of the latest technology.
According to reports, the China Children's Center held activities during the Children's Day of this year, including the "Love Home, Create Cool" Children's Future Learning Carnival, the first Children's Visual Art Festival, the "Book and Fragrance Carnival" activity, and the "All Family Love Reading" picture book series activities.
Li Zhongming, deputy director of the China Children's Center, introduced at the media conference on June 1, 2016, that "Love Home Creates Cool" is the focus of the China Children's Center's celebration of "June 1" this year.
The activity aims to organically combine social innovation with family personal creativity, and through children and family participation to experience various innovative education activities, so that innovation practice becomes a cultural gene of the mass family, and "doing it yourself" becomes a new way of learning and living for the whole family.
It is reported that the "Love Family Create Cool" Children's Future Learning Carnival includes dozens of cutting-edge science and technology experience contents such as the "Bean Fruit Maker" experience activity, the 60th anniversary celebration of the "Old Cow Children's Exploration Hall" and the "Exploration of Family Love and Children's Growth" activity, the VR all-people experience plan, and the "Creator Tribe" interactive workshop.
Five-spice meat rice turned into pickled five-spice meat rice
Will I have to buy $100 or $200 to use it?
It is worrying that it will take so long to complete
Okay, I'll take care of it.
Is this the same rider who sent it to me?
Can you help me follow up?
The restaurant said the food had been cooking for more than half an hour
But no one has taken food from the store.
South African doctor: Omicron's transmissibility is strong, but most are mild
Many doctors and medical experts in South Africa believe that the Omicron variant of the new coronavirus is milder than the Delta variant, although it spreads faster.
According to a report by the Associated Press, with the spread of the omicron variant in South Africa, a group of more than 5,000 doctors in the KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa reported that the symptoms of the new coronavirus patients they are currently treating are relatively mild, such as body aches and coughing, which are similar to those of the flu.
Dr. Unben Pillay, the director of the organization, said that he sees dozens of patients every day, but none of them need to be hospitalized.
"They can control the disease at home, and most people recover within 10 to 14 days," Pellie said.
He said it includes older patients and those with underlying health conditions, who are more likely to become seriously ill with the virus.
He said that compared to the previous wave of Delta infections, the patients he treated for COVID-19 "had difficulty breathing and low oxygen levels.
Many people will have to stay in the hospital for several days."
Two weeks after the first report of the Omicron variant in southern Africa, other doctors have also shared similar experiences.
While it will take several weeks to collect enough data, doctors' observations and early evidence have provided some clues.
According to the summary of the South African National Institute of Communicable Diseases: Among the recent hospitalized COVID-19 patients, only 30% were severe cases, which was half of the proportion of severe cases in the first wave of the epidemic; the average hospitalization time was shortened from 8 days to 2.8 days; and only 3% of the recent COVID-19 patients died, while the death rate in the early outbreak in South Africa was 20%.
Willem Hanekom, director of the African Health Research Institute, cited data from the National Institute for Communicable Diseases and other reports to say: "At the moment, almost all the indications are that this is a relatively mild disease."
He also said, "Now is still early, and we need to get the later data.
In general, hospitalization and death tend to occur later, and we only entered this wave of the epidemic for two weeks. ”
At the same time, scientists around the world are observing the number of cases and hospitalization rates, and testing the effectiveness of the current vaccines and treatment methods.
While Delta remains the world's main coronavirus strain, cases of the Omicron variant have been reported in dozens of countries, with South Africa as the epicenter of the outbreak.
According to the health official, the number of new cases found in the first week of December in Hongdon Province increased by 400 percent, and the test showed that more than 90 percent of the cases were the Omicron variant.
Thanks to today's supporters, all 80 boxes have been sent out!
The ingredients of the beauty and whitening soup are:
The function of white fungus: sweet and neutral, tonifies the lungs, stomach, and kidneys; has the effects of strengthening the essence, nourishing the kidneys, soothing the intestines, benefiting the stomach, nourishing the blood, and strengthening the heart; is used to treat diseases such as lung heat and dry cough, lung dryness and difficulty swallowing, irregular menstruation in women, inflammation of the stomach, constipation, and other diseases; is a good supplement for patients with deficiency of yin and excess of fire.
The function of peach gum: bitter, neutral, tonifies the large intestine and bladder.
Effect: and blood, lymphatic, stop diarrhea, stop pain, can also replenish water, moisten the intestines, if there are people with constipation, can eat more pectin.
The function of wolfberry: to balance yin and yang, taste sweet, nourish the liver and spleen, and regulate the digestive system.
Beneficial to liver and eyes, nourishing the liver and kidneys, whitening and nourishing the skin, replenishing the deficiency and prolonging life.
The function of red dates: sweet and bland, tonifying the spleen and stomach, and having the functions of nourishing the spleen and stomach, invigorating the spirit and nourishing the blood, and calming the mind. If the spleen and stomach are weak and the qi and blood are insufficient, it is recommended to take more red dates.
The function of dragon's eye meat: sweet and warm, tonifies the heart and spleen, and is suitable for those with deficiency of the heart and spleen.
Lion's eye meat can moisturize and beautify the skin, nourish the blood and calm the mind, replenish the heart and spleen, strengthen the yang, and is suitable for people with anemia. It is also suitable for people with insomnia.
The function of lotus seeds: sweet and bitter, neutral, tonify the heart, spleen and kidney.
Calm the mind, relieve insomnia, weak stomach, forgetfulness, heart palpitations, thirst and hunger, nourish and replenish the deficiency, and stop the stasis of the essence.
Therefore, this beauty soup is not only a dessert, but also a health tonic!
Eating more can make you feel calm and relaxed!
And it won't be as expensive as a bird's nest, and it won't make your pocket burst!
This food has cooled down, and the food may spoil
Order #NUMBER# was originally expected to be delivered at 18:40, but was changed to be delivered at 19:15 after one change!
Dinner time is limited, please handle it quickly!
I haven't received it
How can it be completed in 5 minutes after placing an order?
The actual discount code details are where you can see
Education Watch: What can be done to rescue trafficked children?
If we compare the famous public welfare advertising slogan "No buying, no selling, no killing" with the good environment where there is no demand for "kidnapping," group defense, group treatment, and all-people anti-kidnapping will make kidnapping behavior unprofitable, risky, and costly, and these crimes will not happen frequently.
Recently, the Criminal Investigation Department of the Ministry of Public Security has launched an emergency release platform for missing children information developed by the National Bureau of Criminal Investigation.
This is an internet information platform established to provide an authoritative channel for the publication of missing children information and the timely recovery of abducted children.
When I heard the name of this app, I felt very warm.
The new technology methods are not only named "Wen Yi" and full of sentiment, but also well applied to information technology, which is practical and effective.
The first priority in anti-kidnapping enforcement is to locate the abducted children and protect their safety and freedom.
The second is the trial and punishment of the suspect.
The meaning of criminal punishment can be listed as many “big words” such as individual punishment, social prevention, and legal education.
But before the kidnapping case is solved, it is necessary to pay attention to the safety of the victim.
Matters of urgency, such as "Should the sale of children be punishable by death?" or "Should the sale of children be punishable by death?" can be temporarily set aside for careful discussion, but the rescue of children who have been kidnapped must not be delayed.
According to the experience of such cases, human traffickers usually leave the crime scene as soon as possible after getting the money.
The search for the missing child can be delayed for a minute, and the child may be further away from the parents, and the difficulty of solving the case will increase by a minute.
In this case, it is an effective way to help solve the case and find the child by taking direct measures such as the " reunion " platform.
After all, "kidnapping" is a big task that requires the whole legal system to work.
Striving against crime, protecting the rights and interests of children and parents, from the improvement of the law, to the guarantee of the law enforcement, and from the meticulousness of the law enforcement, there is no need to neglect the care of “protecting children and helping the weak”.
In addition, the prevention of child trafficking, from the family to society, can also be done better.
For example, a common case is that a family of three is resting at a train station, and the parents are asleep, only to wake up and find that the child is missing.
It is not possible to expect a two-year-old to have sufficient self-protection skills, but as a parent of a young child, you should at least have some awareness of protection.
Both parents taking turns to rest, or placing the child in a safe environment, are the most basic means of preventing children from being abducted.
From another perspective, the purchase of trafficked children should also be paid attention to and punished.
A single bad act is often just one link in a long chain.
According to the Criminal Law of China, the legal punishment for the crime of selling children is a fixed term of imprisonment of 5 years; in cases of particularly serious circumstances, the death penalty may be imposed, and the property may be confiscated.
The crime of trafficking in children is obviously a crime that is more severely punished under the trend of “lightening punishment”.
There are still many cases of kidnapping every year.
It is clear that some people have outdated views on child-rearing, and their legal awareness is low.
The legal education for this group of people should be synchronized.
To effectively control the sale of stolen goods, it is not enough to rely solely on official strict enforcement.
If the "market" for kidnapping is widespread, the kidnappers are greedy and constantly innovate in their kidnapping methods, and form a situation of "dueling" with the law enforcement officers, which is bound to fall into a low-efficiency quagmire.
Therefore, breaking down backward concepts and popularizing legal knowledge can also help to curb child trafficking and child abuse.
Yang Haodong delivered the spirit of the 19th CPC National Congress and the provincial party congress at Maolan Mountain
Draw inspiration from the Party's century of struggle
Hunan Daily, December 10, 2020 (Full-media reporter Gong Baowei) According to the unified arrangement of the provincial committee, on December 10, 2020, at 9:00 a.m., the provincial committee secretary and provincial propaganda department secretary Yang Haodong gave an interactive lecture at the video and creative park in Mabanshan. He deeply studied and implemented the spirit of the 19th National Congress of the Party, the spirit of Xi Jinping’s important speeches and instructions on the development of Hunan, and the spirit of the 12th Provincial Party Congress.
Yang Haodong, from the three aspects of ideological belief, original mission, self-revolution and youth big party, party leaders and party theory, deeply and comprehensively expounded the core meaning and practical requirements of the conference.
He pointed out that we should learn the spirit of the whole congress and the important instructions and guidance of General Secretary Xi Jinping on the important speeches of the Hunan Provincial Party Congress, and integrate the spirit of the whole congress and the spirit of the provincial party congress, so as to strengthen the self-consciousness, political self-consciousness and action self-consciousness of defending “two establishments” and achieving “two maintenances”, and unswervingly move forward along the direction guided by General Secretary Xi Jinping.
During the interactive exchange, grassroots cadres, enterprise representatives and young people asked questions about the relationship between the three historical resolutions, how to understand the decisive significance of “two established”, how cultural enterprises should grasp the guiding role, and how new-generation youth can draw strength from the century-long history of the Party. Yang Haodong answered the questions with simple language and vivid examples. He hoped that young party members would draw strength from the Party’s century-long struggle and tightly unite around the central leadership of the Party, to remain steadfast in their commitment to the Party and to use their youth to write the responsibility and responsibility of the Party.
According to the estimate of graduates from Beijing area colleges and universities in 2022, the number of graduates is expected to reach 268,000 - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, 2022, Xinhua News Agency in Beijing (reporter Yang Na) learned from the 2022 Beijing University Graduates Employment and Entrepreneurship Work Video Conference jointly held by the Beijing Municipal Education Commission and the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau that the number of graduates from Beijing universities in 2022 is expected to reach 268,000, an increase of 16,000 from last year.
Relevant officials from the Beijing Municipal Human Resources and Social Security Bureau said that they will deploy the employment work for Beijing University graduates from strengthening the matching of supply and demand, strengthening policy support, expanding employment channels, ensuring difficult assistance, supporting innovation and entrepreneurship, and improving service efficiency.
It is learned that the Human Resources and Social Security Bureau of Beijing Municipal People's Government will build a practice platform, increase the supply of jobs, actively contact 40 job experience bases for graduates of 40 universities, visit recruiting units, integrate demand information and job information, and focus on the "six-in-one" strategy, that is, expanding the recruitment of a batch of enterprises, expanding the recruitment of a batch of state-owned enterprises, expanding the recruitment of a batch of grassroots projects, expanding the recruitment of a batch of conscripts, expanding the recruitment of a batch of employment trainees, expanding the recruitment of a batch of employment apprentices, and expanding the recruitment of a batch of entrepreneurship-driven employment. They will implement the "one-life-one-policy" dynamic management, and recommend at least 5 job position information for each graduate, ensuring that 100% of difficult-to-employ graduate families receive assistance.
In fact, I don't know if the store made a mistake or the rider made a mistake.
No receipt on the bag
They can't be traced
I hope you understand
Because the delivery time is 30 minutes faster than the display time.
Thank you
Yes, a new rider has come in.
He's been waiting for a long time.
The restaurant has been saying it has been dealing with it.
I waited for several hours
The International Olive Council divides olive oil into two main categories: virgin olive oil (virgin olive oil) and refined olive oil (lampante olive oil or refined olive oil) and five grades.
Virgin olive oil, or extra virgin olive oil, is the oil obtained by mechanical cold pressing of fresh olive fruit, after removing impurities by filtration.
According to the acidity, it can be divided into three levels:
Extra Virgin Olive Oil: This is the highest grade and highest quality olive oil, a pure natural product.
The taste is excellent, with a mild and elegant plant fragrance, and the acidity is no more than 1%.
High-quality virgin olive oil (Fine Virgin): Slightly higher in acidity, but less than 2%, pure and fragrant.
Ordinary Virgin Olive Oil (Ordinary Virgin Olive Oil): The taste and flavor are good, and the acidity is no more than 3.3%.
Refined olive oil is olive oil obtained after refining the initial pressed olive oil with an acidity of more than 3.3%, or it can be called "secondary oil".
Refining olive oil can be divided into two levels:
Extra Virgin Olive Oil (EVOO): Refined olive oil mixed with a certain proportion of virgin olive oil to balance the taste and color, with an acidity of less than 1.5%, and a clear, pale yellow color.
Refined olive-pomace oil or olive-pomace seed oil (Refined Olive-Pomace Oil): Refined olive-pomace oil is obtained by extracting the oil from the pomace and refining it.
If you have seen the grading system, you should have noticed that acidity is a very important indicator for olive oil.
To know, olives are like grapes used to make wine, from different regions and different varieties of olives, different standards of olive oil will be produced.
The best place to grow oil palms:
The Mediterranean coast has the most suitable soil and climate conditions for the growth of oil palm, including the most suitable soil and climate conditions for the growth of oil palm, such as temperature, sunshine, air humidity and rainfall.
Apart from the Mediterranean coast, other areas can only be sporadically planted in suitable areas.
The main production area and the production area (Mediterranean):
Italy, Spain, Greece, Turkey, Portugal, Morocco, Syria, Israel, Tunisia, Algeria, Egypt, Pakistan, Lebanon, etc. are also similar to its climate.
The harvest month of palm oil:
The period from March to June is the time when the oil palm tree blooms and bears fruit. The fruit starts to develop and mature from July to October, and the fruit changes from green to red, purple, and finally black.
November to February is the harvest season for fruit (the freshness of olive oil is very important).
The nutritional components of olive oil:
Olive oil is rich in a variety of monounsaturated fatty acids, including oleic acid and linoleic acid, linolenic acid, vitamin A, vitamin B, vitamin D, vitamin E, vitamin K, and antioxidants.
Olive oil is considered to be the most suitable oil for human nutrition among all the oils discovered so far.
Democracy Summit Ends, Biden Says Freedoms Will Never Be Extinguished
The online "Democracy Summit" (Summit for Democracy) co-chaired by US President Biden and attended by government leaders from 110 countries, civil society and private sector leaders concluded on Friday (Dec. 10).
Biden said in his closing remarks that the flame of freedom burns in the hearts of people all over the world, and no authoritarian regime can extinguish it.
He also said that he planned to hold the second Global "Democracy Summit" next year.
Taiwan's representative and vice minister Tang Fenghe also spoke at the summit on the second day. Hong Kong democracy activist Ronny Tong, who is currently living in exile in the UK, also spoke at the summit on the second day.
Biden said, "We know the work before us is daunting.
But we know that we can face challenges because I have said before, as this summit has shown, democracy is everywhere.
Dictatorship can never extinguish the spark of freedom, which burns in the hearts of people all over the world and in every corner of the world. ”
Biden also said that defending democracy requires the effort of the whole society.
He said: "As the leader of the government, we have the responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the protection of democracy, promote reform, achieve transparency in accountability governance, and better resist the buffer and impact of authoritarianism, as well as those who want to pursue power nakedly before the public interest. "
The theme of the second day of the "Democracy Summit" is to defend human rights, consolidate democracy and resist authoritarianism, and to counter digital authoritarianism and affirm the value of democracy.
Today is International Human Rights Day.
The United Nations Secretary-General António Guterres also said in his opening remarks today that democracy is facing challenges globally, especially the challenges brought by new digital technologies.
He said: "Now is the time to reiterate our common values and positions, and to demonstrate our democratic resilience.
This requires deepening social dialogue, addressing inequality, fighting corruption, updating social contracts, investing in quality education, and expanding opportunities for women and girls.
This also requires resolute condemnation of all forms of populism, nationalism and extremism, including the use of all tools provided by the technological revolution. ”
Hong Kong democracy activist Ronson Lau gave a speech at the summit through a pre-recorded video, reminding the participants to continue to pay attention to the human rights situation of Chinese minorities such as the Uighurs and Tibetans in Hong Kong.
He said: "For a long time, the world has been directly affected by China's rise, but there has been no mechanism to hold China accountable.
That's why political leaders and civil society leaders must work together.
We must use all of our resources (resources) to ensure that the restoration of democracy is our top priority. "
Luo Guancong also called for the free world to unite to resist the threat of the CCP.
He said: "Maybe some of you are afraid of offending Xi Jinping, maybe some of you don't want to lose the Chinese market, maybe some of you don't understand (the Communist Party of China's) threat to our democratic values.
And that's why we failed.
This is one of the reasons we must change."
Deputy Minister of the Executive Yuan Tang Feng attended a roundtable discussion on "Fighting Digital Authoritarianism and Affirming the Value of Democracy" and released a national statement through video, emphasizing that Taiwan is on the front line of resisting dictatorship and authoritarianism.
He also shared his experience in combating the COVID-19 pandemic through information transparency and building trust.
He said: "In the era of democracy in Taiwan, we have always stood on the front line of global opposition to authoritarianism, and played a leading role in promoting global freedom, democracy and human rights.
During the pandemic, authoritarian governments in different regions have justified their infringements of human rights in the name of public health and the common good, and global democracy is showing signs of regression.
However, in Taiwan, we don't have to close the city to control the epidemic, and we don't have to take down the fake information. ”
At the same time as the second day of the "Democracy Summit" schedule, the US Treasury announced the implementation of sanctions in accordance with the law against 15 individuals and 10 entities in China, North Korea, and other countries that were determined to have seriously violated human rights, and also imposed investment restrictions on a Chinese company that was determined to use surveillance technology to commit human rights violations.
I've already taken the photo and uploaded it for you.
I know.
But the restaurant didn't know why it was constantly pushing back the delivery time.
Originally, I was going to #NUMBER#.
So, I'm not calling anymore.
I didn't eat
I will definitely complain
Why didn't you tell me earlier if you couldn't send it?
And you waited for so long
No, I didn't get a call.
Please notify him to send it to our company
I don't want to wait another #NUMBER# minutes
A meal waited for half an hour
#PRS_ORG# has not been delivered.
I want to cancel the order
Why not cancel?
Hello, the chicken soup sent by the restaurant is fresh
I wanted to try tennis, but I was afraid I wouldn't be able to stick with it, so I wanted to find a place to practice that was similar in price.
In fact, the price is often directly proportional to the friendliness, and if you can't tell the difference, then the expensive normal situation is more friendly than the cheap one. This kind of "entry-level shot" is actually industrial waste.
They are very weak, and when the ball hits the racket, the vibration is very large, and the hard ball cannot hold it. The top players are very difficult to control.
The logic and subtext of their existence is———tennis is so hard, you know you can't learn it, and you know you don't want to spend a lot of money on it, so we'll make a cheap product that you can play a couple of times and then forget about it. That way, this product is cheap, and you won't feel bad about it.
When you can really tell the difference between good and bad, then you've progressed, and then I'll come back here and buy the expensive ones. I'll make twice the money.
It is suggested that you spend the same amount of money to buy a second-hand good one, and choose Prince or Denglupu. These two brands are not well-known, so it is not easy to sell a good one. A new one costs around 500-600, and a second-hand one costs around 200. Wouldn't it be nice to enjoy the benefits of a thousand-yuan camera?
It is friendly to beginners, but once you pass the beginner stage, it is useless, but most people, especially girls, cannot pass the beginner stage.
The order has been delayed multiple times for delivery
May I ask if you can follow up?
Postponed
Thank you
That is to say, I already have credit?
Do I need to place another order now? Did I not need to pay attention to the previous order?
Hello, you ordered food from this restaurant, but the food was missing many things and the chicken wings were raw.
#PRS_ORG# I was told to take it, please cancel
I ordered delivery, and there was no mention of pick-up.
Jiangxi will train 10,000 rural elementary school music teachers within three years - Xinhua News Agency
On May 22, 2019 (reporter Chen Yushanshan) The reporter recently learned from the Jiangxi Provincial Education Department that in order to strengthen the guarantee capacity of teacher teams in shortage of disciplines and realize the balanced development of compulsory education in rural areas, since 2016, Jiangxi Province has planned to train 10,000 qualified music, art and sports teachers for each primary school in rural areas (villages and below) over a period of three years, totaling 100,000.
It is understood that the training object is for rural primary schools in Jiangxi Province with music, art, and physical education knowledge or ability, and can serve as other subject teachers of music, art, and physical education.
Through training, they will master the basic knowledge and teaching skills of the teaching of voice aesthetics, update their teaching ideas and concepts, master modern teaching methods, improve their subject teaching ability, activity design ability, campus cultural ability and self-development ability, and build a team of multi-skilled voice aesthetics teachers, and solve the problem of lack of voice aesthetics teachers in rural areas.
In order to ensure the quality and effectiveness of training, Jiangxi has planned to set up one trainer for music, art and sports in each of the 100 counties (cities, districts) in the province, a total of 300 trainers, to comprehensively improve their teaching demonstration leading ability, curriculum design and organization ability, training ability, and network training workshop construction ability, and play the role of teaching, demonstration, guidance and supervision.
Because waiting for 20 minutes has already waited for 1 hour #NUMBER# minutes
I don't want to eat food that I made 1 hour ago
I've found the buyer of the previous incorrect order
But my wheel was missing.
The editor brings you which facial cleanser is good?
How good is facial cleansing milk?
1. Korean skincare products and makeup sets, moisturizing and moisturizing, whitening and brightening, brightening skin color, light-sensitive whitening gift box, five-piece set gift box (cleansing milk, toner, milk, essence, eye cream)
Reasons for recommendation: It has the effect of lifting and firming, repairing peptides, shaping firm skin, saying goodbye to sagging skin, improving eye tail wrinkles and fine wrinkles around the eyes, and the moisturizing effect is very excellent. It can quickly penetrate into the skin.
The shelf life (year) is 5, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting, the efficacy is whitening, the net content (mL/g) is a set, the product packaging has a gift box, suitable for mixed skin types, the efficacy is whitening, the efficacy is moisturizing, the efficacy is moisturizing, the product packaging has an outer box, the efficacy is tightening and firming, the product packaging has a seal, the product origin is Suzhou, Jiangsu Province, China, is it a special purpose cosmetic, no, it is not, what are its other effects, currently there are more than 140,000+ reviews, with a 99% positive rating, users praise it as extremely useful, well-packaged, and high-end.
2. Korean skincare and makeup set with hyaluronic acid and mild cleansing and moisturizing water and moisturizing and nourishing gift box of six pieces (facial cleanser, toner, emulsion, essence, cream)
Recommended reasons: It has the effects of repairing, moisturizing, whitening and toning the skin, which can improve the problems of coarse skin and large pores, and is suitable for mixed skin types. It is clean and not dry after washing.
The shelf life (year) is 5, whether it is a special purpose cosmetic, the product packaging has anti-counterfeiting measures, suitable for mixed skin types, moisturizing effect, suitable for skin ages 25-34, net content (mL/g) 120ml+120ml+100ml+6g*3, moisturizing effect, product packaging has an outer box, product packaging has a seal, product origin is Jiangsu Suzhou, currently has 7700+ evaluations, with a 99% positive rating, praised for being refreshing and comfortable, with good moisturizing effect, and a high-end atmosphere.
3. OSM makeup set by Euphoria, a set of nourishing and beautifying skin care products (cleansing milk + refreshing water + eye cream + emulsion + face cream) for women
Recommended reasons: Deeply clean the skin, help remove the dust and oil on the skin, and refine the pores, and can effectively nourish the skin and moisturize the skin. It can effectively whiten and brighten the skin, improve the skin's dark yellow and color spots, and can help improve the skin's self-repair ability and help the skin recover its firmness.
The shelf life (year) is 4 years, and the product is produced in Zhejiang Lake City, whether it is a special purpose cosmetic or not, the effect is to soothe and calm, the effect is to whiten, the net content (mL/g) is a set, the effect is to moisturize, suitable for any skin type, the effect is to moisturize, the product packaging has an outer box, the effect is to refine the pores, the effect is to deep clean, and currently there are more than 220,000+ people who have evaluated it, with a 98% approval rate, and users praise its comfortable use, high-end feel, and stylish packaging.
4, Hanhoo Red Stone Lychee Freshly Picked Six-Piece Set (Skin Care and Makeup Set, Including Facial Cleanser, Toner, Moisturizer, Eye Cream, and Lip Balm), Suitable for Students and Young Women Who Want to Take Care of Their Skin.
Recommended reasons: deep cleaning of pores and dirt, softening of aging keratin, lifting of sagging skin, fading of facial fine lines, soft and plump facial skin, moisturizing while improving skin quality, preventing the occurrence of fine wrinkles, suitable for all skin types, mild and non-greasy.
Hello, how long will it take to deliver the food that I have ordered?
They have finished their work.
Your rider is #PHONENUMBER#, named #NAME#
Please give me a reasonable explanation.
Yes, but your rider is a problem, please handle it well
Can you check first if they are still on the road? If you can, send them to the hospital as soon as possible.
OK, if not, then return the money for the order
In fact, there are many things to pay attention to when dressing and matching for girls who are slightly overweight.
The skirt worn by the fat girl should not be too short or too long, and the length should be about the knee, just enough to cover the fat on the thighs.
If the skirt is too short, it will reveal the fat on the legs.
Overlong will make you feel short and fat.
If you wear a skirt that is longer in the front and shorter in the back, it will make you look taller. This is because the upper body, skirt, and long stockings are all in different colors, which will create a sense of elongation.
In fact, many dark-colored clothes are the standard wear of chubby girls (the author has a deep understanding of this), and dark colors are also a good way to cover your body fat, and high-class black short skirts are the first choice for chubby girls.
Wearing deep-colored clothes, especially black short skirts, will make you look thinner.
If your legs are fat, don't wear socks and shoes that are too tight.
The more popular it is, the better. The color should not be too bright.
To avoid people feeling fat when they notice your legs and feet.
For slightly chubby girls, it is necessary to teach them how to dress and match.
Don't wear tight short skirts to fat girls, and don't wear tops that are too short or stuffed inside the skirt, which will make people feel uncomfortable. If you have thick legs, you should wear black long stockings or mesh stockings (the kind with fine grids), and choose a soft and comfortable printed dress. Match a cardigan-style top to cover the shortcomings of fat girls.
Of course, girls who are slightly overweight should also pay attention to what they wear when they wear short skirts.
A fat girl should choose a shirt with the same color as the skirt to make her body look taller.
Short skirts paired with high-heeled shoes can make your legs look more slender. This is the most popular summer match!
If you are a plus-size MM with skinny legs, I recommend choosing a gorgeous dress with a long skirt.
Not only can it cover the big belly, but it can also show your advantages.
The A-line skirt is very slimming, and is suitable for chubby girls. Choose a tight-fitting top to create a sense of layering, which will make you look slimmer.
A simple white T-shirt matched with a short skirt can also be tried by fat MM.
Skinny girls are also able to dress in style.
As long as you can master the rules of dressing and matching, then the thin girls will be the focus of everyone's attention.
After changing the way of dressing and matching, it is also necessary to exercise more in life, and try to get rid of the label of micro-fat woman as early as possible 😄
The 18th World Beverage Innovation Awards is jointly organized by FoodBev Media and Brau Beviale International Brewing, Distilling and Beverage Industry Exhibition in Nuremberg, Germany.
It attracted 279 works from 25 countries and 22 different categories.
The list of finalists was announced on October 15, and the final winners will be announced online on November 11 (British Summer Time).
We saw that Yuanqi Forest's LP28 no-sugar yogurt was shortlisted for the Best Dairy Beverage Award, Ilian's "GOGO Wuhan" marketing campaign was shortlisted for the Best Marketing Activity Award, and the packaging collaboration between PepsiCo and the People's Daily New Media was shortlisted for the Best Packaging Design/Label Award.
Laura Nettle, senior marketing manager at FoodBev Media, said: "We are delighted to be celebrating the 18th anniversary of the World Beverage Innovation Awards with Brau Beviale.
From new flavors, new concepts and new functions to brands, packaging and manufacturing, we have seen the trends in the beverage industry as the industry continues to innovate in a more sustainable way.
The World Beverage Innovation Awards recognized the most ambitious new products and developments in the global beverage industry this year.
Here is the full list of finalists in each category.
Ardagh Group's technology can turn 100 percent of recycled glass into new bottles.
The water in the box is packaged in bags, and the packaging box is made of 100% recyclable materials, which can reduce the packaging by 66% and reduce carbon emissions by 97%.
LatCub is 100% biodegradable, uses less paper, and does not use harmful adhesives or tape on the environment.
Ardagh Group's technology can recycle 100 percent of recovered glass to make new bottles.
The final winners will be announced on the FoodBev Media YouTube channel on November 11 (British Summer Time), and FBIF will continue to report for you, please stay tuned!
Why so long
Starved to death
From 7:30 to now
Don't answer if you can't
I can go out and buy food to eat, and I don't need to stay here #PRS_ORG#
Xinhua News Agency + Beijing Youth Ice Hockey League ignites the enthusiasm for the Winter Olympics - Xinhua News Agency
On December 11, Beijing DreamING team player Pan Yaotian (middle) scored a goal in the game.
On that day, the 2021-2022 season of the Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League continued to compete in various ice rinks in Beijing.
This season's league is divided into regular season and post-season, and the age group of participating athletes is from U6 to U18. The competition is divided into the competitive group and the selection group, with a total of 256 representative teams from all over the city, attracting nearly 3,600 players from all over the city to participate.
The Beijing Youth Ice Hockey Club League has developed for more than ten years, and has become a platform for Beijing youth ice hockey enthusiasts to hone their skills and make friends, and has also provided excellent players for the Beijing Youth Team and the Youth Team.
The league played a positive role in promoting the development of ice hockey in Beijing for the youth, and ignited the enthusiasm for ice hockey in the Winter Olympics, and laid a foundation for the development of ice hockey in Beijing during the post-Winter Olympics period.
Girl as target for sister's fundraising: "It hurts, but it's better than nothing" - Xinhua News Agency
A girl stands in front of a large wooden board in Wulin Square in Hangzhou, with the words "human target, ten yuan per arrow" written on it.
Yesterday morning, a photo of a "Hangzhou girl willing to be a 'target' for her sister's fundraising" went viral on social media.
The photo shows a girl standing in front of a wooden board that is a little taller than a person in Hangzhou Wulin Square. The board has the words "human target, 10 yuan per arrow" written on it, indicating that after paying the fee, people can use a bow and arrow to shoot.
The incident has sparked heated discussion among netizens.
Last night, the publicity officer of the City Public Security Bureau of Hangzhou City confirmed to the reporter of Xinjing that the police confirmed that the girl made such an extreme move because she was soliciting donations from her sister. However, this kind of behavior is not worthy of promotion, and after being warned, the girl left the local police station yesterday.
Girl on street 'target' for donations pleads guilty
In the picture circulating on the Internet, a girl with long hair stood in front of a large wooden board, and the words "human target, ten yuan per arrow" were written on the board with black ink. Another wooden board next to her had her bank account number, WeChat and Alipay account numbers written on it.
The picture sparked controversy after it was posted online.
Some netizens think that this is a "begging for attention" behavior, and many netizens expressed sympathy for this.
"We were patrolling around 10 a.m. on the 23rd when we discovered the situation. At that time, there were already a lot of onlookers. "
When local media interviewed the police officers in the vicinity of the incident, they said that there were two female vendors, both of whom were around 20 years old and dressed in a youthful and beautiful manner.
Among them, the girl who was used as a "human target" was crying and begging passers-by to play this game; the other girl was standing on the side and shouting, saying that her friend's sister had leukemia and needed urgent surgery.
"We have contacted the local police in Guizhou and learned that the girl was collecting donations for her sister's leukemia treatment. "
Last night, the propaganda officer of the Hangzhou City Public Security Bureau's Xiacheng Sub-bureau told the reporter of Xinjing Daily that the girl's name was Ji Jia Li and she was collecting donations for her sister Ji Jia Yan.
But because the treatment still needs more than 300,000 yuan, I couldn't think of a good way to raise funds, so I made this decision.
He said that during the whole process, one of the girls was the target and the other was responsible for shooting, but neither of them participated in it, and no one shot during the whole process. Only people watched and took photos and posted them on Weibo.
After the police identified the type of bow and arrow used, it was determined that it was not subject to control.
The official said, "We do not encourage this kind of fundraising."
After being warned by the police, she left the police station.
Heat dissipation effect: good, light weight: convenient appearance material: satisfactory, Acer has always been very cost-effective.
The new machine is very good.
The performance is stable, and there is no problem with the heat dissipation of four exhaust ports, which is worth recommending.
This Acer Dark Knight Dragon game console is very good, the workmanship and materials are good, and you can rest assured to buy the brand!
The price of the Lenovo Dark Knight Knight Dragon is not expensive.
Personally, I think that the shadow knight dragon of Honghu is really good. The game effect: The game effect is refreshing, and it can be played smoothly for most games. My chicken is all high-frame rate and stable, which is very smooth, and LOL is not in the picture. CSGO is also easy to handle, and most three-A games can be played.
Heat dissipation: The heat dissipation effect is good, the fan is very powerful, and it is quiet when working. The gaming effect is also good when the fan is turned on.
Appearance material: The appearance is very cool, and the display effect is very good. The screen is very clear, and 1080p is enough for playing games.
I bought a notebook and I think it's really good. It's mainly used for design, and the cost performance is very high. It's lighter than I expected, and it's more beautiful than I expected. The red on the back is a very good wine color. It's not too vulgar, and the overall impression is much higher than expected. It's worth buying, and girls are also suitable.
Two years ago, I started to contact the Night Riders of Hong Kong, and it took two years to use it. The price-performance ratio is very high, and the quality is very good!
My friends also recommended them to buy this product!
Three machines of this series have already been purchased!
The appearance is beautiful and the configuration is also good
I bought it for my nephew, hoping to wait for the 418 bank event, but he needed it urgently, so I bought it early, so I missed the big bank event.
However, the price-performance ratio is quite high, and the logistics are also quite fast. I will come back to review after a period of time.
A brand new original, with a very high price-performance ratio, a gaming notebook computer with a very good design style, and has already installed Windows 11 and Office 2019.
The effect: Bought the child to do 3D rendering software, the software has been installed, the child said that it can be used normally, and the performance of this computer can do 3D design work.
He said it was good for his son.
The computer is good, especially the customer service is very good, if you don't understand, you can ask, I recommend buying
It's also good, and the graphics of playing games are really good
What was the biggest thing in 2021?
Undoubtedly, it was the Tokyo Olympics.
Do you think only Olympic athletes can win awards?
Some time ago, there was an article called "Take a look! The project manager can beat the gold medal in the Olympic project" which was very popular. The article mentioned that the project managers can beat the gold medal in many projects, and no one can catch up: moving bricks, going on business trips, staying up late is the daily routine of project managers, and rescuing, carrying buckets, and apologizing are not even mentioned.
It seems to be a joke, but it also reflects the daily bitterness of project managers. Behind it is a lack of sincerity in current project management.
And the personnel engaged in project management gradually choose to get out of the predicament of work through some actions.
As the number of PMP (Project Management Professional) applicants has been increasing year by year, more and more project managers have improved their project management skills through learning.
According to the "20 Years of Project Management Development in China (1999-2019)" report, as of September 2019, the total number of PMP® applicants in China was nearly 6 million, and the number of PMP® certified was about 420,000, and the number of valid certificates was about 300,000, accounting for 31.2% of the total number of PMP® certificates in the world.
Over the past 10 years, the number of PMP holders has been increasing year by year, which indicates that more and more project managers have realized that it is no longer possible to do things by simply copying the "old experience". The rapidly changing work environment has made us realize that we need to learn how to explore the road ahead by standing on the shoulders of scientific giants.
However, can PMP certification guarantee that project management work will run smoothly?
Many project management beginners expressed that by learning related courses such as PMP/IPMP, they can systematically master the ten major fields and five process groups of project management, but when actually performing project management work, they are still in a fog.
Many project managers often feedback the following problems: Lack of project management knowledge, relying solely on personal experience, lacking project management theory, not knowing how to practice; Lack of systematic project management process system support, unable to land in work, project estimation is not accurate, control sensitivity is poor, and the project drags on; unclear division of labor, the "old oil man" in the team does not know how to deal with it; cross-departmental cooperation is not smooth, and the project is difficult to progress.
Therefore, focusing on product innovation and R&D management for more than ten years, it has helped many excellent enterprises cultivate a large number of product managers, project managers and other R&D key talents, and has won the honorary title of "China's Enterprise R&D Management Talent Training Base" and other honors.
The "Project Manager Training Camp" online course is a way of online fragmented learning, which combines the practical cases, tools and methods of many R&D enterprises, and helps you master the essential knowledge and standard actions of project managers, and embark on the advanced path of project management for yourself.
This is also an opportunity for enterprises to promote the cultivation of project managers by using lower costs and less investment, and to achieve efficient operation results.
The course is not only taught by the expert team of Zhongtian Huaxia (formerly Huawei R&D management team), but also combines international advanced project management theories and many real business scenarios of well-known enterprises to provide in-depth and practical explanations of the course content.
It will also provide scientific and practical management tools and methods, rich templates and forms, to help students convert the knowledge learned in class into specific work after class.
Only one shrimp dumpling order?
Why have six fingers?
Before the Double 12, Jingxin urges consumers to practice rational consumption - Economic Observer Net - Professional financial and economic news website
This year, the transaction amount of online payment business in China reached 1.77 trillion yuan on the “Double 11” celebration, which is a new high compared with the previous year.
The variety of festive red envelopes and the live broadcast of snatching people's eyeballs once again made consumers shout for benefits. This wave of consumer enthusiasm not only made people marvel at the strength of national consumption, but also forced us to calm down and think about the impact of consumerism on society and the mainstream consumer group in contemporary society.
Before the “Double Twelve” arrives, Jieshan Consumer Finance Co., Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as “Jieshan”) issued a rational consumption advocacy, reminding the majority of users, especially young people, to establish good consumption awareness and consumption habits, and reject blind consumption and excessive consumption.
According to the results of the Consumer Financial Literacy Survey and Analysis Report released by the People's Bank of China this year, the national consumer financial literacy index is 66.81, which is 2.04 higher than that in 2019.
In general, the performance of Chinese residents in the financial consumption level is relatively good, but there are large differences in financial behavior and skills, and the level of basic financial knowledge needs to be further improved.
The financial literacy level of the elderly and young people is relatively low, and “one old and one young” will still be the focus of financial education. The Nielsen report on the “China Youth Debts Situation Report” and the CCTV Finance report on the “2019-2020 China Youth Consumption Report” show that the young generation has huge consumption potential, and credit consumption has become an important way to upgrade consumption. 86.6% of young people are using credit products, and nearly half of them do not have debt accumulation. Although the young generation as a whole shows a trend of rational consumption, they differ greatly from the label of “overspending” by the outside world, but some young people do have excessive consumption and imitation consumption behaviors, and they have accumulated a lot of financial pressure and debt risk, even leading to social problems. Financial institutions should take up their social responsibilities and guide in a positive way.
As a licensed consumer financial institution, Jincheng has always been committed to helping the people build their own happy life with high-quality and considerate services, advocating that consumers establish good and correct consumption concepts, and actively respond to the call of supervision to improve the rational consumption awareness of consumers, especially young people, through practical actions.
In the past few years, ZTE has carried out comprehensive and diversified financial knowledge dissemination activities targeting young people, including college students, through various forms of innovation practice competitions in cooperation with top domestic universities, in order to subtly guide the consumption needs of young people and help them establish a rational consumption concept, plan their consumption needs reasonably, and ultimately help them accumulate wealth throughout their lives.
On the eve of Double 12, Jingxin reminds all consumer friends to establish reasonable consumption awareness and correct money views, resist blind consumption and overconsumption, avoid falling into the trap of consumption borrowing, and avoid affecting personal credit and economic life in the future.
When you are consuming, you must plan in advance and pay on time.
If it is overdue, the overdue record will be recorded in the individual credit report, which may have a negative impact on the purchase of a car and the purchase of a house in the future.
At the same time, when enjoying financial products and services, you should choose regular institutions and channels, and pay attention to checking whether the relevant institutions have the qualification to operate.
In the future, ZTE will continue to rely on its mature and reliable consumer finance system and continuously update and iterate its financial products to provide consumers with more personalized and diversified services that meet their needs, and help consumers cultivate the concept of rational consumption and moderate borrowing, and become a trusted consumer finance partner for consumers throughout their lives.
I won't go
I'm a delivery person.
No one has contacted me for the past 1 hour, this is definitely online fraud.
Did you think I was calling for take-out for the first time?
After the investigation, you are saying the same thing! I checked the address several times before I placed the order
Okay, thank you! How many days is that?
Vietnam News - Gulf Cooperation Council to address common challenges
The Saudi Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman's stopover includes Oman, the United Arab Emirates (UAE), Qatar, Bahrain and Kuwait.
It is noteworthy that this is the first visit to Qatar by the crown prince since Saudi Arabia and its Arab allies imposed a blockade on Qatar in the middle of 2017, causing the Gulf diplomatic crisis.
In this crisis, Saudi Arabia, the United Arab Emirates, Bahrain and Egypt cut off diplomatic relations with Qatar and imposed a comprehensive embargo, accusing Qatar of supporting terrorist organizations and having close ties with Iran.
The tense international situation has seriously affected the internal unity of the summit, and has had a negative impact on the economy of the countries in the region.
Four Arab nations have closed land, sea and air routes to Qatar.
The crisis was resolved at the Gulf Cooperation Council summit in January 2021, when the countries of the Gulf signed an agreement mediated by the United States and Qatar to move towards "unity and stability."
Saudi Arabia has reopened its border with Qatar.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt are working to restore relations with Qatar through the appointment of new ambassadors first.
The Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) has resolved its differences to restore relations with Qatar in order to meet the requirements of the interests of the countries and the stability of the region in order to face common challenges.
During the visit of the Saudi Crown Prince to Oman, the two sides agreed to open the first direct land route between the two Gulf countries.
The 725-kilometer-long channel connecting the two countries will provide convenient conditions for the travel and integration of citizens of the two countries.
The Saudi Public Investment Fund (PIF) will invest $5 billion in Oman, and 13 cooperation memorandums worth $30 billion were signed between the two countries' companies.
Saudi Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman's visit to the Gulf states coincided with the negotiations between Iran and the world's major powers on the rescue plan called the "Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action" (JCPOA), which the Gulf Arab states condemned for not being able to solve the problem of Iran's missiles.
Each Gulf state has long viewed Iran as a "competitor" and viewed Iran's nuclear program as a "threat" to regional security.
Gulf states believe that failing to resolve the missile issue with Iran and not taking action to curb Iran's activities in the region is flawed.
Under the background that Saudi Arabia and Iran did not meet the wishes of the Gulf countries in the nuclear negotiations with major countries, Saudi Arabia and Iran directly negotiated.
Its goal is to curb the escalation of tensions in the region.
This is one of the factors that have slowed down the growth of national economies in the Gulf Cooperation Council.
The upcoming summit of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) will be the first summit of the Gulf states since the dispute between some member states and Qatar ended.
This is an opportunity to re-evaluate the diplomatic achievements of the Gulf Cooperation Council (GCC) in promoting unity and to propose measures to fully cooperate with its member states to address common challenges and contribute to the stability and development of Gulf countries.
It has not been delivered until 9:30 now, and I have to refund the deposit and cancel the order.
Good
It is said to be the loudest exhaust sound in the new town area!
This car that our team has brought to you is the dream of many men!
It is the flagship supercar of Lamborghini, the replacement model of Murcielago - Aventador LP700-4!
The price is nearly two million dollars, and the road tax for a year is tens of thousands of dollars. It is four-wheel drive, why is it called LP700?
Because it has 700 horsepower, can you imagine how fast it is?
Well, I don't know, the data says that it only takes 2.9 seconds to accelerate from 0 to 100 km/h, which is probably why my Myvi only reaches 30 km/h when the other car has already reached 100 km/h.
The low-slung body, the ostentatious scissor doors, the huge air intakes all over the body, and the endless 6.5 V12 engine under the glass, perfectly interpret the style of Lamborghini.
For the explanation of the car model, it is not necessary to say too much. Just Google it yourself. We have summarized some explanations that Google may not give you.
Too much attention, where to go, everyone is looking, very uncomfortable! (In fact, it is quite refreshing)
1km petrol cost around RM1 (car owner doesn't care)
Practice getting in and out of the car, otherwise it can be a bit awkward (because you won't be able to get out of the car and get stuck halfway)
The engine noise is too loud, and after getting off the car, my ears will suddenly become deaf. (But it's very refreshing.)
The car is too big, and it is very narrow to park in a normal parking space, and it is very afraid of being knocked by the door of the next car when it is opened!
A little lonely because there are no opponents on the road (I myself said this, and it has nothing to do with the car owner, haha)
Please don't misunderstand, the supercar in the video is not for sale, sorry!
If you want to shoot a video for your car, welcome to contact us!
More car news you didn't know about, in The Car Guide / People's Car Journal
A car accident involving millions of dollars!
Bugatti Chiron and Porsche 911 are well-known to car enthusiasts. Chiron is one of the most expensive supercars in the world, and the price of Porsche 911 is also in the million-level!
Just a few minutes ago, cars worth hundreds of millions of dollars were knocked down in foreign countries, and the 911 and the million-dollar Chiron were also knocked down!
The results show that it is reasonable!
Let the spirit of the university resonate with the spirit of the times - Xinhua News Agency
The spirit of a university refers to a series of educational concepts and values accumulated over a long period of time in the development of a university, which is the soul of the university.
From ancient times to the present, the spirit of the university has been of great importance to the development of politics, economics, culture, science and technology, and society, and even the progress of a nation.
From the birth of the first modern university in the world, universities have carried out a unique mission different from other social organizations. For China's universities, the rise came in the autumn of national crisis, and its spirit was deeply influenced by traditional culture and the changes of the times. It advocated the value concept of "virtue and benefit the world" and the patriotic responsibility of "strengthening the country through education."
At present, the trend of informationization and internationalization in higher education is becoming increasingly obvious, and the global education competition, science and technology competition, and talent competition are constantly intensifying. As an important "supply-side" of higher education, its structural reform is facing unprecedented opportunities and challenges.
In particular, the proposal of “Coordinated Development of World-Class Universities and World-Class Disciplines” has shown China’s confidence and determination in moving from a country with a strong higher education system to a country with a strong higher education system, while also setting higher and more stringent requirements for university development.
How to make efforts to enter the world's top 100 universities in a relatively short period of time, and accelerate the construction of several world-class universities and a batch of world-class disciplines on the basis of a certain gap, so as to achieve "overtaking" ?
In addition to the confidence in the goals, the path and the ability, colleges and universities should fully play the three advantages: the first is the late advantage, through continuous introduction of outstanding academic talents from overseas, learning from the advanced experience of world-class universities to significantly improve the academic level and management quality; the second is the cultural advantage, inheriting the wisdom of Chinese civilization accumulated over the past 5,000 years, and promoting the development of excellent traditional culture, so as to consolidate the power, shape the brand, and improve the image; the third is the institutional advantage, taking advantage of the institutional superiority of socialist countries, strengthening the driving force of goals, gathering consensus and working together to optimize resource allocation, and providing a sustainable and solid guarantee for universities to catch up with the advanced level of the world.
It is particularly important to realize that building a world-class university is not possible by replicating the same model across multiple campuses. Each school must highlight its individuality and uniqueness while playing to its strengths.
The educational characteristics should have both common Chinese characteristics and unique characteristics of each school, including their goals, positioning, educational traditions, and resource endowments.
In terms of Zhejiang University, we pay attention to three aspects in our education: First, we focus on the characteristics of cultivating innovative and entrepreneurial talents, building an integrated education environment that combines education and industry, and forming a comprehensive entrepreneurial education ecosystem of the whole chain; Second, we focus on the characteristics of clustering disciplines, promoting the optimization and adjustment of the discipline system, and creating an institutional environment for the cross-discipline; Third, we focus on the characteristics of building an educational system and social services, deepening international exchanges and cooperation, and accelerating the formation of a comprehensive research and production cooperation system between Zhejiang University and enterprises.
In this process, it is particularly important to always adhere to the spirit of the university, so that the university spirit resonates with the spirit of the times.
For Zhejiang University, the “seeking truth and innovation” school motto, the common value of “hard work, education, discernment, and diligence”, and the “embracing the river and the sea, opening up the truth and virtue, opening up the future, and planting the foundation of the country” collectively constitute the latest expression system of the spirit of Zhejiang University.
This is an important guarantee for the school to persist in the correct educational direction and continuously accumulate cultural height and consolidate spiritual strength. The connotation is rich and the significance is profound.
Among them, "Hainan River River" emphasizes the spirit of openness and inclusiveness, which reflects the spirit of "using talents from all over the world for my own use", and is manifested in the excellent educational concept of "using the world's top schools to educate talents". "Qi Zhen Houde" emphasizes the spirit of seeking truth from facts, which means that the university should not only pursue the truth in its pursuit of knowledge, but also should receive moral cultivation and refinement of personality. "Opening up in front of the people" embodies the spirit of reform and innovation, which includes both the pursuit of new knowledge and the innovation of science and technology, as well as the reform and development of society. "Tree my country and my country" emphasizes the spirit of patriotism and dedication, which means that the university should always be in harmony with the destiny of the nation.
This series of spiritual concepts and values pursuit is the soul of Zhejiang University's 120 years of education.
"The wise listen to silence, and the wise see the unseen."
Chinese universities should further stand on the global stage of socialist cause of China, deeply grasp the era and historical mission of higher education, and accelerate the construction of a world-class university.
At the same time, we must adhere to the humanistic care and independence, so that the spirit of the university can be stimulated by the spirit of the times, the national spirit, and the human spirit, so as to provide inexhaustible motivation for the realization of national strength and the rejuvenation of the nation and the realization of the common ideal of mankind.
Ordered a set, received 2 wrong things
Order
Want to pay the service fee to the rider
How can I pay now?
Iran President: If sanctions against Iran are lifted, nuclear talks may reach an agreement - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tehran, Dec. 11 (Reporter Gao Wencheng, Wang Shoubao) - Iranian President Hassan Rouhani said on December 11 in Tehran that if the United States lifts the sanctions on Iran, the negotiations on the comprehensive agreement on the Iranian nuclear issue can reach a “good agreement”.
According to the Iranian president's website, Rouhani said on the day that Iran has proved its sincerity in negotiations by submitting proposals to other parties to the nuclear agreement.
If the US is determined, "the road to reaching an agreement will be smooth."
The relevant parties began to hold talks in Vienna, the capital of Austria, in April this year to discuss the issue of restoring compliance with the agreement between the United States and Iran.
The new round of talks began on November 29 in Vienna, and was temporarily suspended on December 3, and resumed on the 9th.
I haven't received the delivery yet.
Please contact the rider
Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Science Forum in the Greater Bay Area - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Beijing, December 11, 2021. On December 11, President Xi Jinping sent a congratulatory letter to the 2021 Science Forum of the Greater Bay Area.
Xi Jinping pointed out that the world is now undergoing a historic change unseen in a century, and global technological innovation has entered a period of intense activity. The new round of technological revolution and industrial transformation has had a profound impact on the global economic structure.
The Greater Bay Area of Guangdong, Hong Kong and Macao should focus on the strategic positioning of building an international science and technology innovation center, and strive to build a global science and technology innovation highland, and promote the development of new industries.
China is willing to work with scientists and international science and technology organizations around the world to maintain close international scientific and technological exchanges and cooperation, strengthen research on major scientific issues, promote the resolution of common scientific and technological problems, deepen cooperation on key scientific projects, and jointly promote the development of world science.
The 2021 Science Forum in the Greater Bay Area opened in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province on the day, with the theme of “Exploring the Future and Sharing Science”. It was sponsored by the Guangdong Provincial People’s Government.
Yes, the order is in the acceptance state.
But the restaurant said it had to cut the meat and bones apart because the rider did not deliver the bones.
Do you understand my problem?
Not an order delay
Or you can call me directly
Are you following?
The maximum length of time for college students to study and start their own businesses in Guangxi is up to 5 years - Xinhua News Agency
On May 19, a special report from Xinhua News Agency in Nanning (reporter Zhang Ying) revealed that from now on, all universities in Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region will implement a flexible academic system, relax the limit on the number of years students can take a break from school, and extend the time students can take a break from school to start their own businesses by two to five years on the basis of the original academic system. The time spent on entrepreneurship education can be regarded as practical education time.
In order to promote the improvement of the innovation and entrepreneurship ability of college students, the departments of education and human resources in Guangxi have joined hands to build a startup platform, build more college students’ off-campus practice teaching bases, university science and technology parks, university entrepreneurship parks and incubation bases, and provide external support for college students’ entrepreneurship.
According to the requirements, by 2020, the innovation and entrepreneurship practice area of each university should reach more than 3000 square meters, and the practice area of undergraduate schools should reach more than 3000 square meters, and the practice area of vocational schools should reach more than 2000 square meters.
The government encourages universities to set up innovation and entrepreneurship credits, and supports students who perform well in innovation and entrepreneurship practice to transfer to other majors.
Every two years, college teachers must spend at least two months to work in the industry to improve their awareness and ability of innovation and entrepreneurship education.
The Education Department of the Autonomous Region requires all universities in Guangxi to implement the innovation and entrepreneurship training plan for college students in depth, and strive to make every college student participate in an innovation and entrepreneurship training plan during their study period.
Colleges should actively organize students to participate in various levels of innovation and entrepreneurship competitions, and provide financial support.
NEWS GOV-MO: Australia awards honorary doctorates to seven distinguished individuals
The University of Macau held the “2021 Honorary Degree and Higher Degree Conferment Ceremony” on November 11, and awarded the Honorary Doctorate of the University of Macau to Liu Zunyi, Chen Kaixin, Nakamura Shuuji, Li Lanjuan, Li Xiling, Zhu Liliang and Jiang Chaohui for their outstanding achievements and significant contributions to society and education.
At the conferment ceremony, the Chief Executive and Chairman of the University Council of the University of Macau, Ouyang Yu, and the President of the University of Macau, Song Yonghua, presented the honorary doctorates to the President of the University Council of the University of Macau, Lin Jingcheng, and the President of the University of Macau, Song Yonghua, respectively.
Professor Liu Zunyi was awarded the honorary doctorate in education, Professor Chen Kaixin was awarded the honorary doctorate in science, Professor Nakamura Shuuji was awarded the honorary doctorate in science, Professor Li Lanjuan was awarded the honorary doctorate in science, Professor Li Xilong was awarded the honorary doctorate in management, Professor Zhu Lili was awarded the honorary doctorate in science, and Ms. Jiang Chaohui was awarded the honorary doctorate in science.
During his speech, Ouyang Yu first expressed his warmest congratulations to the seven outstanding individuals who were awarded the honorary doctorates, and paid the highest respect to them, who have made outstanding contributions to the development of the country and the progress of the world in different fields. At the same time, Ouyang Yu expressed his heartfelt blessings to the graduates and parents, and also expressed his sincere respect to the dedicated and skilled teaching staff of the university.
Professor Sun Yifang, a professor of the Australian National University, delivered a eulogy for Professor Liu Zunyi, saying that Professor Liu Zunyi was an internationally renowned economist and was known for his outstanding academic achievements and forward-looking educational philosophy.
In addition to his achievements in economic development, economic growth, and the East Asian economy, he was also a visionary educational leader.
In short, he has made great achievements in many fields.
Sun Yifang read the eulogy of Professor Nakamura Shuuji, saying that Professor Nakamura Shuuji was the pioneer of sustainable energy technology.
He was one of three winners of the 2014 Nobel Prize in Physics for his invention of blue light-emitting diodes (LEDs).
Professor Nakamura's invention not only completely changed the lighting industry, but also led to the widespread application of white light-emitting diodes (LEDs) in daily life and industrial production, and made a huge contribution to the welfare of mankind.
Sun Yifang read Li Lanjuan’s eulogy, saying that Li Lanjuan, as a pioneer of China’s artificial liver industry, created a unique and effective Li artificial liver system, achieved significant breakthroughs in the treatment of severe liver failure and liver failure, and significantly reduced the mortality rate of liver failure.
In this battle against the novel coronavirus, she and her team proposed the "four anti-two balance" plan and brought in three major technologies of artificial liver, microecology and stem cells, which significantly improved the survival rate of severe cases.
Sun Yifang read Li Xirong’s eulogy, saying that Professor Li Xirong laid the foundation for innovative research on operation management, shaped the thinking mode of supply chain theory and practice, and completely changed the business model of the world.
Li Xilong is famous for popularizing the concept of the long stick effect in operations management and exploring measures to deal with this phenomenon.
In today's world, with the pandemic and the tense economic situation, the long-tail effect is more and more prominent, and the supply chain is severely disrupted.
Li Xialing's far-sighted research, such as sending coal in the snow, helps the industry to overcome difficulties and bring huge social value.
Sun Yifang read a eulogy for Zhu Lili when she delivered her resignation, saying that in her scientific research work, she discovered a breakthrough and innovative staining technology to prepare samples, which has a high reputation in the scientific community both at home and abroad.
She was awarded important titles such as the International Academy of Sciences and the Academy of Sciences of the Chinese Academy of Sciences due to her outstanding scientific achievements, and she won the deserved high position in the world's science temple with her brilliant achievements.
Chen Xinxuan, Dean of the Chinese Medicine Research Institute of the University of Melbourne, read out Chen Kai's farewell speech, saying that Professor Chen Kai has been engaged in drug research for more than 40 years and has made outstanding scientific achievements and important contributions to the country, Macau, the University of Macau, and the National Key Laboratory. His high international status and reputation are widely recognized.
His active promotion of the development of traditional Chinese medicine in Macao and the Greater Bay Area fully reflects his sense of mission to contribute to the national pharmaceutical development strategy.
The president of the University of Technology of Australia said that Ms. Jiang Chaohui has participated in the development of major inventions and patents, and has accumulated more than 15 items related to storage virtualization, navigation, file system and power management, which are highly practical and widely used, and have greatly improved the convenience of human life.
As an accomplished inventor, Ms. Jiang often makes high-tech and theoretical concepts accessible to the general public by simplifying them.
Finally, Chen Kai, as the representative of the honorary doctor, read the speech of thanks.
He was very happy to see that the pharmaceutical industry in Macau and the Greater Bay Area has established a good example: from the first national key laboratory of Chinese medicine quality research established in Macau to the flourishing development of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area, Macau has made a great contribution in integrating outstanding talents in the field of traditional Chinese medicine in the Greater Bay Area.
In addition, he believes that the management team of the University of Melbourne has foresight and insight, not only providing students with a fertile ground for scientific research, but also delivering many people with a sense of responsibility to society.
He is very honored to be able to exchange and cooperate with the University of Melbourne, and sincerely congratulates the achievements of the University of Melbourne in recent years.
Did he have the correct address?
I haven't seen it yet
The rider went to the wrong place and I didn't receive it.
But I #PRS_ORG# received
The app has not been able to contact the rider
My family thought there was none
But it's been an hour already
In the heat of the NFT boom, the crypto community has come up with a new concept.
In 2021, a blockchain game called “Axie Infinity” had a huge impact in Southeast Asia, and some residents who lost their jobs due to the pandemic began to earn stable income from this game.
Axie Infinity is a pet-raising game based on blockchain technology, which combines various gameplay, including NFT, and is currently the highest-traded NFT project, with a total transaction volume of more than $3 billion.
According to the data of TokenTerminal, Axie Infinity's daily income exceeded 820 million US dollars, and it was approaching "Honor of Kings".
On August 6, Axie Infinity's official announced that its daily active users exceeded 1 million.
The hotness of Axie Infinity will pass a new "palytoearn" mode to more people, and help players no longer be a single role, in addition to getting pleasure and economic benefits from the game, they can also participate in the governance of the game ecosystem.
This subjectivity is not given by the game production company, but is guaranteed by blockchain technology.
When I saw a news about a friend's stock price, my biggest feeling was that the company's choice of industry, that is, the choice of investment target industry, should first choose the industry with a large growth space, with a market size of at least 100 billion yuan; secondly, it should choose the industry with good growth prospects in the future, considering that the growth rate of the industry will reach the best state in the next 3-5 years; finally, it should choose the industry with policy support.
The width of the track refers to the market size, the length of the track refers to the development stage of the industry, and the flatness or ruggedness of the track refers to the competitive pattern of the industry.
Go for the right track!
The first thing in the new year is to summarize the adjustment of 2021 and adjust the tactical layout of 2022.
Strategy is about "doing the right things," which means doing things right.
The strategy is to "do the right thing," which means doing the right thing.
The strategy is to find a direction, and the tactics are to land, and there is space for strategic thinking above most tactical thinking.
For example, how to increase the number of customers (tactical thinking) above, can think about whether to deepen the current field or expand horizontally (strategic thinking); for example, how to improve customer retention rate (tactical thinking) above, can think about how to improve the retention rate of core customers and high-value customers (strategic thinking); above the improvement of activity participation (tactical thinking), can consider how to set the correct activity KPIs, achieve the correct activity goals, such as improving the participation rate of target customers, activating high-value silent customers, and accurately attracting new customers; above the improvement of DAU (tactical thinking), can consider whether the current growth is healthy and sustainable.
It has been 12 years since Bitcoin was born, and in 2021, it has witnessed several milestone events.
On September 7, the small Central American country of El Salvador made Bitcoin a legal tender, making it the first country or region to make Bitcoin a legal tender.
On October 12, the US Securities and Exchange Commission approved ProShares' launch of a Bitcoin ETF for the first time in eight years, and listed it on the New York Stock Exchange, marking the first regulated Bitcoin futures ETF to land in the US capital market, and further expanding the investment channels for cryptocurrencies.
From the perspective of blockchain technology development, Bitcoin is not the main character.
On November 14, 2021, Bitcoin underwent a soft fork upgrade called “Taproot”, which improved the anonymity of Bitcoin network transactions and reduced the data burden of transactions by changing the data structure of the block itself.
Mayonnaise, no mayonnaise sauce
That McChicken would be so hard to eat
Is your $32 discount code worth buying more than $32 to use?
Is it possible to cancel in less than 15 minutes?
Why is my code turning into a confirmation order?
Good
I didn't get the discount?
Hello
The food was not delivered
The rider has already been delivered.
I hope you can come on time, not because I want your coupons!
Have you encountered any problems with continuing education credits?
Overdue registrants failed to provide proof of continuing education. Overdue registrants should provide proof of at least 30 credits of continuing education within the past year. Re-registrants should provide proof of at least 120 credits of continuing education within the past 4 years. Re-registrants should provide proof of at least 30 credits of continuing education per year.
Pricing Engineer Continuing Education Costs
The cost of continuing education for engineers who participate in the network is that they must pay the tuition fee when they register, and the standard is: the cost of compulsory courses of 30 hours is 300 yuan/person/year (including the standard continuing education textbook);
The cost of the 30-hour elective course is 300 yuan/person/year.
The cost of compulsory courses and elective courses is 600 yuan/person/year (including the unified textbook for continuing education).
(1) Participate in the continuing education and learning of the registered price engineer network organized by the Price Coordination Association of China or the provincial and departmental management institutions, and calculate the study hours according to the time recorded in the online learning course.
(2) Participate in the concentrated face-to-face training and various types of training courses, seminars, etc. organized by the registered cost engineers of the China Price Association or the provincial and departmental management institutions, and each half-day can be recognized as 4 credits.
(3) Continue to hold training courses for price engineers, price managers, and price technicians in provincial and municipal governments and departments, and each half-day can be recognized as 10 credits.
(4) Participate in the national and provincial key research projects, the formulation of industry standards, and the writing of textbooks. Each item is recognized for 30 teaching hours per year.
(6) Participate in the national construction cost engineer professional qualification examination curriculum writing, item writing, scoring and evaluation, each year can be recognized 30 hours of credit;
(7) Engineering cost-related professional papers and works published with personal signatures and published publicly (based on the official publication number).
The publication of a book of 10,000 words is recognized for 12 credits;
For papers published in national journals, each thousand words is equivalent to 8 academic hours; for papers published in provincial journals, each thousand words is equivalent to 5 academic hours; and for papers published in municipal journals, each thousand words is equivalent to 3 academic hours.
(9) Organizations of engineering cost consulting enterprises approved or authorized by the Joint Price Negotiation Committee, provincial and departmental management institutions, and provincial construction price associations can hold public training for the society (excluding general management and skill training of enterprises). Each half-day can be recognized for 4 credits, and a maximum of 30 credits can be recognized per year.
The cost engineer network continues to learn
After the registration institution receives the fee, the student's identity is immediately opened, and the construction engineer can enter the network education classroom with the user name and password.
Students learn through online lectures, question and answer sessions, and online discussions.
If you forget your password, you will see an error message when you try to log in with your username and password, and you will not be able to log in to learn. Please contact your registered institution and ask them to help you change your password (but they cannot change your username). Use the new password to log in again.
Scan the QR code to download the Baidu Post Bar client
Watch the high-definition live broadcast and video!
Please arrange delivery
My order hasn't arrived
The delivery person has left without receiving payment.
Please notify the delivery person immediately, we are still waiting
The restaurant had given the food to the rider 30 minutes ago
The visual wedding photography base (Hebei store) has not yet opened a branch
The wedding fashion is avant-garde, the makeup artist is the best, the shooting technology and angle are professional, and the shooting effect is very good.
The seller is very reliable and the service attitude is also very good.
The makeup was very delicate, and the team service was also very good. This trip was very happy, and the professional team was very good. The seller's service attitude was very good, and I would recommend it to my friends. I was very satisfied.
Thank you to the photographer and makeup artist for allowing me to have a unique wedding photo.
Thank you to all the staff who took the wedding photos today, and I look forward to seeing the final product.
Photographing a wedding is a physical exercise, especially for the photographer, who has to run and jump.
The makeup artist was very kind to me and designed a makeup suitable for my face shape. The photography brother was humorous and humorous when taking pictures, and it was worth recommending.
Thank you to my photographer and makeup artist, I hope I can still look like this in my old age.
The woman is beautiful, has a good figure, and is well-mannered. She will be a good wife and a good mother in the future.
The groom has earned a lifetime of happiness and beauty.
The wedding photos are really good, just like what people say online. We look very handsome and beautiful in the photos, and we are very satisfied.
The seller's attitude is also very enthusiastic.
This time of travel not only appreciated the beautiful scenery, but also took beautiful wedding photos, and also met a good friend, the photographer.
The wedding photos are too beautiful, and the photographer and makeup artist are super professional.
I am very grateful to Mu sister for her patience and meticulous guidance. I like the photos taken by her very much.
When I saw the wedding photos, I didn't recognize myself for a moment.
As long as the photographer is good, you can also have a wedding photo that is comparable to that of a celebrity.
The most important thing about taking wedding photos is that both the photographer and the makeup artist have a sense of aesthetics. Fortunately, I met both of them.
After seeing my wedding photos, I realized that I was also "deceived."
Asian-American group sues 3 Ivy League schools for discrimination - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Washington, May 23 (Reporter Xu Jianmei) More than 130 Asian-American groups filed a complaint with the U.S. Department of Education and the Justice Department on May 23, protesting against the three Ivy League schools - Harvard University, Brown University and Dartmouth College - for discriminating against Asian-American applicants in the admissions process.
The Asian American Education Alliance, which filed the lawsuit, held a press conference in Washington on the day.
Zhao Yuchuan, chairman of the group, said at the press conference that the number of Asian applicants who meet the admission requirements of American top universities has doubled in the past 10 years, but the proportion of Asians in these three American top universities has basically remained at the same level.
Many studies have shown that these schools discriminate against Asian applicants in the "holistic" admissions process by "systematically and systematically disadvantaging Asian applicants."
Zhao Yuankang introduced that the research of Sanders et al. in 2014 showed that in the three universities, the acceptance rate of Asian applicants was the lowest among all ethnic groups relative to the number of applicants.
Brown University and Dartmouth College, among all Ivy League schools, have the lowest acceptance rates for Asian students, and Yale University and Brown University have implemented de facto racial quotas for Asian applicants for over 20 years.
Zhao Yuankang told Xinhua News Agency reporters that they hope that after submitting a complaint, the US Department of Education and the Department of Justice will conduct an investigation and take measures to prevent these universities from discriminating against Asians in admissions.
They also hope that the universities that are being complained about can take the initiative to pay attention to this issue and change their admission policies towards Asians.
Currently, the three schools that have been complained about have not made a response.
The Asian American Education Alliance was founded in 2015, and at that time it filed a complaint against Harvard University for discrimination in admissions, but the U.S. Department of Education did not accept the complaint on the grounds of procedures.
In addition to the Chinese-American groups that participated in the lawsuit, there were also Indian-American, Korean-American, Japanese-American, and Pakistani-American education groups.
Utensils needed
Just cancelled the order
Why is it still being executed?
Can you check if there are any cancellations?
But I placed my order at 5:09 this morning.
Over there is the ordering hotline, and they don't know what they're saying
Is there a phone number I can call directly?
In September 2020, Mr. Lu learned that a factory building located in Jingtong Town, Yiwu City, Zhejiang Province from a real estate agent. After multiple site visits, Mr. Lu decided to purchase the factory building.
In December of the same year, Mr. Lu discussed the details of purchasing the factory with the relatives of the owner of the house, Lin, and transferred 200,000 yuan as a deposit through a bank on the same day.
Lin wrote his signature on the "Purchase and Sale Agreement of Factory House" as the payee, which stated that "If the buyer does not want to buy this factory house, the deposit will be returned to the seller. If the seller does not want to sell this factory house, the deposit will be doubled and returned to the seller within one week. Both parties agreed to sign a contract for the purchase and sale of the factory house within one week."
However, after the two parties failed to reach a consensus on the main contract terms such as the selling range and payment methods, the house purchase and sale contract was delayed for a long time.
After a few days, Mr. Lin returned the 200,000 yuan deposit to Mr. Lu.
After a long wait, the house was finally found, the deposit was paid, and the purchase price was ready. All that was left was to sign the contract, but the seller did not sell. This made Mr. Lu helpless and angry.
Therefore, Mr. Lu filed a lawsuit against Mr. Lin to the Yueyang City People's Court.
The court considered that the parties failed to sign a formal contract, and it could not be solely blamed on the defendant. Therefore, this case should not apply the penalty of double return of the deposit, and the defendant is not required to bear the breach of contract liability of double return of the deposit.
The plaintiff appealed after the first trial.
Recently, the second instance court upheld the original judgment.
【Lawyers remind】 In the process of trading, it is necessary to pay attention to the necessary caution.
As a buyer, you should fulfill your duty of due diligence, such as verifying the property owner's information, whether the property has been occupied, and other relevant information, and clearly specify the specific time and place of delivery in the contract to avoid disputes between the parties when performing the contract.
(German Voice of China) After the "Democracy Summit" ended on Friday, the spokesperson of the Chinese Foreign Ministry spoke on Saturday (December 11) and said that the United States held the "Leaders' Summit on Democracy" was "to draw ideological lines, weaponize democracy and weaponize democracy, and use the name of democracy to cover up anti-democratic actions, incite splits and confrontations, and divert domestic contradictions."
The Chinese government believes that "for a long time, the United States has imposed its political system and value concepts on people, promoted the "democratic reform", abused unilateral sanctions, instigated the "color revolution", and caused disastrous consequences.
"Democracy" has already become a "large-scale lethal weapon" for the United States to interfere in other countries.
This summit is an action to fulfill Biden's campaign promise.
The two-day meeting will be held in video format, and 111 leaders from 111 countries are invited to attend, including leaders from Taiwan, but China and Russia were not invited.
Before the summit, China and Russia criticized the United States for its own democratic problems and said that the United States was not qualified to host such a summit.
There are also voices of doubt internationally and in the United States, such as criticism of the invitees, including some leaders with authoritarian tendencies, such as the leaders of the Philippines, Poland, and Brazil, who suspect that the true intention of the Biden government is not for democracy but for geopolitical purposes to organize this summit.
The new German Chancellor Scholz also attended the video democracy summit
The Chinese Foreign Ministry's statement on Saturday said that "today's American democracy is in a pathological state, and the problems of money politics, identity politics, party opposition, political polarization, social fragmentation, racial conflicts, income inequality, and social stratification have become more and more severe." The US democracy is built on a capitalist foundation, which is a "rich man's game."
President Biden said in his speech that "as the leader of the government, we have the responsibility to listen to our citizens, strengthen the protection of democracy, promote reform, achieve transparent accountability governance, and can better resist the power of authoritarianism and the impact of those who want to pursue power nakedly before the public interest."
He stressed that democracy is not something that is taken for granted, "We must constantly update it in every generation, in my view, this is the decisive challenge of our time."
Biden also said that "democracy and human rights are under attack around the world, and democracy needs heroes to defend it."
The United States has promised to launch a one-year action plan after the democracy summit, including a proposal worth $4.244 billion to strengthen democracy around the world and support independent news media.
The United States hopes that each country will make specific public commitments before the 2022 physical democracy summit, so as to improve its democratic system.
Biden said, "Let's all countries implement our commitments and report our progress next year."
Well, I'm just afraid he sent the wrong address.
Ruchang Restaurant (Wudukou Store)
[Mint] Environment: Medium-sized [Service Bell] Service: The food comes quickly "Ancient Method Malao" is my must-try dish. The malao is too fragrant, too soft, and too delicious. If you like desserts, you must try the "Dongjiang Mussel Steamed Tofu Pot" soup. The soup is very fresh, the tofu is very tender, and the...
The taste is praised, the meat is delicious, and the service is enthusiastic.
It has been a long time since I came to Jinchang, and the fruit is still so delicious and real. The first time I tried the steamed bun, it was the southern taste of soft and tender flour!
The steamed rice is just right in terms of moisture content, and the portion is very generous. The signature soy sauce chicken wings are as good as ever, and the soup is also not bad. The treatment of the celery is also quite...
The taste is praised, the service is enthusiastic, and the meat is good.
The old store of Ji Chang is also a popular existence many years ago. The Dongshan Xiao Lou, the wooden floor.
The clay pot rice at the door always takes a long time to cook, and the clay pot has cracked...
I haven't eaten at Dayang for several years, and the rise of various small shops selling Cantonese cuisine has dispersed the customer flow.
It's rare to find a restaurant with available seats, and the quality of the food is just as good as ever.
The taste is praised, the meat is good, and the staple food is praised.
Jichang take-out.
[Rice] Meal: This time's meal was a bit disappointing.
Three cups of chicken: The side dishes are a bit much, and the chicken is a bit less.
The taste of this main dish is slightly off, and the salty taste is not enough, which highlights the sweetness, and everyone can imagine the sweet + various spices to match the dish...
What is the proper way to drink red label whiskey?
Everyone has different hobbies, some people like to collect, some people like to eat, of course, there are also people who like to drink, and the red label whiskey is one of the most popular Scottish whiskies in the world, and the red label whiskey has won the gold medal at the International Wine and Spirit Competition.
Each bottle of red label whiskey has its own unique taste, but if you don't know how to taste it, it would be a waste of its fragrance.
So how do you drink the red label whiskey?
The editor briefly introduces it for everyone.
Red label whiskey:
Zuni is a blended Scotch whisky made from about 35 varieties of Scottish whisky, with a rich aroma and traditional Scottish whisky characteristics. The rich aroma has a sweet and smoky flavor.
The entrance is fresh and slightly grassy, with a strong smoky malt character.
This wine can be drunk straight or mixed with your favorite drink.
Red Label whiskey entered the domestic market, and in order to adapt to the taste of the Chinese people, Red Label whiskey + carbonated beverages such as Coca-Cola, Sprite, and New Coke have become a fashion that never goes out of style.
These sweet drinks can not only neutralize the sour taste, but also visually bring pleasure to people when added to the drink, and have the effect of changing the taste of the drink by adding it.
The most traditional way to drink whiskey is to add a slice of lemon and sugar (sugar can also be used).
The original taste of red wine is slightly sour, and adding sugar can neutralize the sour taste. Lemon will bring a refreshing aroma to the wine, of course, the sweetness and sourness can be adjusted according to personal taste preferences.
The above three are the best ways to drink red-label whiskey. You can try them as a reference, and I hope my introduction can help you.
Education thinking: How the college entrance examination makes “scholars” and “scoundrels” get what they deserve - Xinhua News Agency
Three Lanzhou Jiaotong University students wrote letters to the school leaders to reflect their confusion about the university entrance examination and to propose to increase the difficulty of the examination, change the examination questions, and make the examination truly reflect the students' actual level.
Indeed, for a long time, the college entrance examination has been a "hot topic."
In the university campus, students come from all over the country, with different levels of ability, and different levels of study. The learning situation is very different.
It is inevitable that there are different feelings when assessing a group with such diverse features.
Of course, if the exam questions are single-type and repetitive, and the questions are too simple, it is inevitable that another different feeling will be produced.
Students who don't study hard may be able to pass the exam by cramming before the exam, but if they try other methods, they may achieve double the results with half the effort.
In this way, there will be "dummies" who can pass the exam even if they don't put in effort, and even get high scores; there will also be "geniuses" who never fall behind in their studies, do their homework and notes well, and don't get much higher scores than normal.
It seems that the Lanzhou Jiaotong University students' reflection on the problems in the university entrance examination is not without reason, and I believe that such a situation is not limited to Lanzhou Jiaotong University.
From this perspective, I would like to praise the three students who wrote letters to the teacher.
In fact, people who have graduated from university are clear that there are many phenomena such as studying for the military examination, trying to get exam questions from teachers in various ways, trying to expand the examination range, and getting “special tutoring” before the exam. Even in the exam, there are cases of copying small notes and asking teachers to raise their hands after the exam, which are not rare.
In my opinion, as a teaching quality evaluation-oriented approach, it is more about the teacher's comprehensive grasp of teaching and learning, and the scientific formulation of questions on the basis of this.
Entering the undergraduate stage, professional specialization begins, and many professional courses are based on basic knowledge.
It is undeniable that whether to comprehensively master the basic knowledge points of a discipline is the content to be tested in the college entrance examination.
Undergraduate knowledge is basically the basic theory and basic knowledge of the discipline, and the space for change is not large, and it is basically fixed.
Just like what the teachers said, "I learned the basic knowledge of university mathematics 20 years ago, and I am still learning it now, and it is the focus. "
But the knowledge points are basically unchanged, and it does not mean that the exam questions are all the same or that the questions are repeated.
In many universities, exams are generally organized by a group of examiners, who are then coordinated by senior teachers in each subject. The exam papers are also reviewed by all teachers who are responsible for the subject, to some extent overcoming the problem of repeated questions.
But it is necessary to set up a set of examination questions that are in line with the actual situation of teaching and learning, and the difficulty of the questions is normally distributed according to the overall situation of the students' learning. In addition, it is necessary to comprehensively grasp the teaching situation and analyze the students' learning level in a comprehensive manner, so that the examination question formulation can dynamically grasp the difficulty and type of the questions, and highlight the assessment of basic knowledge, and at the same time, innovate in the design of question types.
Exams are the command of university education, and what kind of exam students will have corresponding preparation plans, and in the long run, it will affect the effectiveness of university education.
Lanzhou Jiaotong University highly values the suggestion letters from students, and has deployed a rectification plan throughout the school.
Require each teaching unit to organize teachers to conduct a self-check on the comparison of teaching and course closing examinations, formulate examination papers and related regulations, and strengthen the supervision and inspection of the examination paper writing and review links, and refine the assessment of grades, and strengthen the comprehensive assessment of all aspects of course teaching.
It is an issue that needs to be addressed from the perspective of mechanism, and it is necessary to put in place corresponding systems. However, the key lies in daily work. Teachers need to have a comprehensive understanding of the teaching situation, not only to understand the teaching content, but also to understand the learning situation of the students. Only by understanding both sides can the teaching and learning be better matched, and the examination will be more in line with reality, so that the “scholars” and the “slackers” can each get what they deserve.
If I cannot change the store location, can I change it to delivery?
I don't need to give you another dime?
The orders have already been delivered.
It didn't work out
GPS? Has it or hasn't it?
The wedding photography (South Street store) of Mrs. Jin has not yet opened a branch.
Before the photo shoot, because we didn't arrange the time well, we changed the time twice. Lan Lan, the consultant, was very patient and arranged the time for us.
Later, I chose a sunny weekend to take photos.
The staff of the Golden family, whether it is a consultant, makeup artist or photographer, are all very good.
That was my first time ever doing makeup officially, wow, I can't believe I'll look like this one day, haha.
Xiaojie and another sister (sorry, I can't remember her name) were very patient with their makeup, and their makeup was very natural.
The outdoor scenes were filmed in Kowloon City. Fortunately, the weather was good that day, and I didn't feel too cold when taking photos. The makeup artist would occasionally check our clothes and accessories, and would help us tidy up if there was anything wrong.
The photographer is also very funny, and feels very happy after taking pictures for a day.
When taking photos, because there are many cases online, we don't want to let the guests delete too many photos, but when we take photos, we really don't want to add any photos, and the 24 photos in the package are all there (I heard that my cousin, who took my wedding photos, charged 7,000 for a package that included 10,000 extra photos. I was shocked at the time, and I was also afraid that I would choose too many photos).
Today, the photos were fixed, and Lan Lan sent them to me. I looked at them and thought they were not good, so they immediately helped me to retake them.
I compared the photos of my sister taken before with the ones I took now, and I think our photos are really satisfying. They are simple and fresh, just the style I wanted.
I sincerely recommend that everyone go to take wedding photos at Xianhan Jin Furen!
Package price: 3999 yuan
Mrs. Jin is grateful for your sincere wishes for your happiness and prosperity. May your future be as bright as brocade!
How much is this set?
What conditions must the $32 meet in order to be used
That's good, no need to refund
Your rider says he can't find it
Can't find
But I can't understand what he's saying in English.
This article is for you to know which Omega mechanical watch is better?
How good is the Omega mechanical watch?
1. Swiss OmegaOMEGA碟飞系列情侣对表，自动机械男表，石英女表
Recommendation: The tradition of Switzerland, the time art is in the wrist, Omega elegant and simple, not dazzling but very attractive, can be worn for commuting and formal occasions.
The couple style expresses the sweet love between the two, and is always by each other's side, and the exquisite pointer makes people feel infatuated.
No price available
2, Swiss OMEGA (OMEGA) stainless steel bracelet automatic mechanical watches for men and women, model 424.10.0.20.02.002/27.60.55.001
Recommended reason: Swiss made, must be a masterpiece, Omega watch, thin and elegant gold watch, couple's watch, which can show the noble identity and also show the sweet love.
The pointer scale design makes the time scale more clear, and the blue dial adopts the popular blue dial. The overall design is simple and clear.
The brand Omega has a steel bracelet, a blue dial, a mechanical movement (automatic), a waterproof function of 30 meters, a pointer display type, a national after-sales service, a steel case, a 39.5mm men's watch, a 27.4mm women's watch, a 20mm bracelet size, a butterfly type clasp, a sapphire glass artificial blue, with 3 reviews and a 100% positive rating.
3. Swiss Omega OMEGA Butterfly series couple's watch for men automatic mechanical quartz 424.10.37.20.01.001/24.60.01.001
Recommendation: Swiss-made, quality benchmark, this Omega watch uses a high-precision movement, the couple's design is simple and elegant, the flow of time from the edge of the hour hand, always moving forward at a steady pace, suitable for business people to wear, releasing the charm of the wrist.
4, Swiss OMEGA watches, DePuy series, automatic mechanical watches, men's watches, fashionable women's quartz watches, couple's watches, a pair of watches
Omega couple watches, pair of watches, deposit
Recommendation: Imported from Switzerland, it is naturally of excellent quality. Omega is elegant and simple, not flashy but very attractive, suitable for both commuting and formal occasions.
Fashionable and elegant, with a sense of beauty, and the needle's jump, I see your heart beat like the first time.
The watch is made of stainless steel, the movement is mechanical (automatic), the clasp type is folding, the waterproof function is 30 meters, the dial size for men is 39.5cm and for women is 27.4cm, the display type is pointer, the warranty is nationwide, the interface type is flat interface, the material of the watch band is stainless steel, the dial color is white, the brand is Omega, the interface size is 18mm, and the watch glass is artificial blue sapphire crystal glass. There are currently more than 20+ people who have evaluated it, and it has a 100% positive rating.
So, I'm going to return the curry base to you?
I only received half
There were six boxes that I didn't see a delivery for
The company's overtime, there is no lunch, want to order take-out, who knows will be cancelled the order
You are Zheng Min, and this is your second week in Japan.
You are walking down the street and suddenly someone is following you. You start to run faster and faster until you run away.
The person behind you called out, "Miss! Please wait!" (Full Japanese dialogue) You stopped at the convenience store entrance.
"Miss... I am a director, and I think you are very beautiful. Would you like to participate in a reality show?"
You're confused, afraid it's a scam.
He gave you a business card, and you found out that he was a director of a large entertainment company in Japan.
"If you have time, we can go to the company to talk, the remuneration will definitely not be low."
He came to the company in a hurry, and said that he saw you on the street at first sight and hoped that you would come to participate.
You thought you would not lose anything and could still make money, so you signed the contract.
It is a large-scale love reality show, divided into two parts.
The early stage will allow celebrities and ordinary people to interact in real life, and cultivate mutual understanding.
Later, they will enter the game together to complete the dungeon.
Next week is the official start of recording, and you don't know who your partner will be or what interesting things will happen.
So, can the system see new orders?
So what would happen to that rider?
I think I can't accept that the order hasn't been delivered after waiting for 20 minutes.
3200 newborn babies in Shaba have no birth certificates due to the shortage of special anti-counterfeiting paper
(11th of September, 2019) The National Registration Department of Sabah said that due to the use of special anti-counterfeiting paper, it has been unable to issue birth certificates to newborn babies since the beginning of October, and the cumulative number of affected people has reached 3,200.
However, the director of the bureau, Keriaminus, promised that all babies who have applied for birth certificates will have their information recorded in the system, and they will be issued after the anti-counterfeiting paper arrives next week.
He explained at a press conference that the report on the printing problem of Sabah newspapers lasted for more than 10 months, which was reported by a media outlet.
He said the issue has been around for two months and Sarawak is also facing the same problem.
"One reason is that Chinese manufacturers who produce customized anti-counterfeiting paper were affected by the epidemic, resulting in delays in delivery to China."
He explained that the paper used for the Sabah newspaper is different from that used in other states, and therefore cannot be borrowed from other states.
Kaluaminu revealed that the latest batch of anti-counterfeit paper arrived in Kuala Lumpur on the 6th of this month and was handed over to the printing company on the 8th for partial printing work.
"The office will send someone to pick up the goods in Kuala Lumpur next Thursday, and then print the final stage in Sabah immediately, and it is estimated that it will take two working days (December 20) to deliver it to the applicant. "
"We will notify applicants to go to the local branch to collect the admission papers. "
He added that Sabah has issued 24,801 birth certificates this year.
From 7 o'clock in the morning to now
Is that about to happen?
I mean food
I'm across the street from #PRS_ORG
Well, thank you, because the restaurant said it was ready.
Commentator of the People's Daily: "14th Five-Year Plan" has a good start - - on learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11, 2020 - People's Daily commentator article on December 12, 2020: "14th Five-Year Plan" has a good start - - on the topic of learning and implementing the spirit of the Central Economic Work Conference
"Achieved a good start to the 14th Five-Year Plan" and highly evaluated the achievements of China's economic and social development in the past year at the Central Economic Work Conference held from December 8 to 10.
General Secretary Xi Jinping delivered an important speech at the meeting, deeply summarizing the economic work in 2021, analyzing the current economic situation in depth, and making a major deployment for the economic work in 2022, so as to prepare for the economic work next year and welcome the successful convening of the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China. He pointed out the direction forward and provided fundamental principles.
We solemnly celebrate the 100th anniversary of the founding of the Communist Party of China, officially announce the completion of the construction of a moderately prosperous society and the realization of the first centenary goal, and open a new journey towards the second centenary goal.
We held the 19th National Congress of the Communist Party of China, summed up the major achievements and historical experience of the century-long struggle of the Party, passed the third historical resolution of the Communist Party of China on the major achievements and historical experience of the century-long struggle of the Party, which is a political declaration for new era Chinese Communist Party members to remember their original mission and adhere to and develop socialism with Chinese characteristics, and is an action guide for realizing the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
Over the past year, the world has witnessed a once-in-a-century global change and the COVID-19 pandemic has spread worldwide. The external environment has become more complex and severe, and the tasks of epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development in China are extremely heavy and arduous.
With Comrade Xi Jinping as the core of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of China, the Party Central Committee adheres to the overall coordination of domestic and international affairs, adheres to the overall principle of seeking progress while maintaining stability, and calmly responds to the great changes of the century and the century-long epidemic. It integrates epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, accelerates the construction of a new development pattern, strengthens macro-policy cross-cycle adjustment, and strives to promote economic sustainable and healthy development. It strives to deepen reform and opening up and innovation, and strives to complete the arduous task of reform and development. The Party and the country have achieved new major achievements.
The “14th Five-Year Plan” has achieved a good start, and an important aspect is that a new step has been taken to build a new development pattern, and new achievements have been made in high-quality development.
China's economic development and epidemic prevention and control have maintained a global leading position, with the characteristics of strong resilience, great potential, and strong momentum. The country's strategic scientific and technological strength is accelerating, and major innovative achievements are emerging one after another. The technological innovation capacity is continuously improved, and the breakthrough of key and core technologies is achieved. The resilience of the industrial chain has been improved, and the foreign trade volume has increased in quality and quantity, and the structure has continued to optimize. The new driving force represented by new industries and new business models is growing and flourishing. The reform and opening-up is advancing in depth, and efforts are made to break through the constraints of supply and demand matching and the flow of factors, and a new competitive advantage is created through high-level opening to the outside world. The guarantee of people's livelihood is strong and effective, and the employment scale continues to expand, and the income of residents is growing in line with the growth of the economy. China has maintained grain output of over 1.3 billion tons for seven consecutive years, winning the "18 Consecutive Harvests" award. Ecological civilization construction continues to advance, carbon peak and carbon neutrality work are coordinated, the pace of green and low
These achievements are the result of the strong leadership of the Central Committee of the Party with Comrade Xi Jinping at its core, the result of Xi Jinping’s new era of socialism with Chinese characteristics, and the result of the concerted and arduous efforts of the whole party and the whole nation.
Practice once again proves that the Party has established Xi Jinping Thought on the Party Central Committee as the core and the core of the whole party, and has established the guiding position of Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for the New Era, which is of great significance to the development of the Party and the country in the new era and to the advancement of the historical process of the great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation.
With Xi Jinping as the core and the core of the whole party, with Xi Jinping Thought on Socialism with Chinese Characteristics for the New Era as the scientific guidance, with the whole party, the whole nation, and all ethnic groups united as one, and with the whole party, the whole nation, and all ethnic groups striving forward with unswerving determination, we will definitely be able to overcome all kinds of difficulties and obstacles, and create a new era of glory and forge a new historical achievement in the new journey of building a modern socialist country.
The 20th National Congress of the Party will be held next year, which is a major event in the political life of the Party and the country.
Promote the great spirit of the founding of the party, adhere to the general tone of seeking progress while maintaining stability, fully and accurately implement the new development concept, accelerate the construction of a new development pattern, comprehensively and deeply deepen reform and opening up, adhere to innovation-driven development, promote high-quality development, adhere to the main line of supply-side structural reform, coordinate epidemic prevention and control and economic and social development, and coordinate development and security, and continue to do a good job in "six stabilities" and "six guarantees", and continue to improve people's livelihood, and strive to maintain macroeconomic stability, keep the economy running within a reasonable range, maintain social stability, and we will definitely be able to maintain a stable and healthy economic environment, a stable and prosperous social environment, and a political environment that is clean and pure, to welcome the successful convening of the 20th National Congress of the Communist Party of China.
Let us further tighten our unity around the Party Central Committee led by Comrade Xi Jinping, strengthen the “four consciousnesses” and the “four confidence”, achieve the “two guarantees”, continuously improve our political judgment, political insight, and political execution ability, and implement the Party Central Committee’s decision and deployment in practice, and continuously advance the cause of socialism with Chinese characteristics in the new era.
So I re-ordered with points, thank you
Where is the self-addressed envelope?
I can't see the address
Download the SuNing YiGou APP
Follow the Suning.com public account
Save money, share profits
Download the SuNing Financial APP
Follow the service account of Suning E-commerce
It is very convenient and the same as opening a computer to solve the problem of insufficient hard disk on my computer.
The new solid-state mobile hard drive I just got today cannot be read by the mobile solid-state hard drive computer, and the mobile solid-state hard drive computer cannot be recognized, but the U disk computer can be read.
The machine is very light and easy to handle, with a stylish and elegant appearance.
I used it for a whole day and the heat dissipation was very good. I didn't feel any pain and the running speed was very fast. It can kill 99% of users at startup.
The battery is also very powerful, and it should have no problem using it for 4 hours with 9 hours of standby time. In short, this price can buy a machine of this quality, and I feel very happy. Other functions and so on will be added later.
The appearance is very good.
In terms of performance, we will evaluate after a period of time.
The machine is fast, bigger than expected, and the rendering effect is very good. I like it. I will review it after using it for a while.
It's good, and the serial number of the machine was found in Hong Kong. The quality should be OK.
**It doesn't feel big, but it is heavy. One hand can't hold it, and it is actually bigger than 15.6 inches. It runs very stable, and I don't feel any lag. The sound of the fan is very nice, and it feels very good. It will not spin like a game console.
The goods are good and cheaper than the official flagship store, and they also sent a backpack. I think it is very good.
The store service is also good, reminding me to update the BIOS and promptly opened the **.
Worth it!
Heat dissipation: The heat dissipation is very good, and the temperature is basically zero. Lightness and thinness: It is convenient to carry. Appearance material: The traditional design of Thinkpad is satisfactory.
The seller has a good reputation, carefully checks the appearance of the whole machine, all interfaces, no refurbished or used traces, and is indeed a brand new US version, with the same configuration as the page.
Forgot to pack the backpack, and immediately helped me to pack a backpack, although it was not the original factory backpack, but the service follow-up was enough to prove that it was a conscience seller.
If a friend needs to buy a notebook, let them buy it again.
The appearance material: The appearance is atmospheric, and the effect of display is that the screen resolution can be displayed, clear, and the degree of thinness is relatively thick, after all, the heavier things feel better.
Heat dissipation effect: I tried it at first, and I will evaluate it later.
The keyboard is very good to type on, and it also comes with a mouse and a converter. This configuration is more cost-effective than the domestic one, and overall, it's a good deal. As for the machine's performance, I'll wait until I've used it for a while before making a review.
This screen is so relaxing!
It is very easy to use, and it will take some time to review it!
Education information: Beijing compressed the proportion of 2016 early middle school entrance special talents - Xinhua News Agency
On the 21st and 22nd, the entrance examination for middle school special talents in Beijing was unified organized by each district education committee.
This year, all districts in Beijing have compressed the proportion of special-admitted students, and the competition for special-admitted students has become more fierce.
For example, in Dongcheng District, the proportion of primary school students admitted to junior high school with special talents in this year is generally less than 5% of the total number of enrollments in the district, and the number of planned enrollments is 380 people. The admission rate is generally less than 10% of the number of enrollments in the school.
Students with sports, art, and technology talents and who have registered online are all eligible to participate in the special entrance examination.
In order to facilitate students to participate in the examination nearby, the Dongcheng District continued the examination arrangement method of last year and set up 1-2 examination sites in each school, with a total of 13 examination sites.
The examination points are divided into examination rooms according to the examination areas, and the examination time is divided into time slots according to hours. On the day of the examination, students will enter the examination rooms in different examination areas according to the time slots to take the examination.
On May 23, the online list of students who passed the district education enrollment examination was announced, and students can check their exam results online.
Can it be delivered in 10 to 15 minutes?
No food received
The key is that I didn't eat tonight.
If it doesn't arrive, you can say it earlier
Bosnia Olympic Committee chairman: firmly believes that China has the ability to hold the Winter Olympics in a special period - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Sarajewo, December 11 - The president of the Bosnian Olympic Committee, Kvesic, recently said that the Bosnians are looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics and believe that China has the ability to hold a successful Winter Olympics during this special period.
The Chinese ambassador to Bosnia and Herzegovina, Qi Ping, met with the president of the Bosnian Olympic Committee, Kvesic, at the Olympic Center in Sarajevo yesterday.
When meeting, Kwieciszewski praised the relations between Poland and China and said that he had visited China in 2008 during the Beijing Summer Olympics and was deeply impressed by the excellent organization work of the Chinese side. He believed that China had the ability to hold a successful Winter Olympics during the special period. The Polish side was looking forward to the Beijing Winter Olympics and the Polish Olympic Committee was actively organizing the event. The Polish side hoped to use this opportunity to further expand exchanges and cooperation in the field of sports with China.
Ji Ping said that China and the United States have a special "Olympic bond."
The 1984 Winter Olympics in Sarajevo was successfully held here, and two months later, the 2022 Beijing Winter Olympics will open, presenting a simple, safe and wonderful grand event to the world.
The Chinese Embassy in Bosnia and Herzegovina hopes to deepen exchanges and cooperation in the preparation of winter sports competitions, athlete training and other aspects, and will continue to play the role of a bridge to promote the deepening of cultural and people-to-people exchanges between the two countries, and let the people of the two countries “move towards the future”, and wish the Bosnian athletes to achieve good results in the Beijing Winter Olympics.
Before the meeting, the Bosnia and Herzegovina Olympic Committee held the "Best Athlete of the Year" award ceremony, and as a special guest, Jiping presented the award to the best young athlete in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The video of the Beijing 2022 Winter Olympics was played in a loop at the activity site.
Disappointing
Will they refund me?
Not satisfied is not good! The delivery fee is 20 yuan
There's no way! I'll ask that restaurant
Thanks for following up, of course some riders did a great job
Chocolate Lover's Cookbook [FR] by Dominique Ansel, Translated by Miao Xiaoxia, Shanghai Science and Technology Press【Original book, full discount】
The original book supports seven-day no-reason return
The grandmother's New Year's Eve said that learning to sing the twenty-four solar terms, seeing the distant mountains in the cold winter, grandpa is a stupid child, my grandmother lives in the weird town of Guli, and the dumplings and the soup dumplings are a piece of chocolate, 2022.
Nola Book: The original "Crying Chocolate", "The Thief's Little Handwriting", Zhang Qiusheng's original first, second and third grade, the original classic story book set, children's literature, primary school out-of-school book works
【Jia Ying Finance Book】2022 Great Reading Small Forest Hundred Class Thousand People Second Grade Grandma's New Year's Eve One Block of Chocolate Twenty-Four Solar Terms Grandpa Is a Stupid Child My Grandma Lives in Guli Weird Town Dumplings and Soup
The Nora Book: The original Charles and the Great Glass Elevator by Roald Dahl, a collection of children's literature for 7-9-12 year olds, including the sequel to Charlie and the Chocolate Factory.
The 13 volumes of the great fox father, the chocolate factory of Charlie, the collection of works of Roald Dahl, the children's reading story book, the 9-12 years old, the second and fifth grade of elementary school, the non-phonetic version of the Matilda
The terrifying science series consists of 72 volumes, the classic mathematics series consists of 12 volumes, the classic science new knowledge, the natural exploration, the electric shock, the chocolate secrets, the important mathematics, the 3rd, 4th, 5th and 6th grade supplementary reading books.
Some books are sold at a higher price than the original price, and it is recommended to be cautious when bidding.
Chocolate in the office: Seven tips for work and happiness (German) by Weisthun, translated by Chen Bao, published by Yunnan Science and Technology Publishing House [Original book, full discount].
【Fast invoice, order tickets, high-quality after-sales, support 7-day no reason to return or exchange】
The Norla Book: The original six volumes, Zhuqing said, a hundred classes, a thousand people, a two-year extra-curricular book, a piece of chocolate, grandpa is a stupid child who says that he learned to sing the twenty-four solar terms, saw distant mountains in winter, and drew a picture of my grandmother's dumplings.
The Nora Book Series is a set of 8 books including Little Monster Ulaala, Natural History for Beginners, Exploring the Chocolate Factory, Transforming Vehicles, Luggage Transporting Adventure, Picture Storybooks for 3-4-5-6 year olds
Nola Books is a genuine book, you don't understand coffee + wine + bread + chocolate + tea, baking, cooking, tasting, making, appreciating, food lovers, food culture, the book is interesting, informative and fashionable life encyclopedia.
The White Bread Children's Book Award is suitable for primary school students from grades 3 to 5, story books, summer and winter vacation reading books, and extra-curricular reading books.
【Nola Books】The original 3-volume French blue-ray dessert encyclopedia, the chocolate dessert class, the world's top pastry chefs' creative works, the 100-recipe beginner's guide to making desserts from scratch, and the complete guide to making desserts from scratch.
The Nora Book - 3 books, a complete set of works by Roald Dahl, including Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Matilda, and The BFG, for children aged 6-12 who enjoy reading children's literature.
Hello, I've been waiting for this order for a long time
Continuously delayed
Thank you
Please help me cancel, each order needs to be re-ordered
He needs to order, then I'll have credit?
Is it possible that I missed this order?
How much can I send?
It's impossible
The code includes four $20 off discounts
#NAME# said to help me re-order
I was charged again for the same amount when I re-ordered
But I placed my order at 1:30.
48-hour negative nucleic acid test, set up “buffer zone ” and the National Health Commission issued a requirement to strengthen the border city epidemic prevention and control - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 11 (Reporter Dong Ruifeng and Gu Tiancheng) The State Council's Joint Prevention and Control Mechanism recently issued a notice on strengthening the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in border cities, requiring that personnel leaving land border cities (excluding those connected to Hong Kong and Macao) within the next 48 hours must hold a negative nucleic acid detection certificate, and personnel arriving at land border cities must perform at least one nucleic acid test upon arrival.
According to the notice, the time range for the above requirements is from the date of determining the port city range and announcing it, to March 15, 2022.
In addition, the notice also proposed that under certain conditions, coastal cities can study setting up a buffer zone for epidemic prevention and control within their jurisdiction.
According to a representative of the National Health Commission's Disease Prevention and Control Bureau, for some border cities, cross-border trade is the main economic pillar of the local economy, and both sides of the border frequently travel back and forth.
Implementing differentiated management policies, from a single line of defense to two lines of defense, is expected to move the checkpoint forward, compress the risk of the spread of the epidemic, and achieve the maximum effect of epidemic prevention and control with the minimum social impact and minimum social cost.
Recently, there have been a number of domestic cluster outbreaks in China, all of which were imported through the border cities.
The notice pointed out that there were some problems such as the lack of timeliness of epidemic monitoring and early warning, the lack of implementation of closed-loop management for high-risk personnel, the formality of regular nucleic acid testing, the lack of effective disinfection in each link of cold chain items, the lack of standardization in the management of centralized isolation places, and the lack of scientific and accurate emergency response to the epidemic.
The notice requires to focus on nine aspects, such as improving the epidemic prevention and control mechanism of the port city, perfecting the epidemic monitoring and early warning system, and implementing border control measures, etc., to quickly fill the gaps and weaknesses in the prevention and control of port cities, and do not relax, do scientific and accurate prevention and control work, and tighten the defense line of external input prevention and control.
The notice stressed that all cities along the coast should study and deploy the prevention and control of the epidemic and people's livelihood work synchronously, publish and open the people's livelihood hotline regularly, and regularly check and solve the potential hidden dangers in the supply and price of basic necessities, and timely solve and actively respond to the prominent problems reflected by the masses.
According to the notice, the mentioned port cities include the counties (cities, districts, banners) where the open land, water and air ports are located, as well as the cities (provinces, autonomous regions, municipalities) where they are located, and the specific scope is determined by each province (autonomous region, municipality) according to the needs of epidemic prevention and control and announced in a timely manner.
Color: As shown in the picture (color difference is inevitable in shooting, the color closest to the color in the picture will explain, external light will cause the clothing color to become brighter, please consult in advance before purchasing)
This item is vintage, and the first time you buy vintage, please search for "vintage" or "vintage" on Baidu.
Lonely.
There will inevitably be minor flaws in vintage single items, so if you decide to buy vintage products, you should have this in mind. If you are a perfectionist, I will explain the more obvious flaws. This is a characteristic of vintage products, and I think that good things are not affected by a few minor flaws!
The store does not accept returns or exchanges on its vintage products.
The term "vintage" refers to a design with a retro feel, which is nostalgia, and the reason why people like vintage clothing is because of its age and texture!
So if you can't control your temper, don't say that the clothes are old-fashioned. You can only say that you are not suitable!
There is no point in being risk-averse when shopping online, as there are risks involved. It is important to be careful when shopping online.
If the items are not suitable for the buyer due to personal reasons such as not liking them, etc., they can be placed on the shelves of the store owners. Once they are sold, they cannot be returned or exchanged, and please do not take photos. Thank you for your cooperation!
On June 11, 2021, a part of the circle was sold out.
Pay attention to the number of orders, and antiques are non-refundable and non-exchangeable.
Buying instructions
All products sold in the store are non-refundable and non-returnable.
Please spend a few minutes to read the purchase notice
The store's products are photographed in real life, and there may be some color differences due to the display screen and lighting problems. Please see clearly before buying, consider carefully before buying, and color differences are not accepted as reasons for returns or exchanges.
The store does not accept the reasons of return and exchange for different styles and styles that are not in line with the imagination.
The sizes are all measured in real life, and there must be some error, but we believe that the error is very small, and if you receive the wrong size, it is not possible to return or exchange it, so we must consider it carefully before ordering.
If you have any problems, please contact me as soon as possible. I will try my best to solve them, and if there are malicious reviews, I will report them to the end.
We will carefully check every item before it is sent out, and the quality will not be compromised.
Please confirm receipt within 48 hours and give us a rating. Our hard work is appreciated.
Oil pipeline video exposes US military's 20-year bloodlust - Xinhua News Agency
(Video source: YouTube)
On December 11, a micro-documentary named "Killing Machine" was widely concerned.
The film tells the story of the United States, under the pretext of "anti-terrorism", launching a war in Afghanistan, forcing the output of American democracy through war, 20 years of poverty, bloodlust, and killing the innocent, committing countless crimes against humanity.
Using drones to bomb hospitals, schools, and other civilian places, twisting human nature, and forming a killing squad.
In the past 20 years, the US military has killed tens of thousands of innocent civilians in Afghanistan.
The US military set up a "black jail" to torture and humiliate "criminals."
The spate of anti-human crimes has sparked more hatred among Afghans.
As the video says, the "anti-terrorist" war in the United States is "getting more and more dangerous."
War has not brought peace, democracy, prosperity, and hope to the Afghan people. It has only brought a country in ruins and countless killings and destruction.
Click the video to let us together expose the truth behind America's "anti-terrorism" bloodbath in the name of "anti-terrorism," and pierce through the hypocrisy of American democracy!
I accidentally saw the following article, from the perspective of business and preservation period, why this customer wants to use the logistics company in the bonded area to pack the cans, although the cans belong to deep processing and do not belong to the scope of operation of the bonded logistics company, here is the text of the article that may explain why the customer wants to do this.
I visited many milk powder factories and saw many milk powder production lines.
In fact, the ingredients of powdered milk in pouches and cans are the same, and there is no difference.
So, everyone will ask: Why is the shelf life of the bag one year, while the shelf life of the hearing aid is two years or longer?
Or again: Why is the price difference between hearing aids and hearing aids so great?
In fact, many consumers or mothers think that this is because the raw materials are different, and the quality will be much better.
In fact, the raw materials are the same, but everyone thinks that the good ones are expensive.
There are also consumers who say that after eating, they say that the taste or smell is different!
Now I'll tell you the reason why we are expensive, where are we expensive?
Why is the price difference so great when their raw materials are the same?
Because most of the manufacturers consider that if the packaging price is too high, consumers will not accept it, which means that the profit of the manufacturers is low or even no profit, then how can the manufacturers survive?
So they have a very large increase in price to ensure their profit space.
Therefore, most manufacturers promote hearing protection rather than earplugs.
There are many manufacturers who spend tens of millions or even hundreds of millions on advertising every year. Where does this money come from?
Of course, everyone can imagine.
As society develops, the promotion cost of the market, such as the promotion personnel in the shopping mall, the display cost in the shopping mall, the gift cost of the product, and the advertising cost, are constantly increasing.
Therefore, each factory is constantly adding new products, and the prices are also constantly rising. This is a new product that is produced as the market fee increases.
The main purpose is to obtain higher profits, and the cost of their raw materials will not be more than 3 or 4 yuan.
There are also some brands that, in order to promote their own products, do not hesitate to hook up with doctors in the hospital, and help them promote the products, from 30 yuan to 80 yuan or more in profit.
And the relevant laws in China are absolutely not allowed to do this kind of operation method, in fact, this kind of behavior is harmful to consumers.
It is recommended that people buy powdered milk in bags at home, so that they can save money and increase the preservation and sealing of powdered milk, and have no effect on children.
Don't think that the shelf life of packaged food is longer than that of unpackaged food just because it is packaged. If the shelf life of packaged food and unpackaged food is the same after opening, it is just that packaged food is more difficult to preserve after opening and is more prone to changes in quality due to moisture.
The food was late, and the food was cold. After it was cold, it was dry and hard, and it was impossible to eat.
And the soup spilled out of the bowl.
It was immediately cancelled, and the #PRS_ORG items sent in by the #PRS_ORG must have cooled by now.
I didn't get it!
#NAME# says you didn't have anyone to take it.
We've been on the phone.
If you don't refund my money, I'll report you to the police.
Repeatedly using #PRS_ORG#, today's experience was the worst
It can't be accepted at all
Okay, I can.
But it also reminds restaurants and riders
to prevent it from happening again
I want to know the exact delivery time.
The time kept getting delayed
I don't know when
Can I get my money back if I cancel the order?
How do I pay the service fee for the rider?
One hour ago, it was confirmed that there was one rider.
I'm not willing to wait any longer
Don't scare people off the starting line - Xinhua News Agency
When browsing bookstores, one can often feel the fire of success books.
Today's success books often preach the "best principles" - that is, they first assume or imply that you can "do it" and then tell you what you need to do "to do it."
That is to say, one has bypassed the most important and fundamental link of "how to do it".
That's why these books all have a common characteristic - either they do it all in one go, or they don't do anything at all; either they're 100 or they're 0; either you climb Mount Tai, or you just stay where you are.
This "best principle" makes everyone recognize that it is "absolutely correct", but 99% of people will be scared to death before the starting line.
Because this theory advocates a path of "you need to make a decision and start over, and make a 180-degree turn," which is exactly the fatal weakness of many people.
For those who are rigid in their ways, stuck in their ways, and refuse to change, you have to shout "you need to change" in their ears, which is self-deception and playing the fool.
Most people will be afraid of the word "transformation" in front of them, and will not dare to take a step forward, and it is difficult to make a decision; or they will make a decision to take the word "transformation" and bravely take the first step, but it is often short-lived, and it is difficult to maintain it for a long time.
Ma Sanli's famous "From Tomorrow" is a classic that vividly portrays the universal human nature.
The biggest problem with "best practices" is that the threshold is too high, and it often exceeds the limits of ordinary people, making most people "look up in admiration."
Perhaps, the "second-best principle" is a way to let more ordinary people walk on the road of relative success.
The core of the "second best principle" is "lowering the threshold" - it encourages a "small victory is better than none" theory, that is, if you can't do 100, doing 1 is okay: because 1 is always greater than 0; if you can't climb Mount Tai, just climb the small sand hill by your house, because that's always better than standing still.
In short, if you do something, it's always better than not doing anything.
With the lowered threshold, there are more opportunities for ordinary people to persevere, and the success probability will also increase as long as one perseveres.
However, the success path that follows the "second-best principle" is slightly longer.
In summary, although the "best principle" sounds like a flag for everyone to succeed, it ultimately can only motivate a few people; while the "second-best principle" can effectively motivate more people and benefit as many people as possible.
Do I need to re-order now?
The phone was not answered.
It kept getting delayed.
Not yet delivered
When will it be delivered?
How can I contact you?
Please cancel the order
I can't wait any longer, thank you
He missed two meals, but one order was completed.
I just wanted to ask, how do you get in touch with the rider?
The first rider told me that there should be another rider to send.
The amount of naked carp resources in Qinghai Lake has increased by 0.71 million tons this year - Xinhua News Agency
According to a report from Xinhua News Agency in Xining, Qinghai on December 11 (reporter Luo Xiaofei and Zhang Hongxiang), the latest monitoring results show that the amount of bare carp resources in Qinghai Lake has increased by 0.71 million tons this year, reaching 10.85 million tons, which has increased by more than 40 times compared with the initial protection period in 2002.
The Qinghai Lake naked carp is a rare and precious fish species in Qinghai Lake. It plays an important role in maintaining the safety and biodiversity of the "water-fish-bird" ecological chain in the Qinghai Lake basin.
In the 1960s and 1970s of the 20th century, the number of naked carp in Qinghai Lake was sharply reduced due to factors such as the large-scale killing of humans, the breeding of naked carp in the water environment, and the deterioration of the aquatic environment. In 2002, the resource storage capacity of naked carp in Qinghai Lake was only 2592 tons.
In 2004, Qinghai Lake naked carp was listed as an endangered species in the Chinese Species Red List.
Since 2003, Qinghai Province has implemented a ban on fishing in Qinghai Lake and its main tributaries, prohibiting any unit, collective or individual from fishing for naked carp in Qinghai Lake and its main tributaries, and prohibiting the sale of naked carp and its products.
At the same time, through artificial breeding and release, and the cleaning of the main inflow rivers of Qinghai Lake, and the design of scientific and reasonable "fish passage" and other measures, the protection efforts have been continuously increased, and the resources of the naked carp in Qinghai Lake have been increasing year by year.
Yang Lin, deputy director of the Department of Agriculture and Rural Affairs of Qinghai Province, introduced that as of now, more than 1.8 billion fingerlings have been artificially bred and released into Qinghai Lake, which has contributed more than 23% to the restoration of Qinghai Lake carp resources.
The Qinghai-Tibet Plateau is an important ecological barrier and water source conservation area in China and even Asia, and Qinghai Lake is a natural barrier and ecological function area that controls the spread of desertification in the west to the east.
In order to protect the ecological environment of the Three Rivers Source and Qinghai Lake waters, protect aquatic wild animals and maintain the biodiversity of the Qinghai-Tibet Plateau, since this year, Qinghai has successively issued notices on the prohibition of fishing in the key waters of the Yangtze River, the Yellow River and Qinghai Lake, and built a “one river, one river, one lake” comprehensive fishing ban management system.
I used my #PRS_ORG# RED credit card to spend more than $180 on food.
But the order did not deduct $20
The original software is free to try, and the computer and mobile phone are used, and the paperless version is used.
2022 Leaf South's 《高级英汉翻译理论与实践》(第2版)笔记和考研真题详解/硕士研究生考试大纲 辅导教材 复习资料 入学考试
2022 Leaf Modern Television News Notes and Homework (Including Typical Questions) Detailed Explanation/Master's Degree Examination Outline Tutoring Material Review Material Entrance Examination Questions
The official mobile photography tutorial, the photography composition tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial, the mobile photography tutorial,
High-quality books, original guarantee, high-quality service, prompt delivery, worry-free after-sales.
Red Hat Linux System Administration Guide (CD-ROM)
The King of Animal Novels Shen Shixi has a collection of books: Tiger Baby Golden Leaves [Please contact customer service for group purchase]
The information of the books is collected and uploaded by the software. If there is any error, please refer to the actual book. Please do not take photos if you are interested.
If you have any questions, please contact our online customer service!
The restaurant only gave me one bag, and I had to put it in the bag, and it was cold outside
I'm wondering if the take-out is in a bag?
We only saw one bag
Wondering if it was an oversight or if someone took it, thanks
It has been one hour, and it has not been delivered.
I just read a long article about how to write fake examples.
For those who don't know, here's some information.
Most girls experience their first period at some point between the ages of 13 and 15, and will stop menstruating around the age of 50.
After that, the body will be more regular to come once a month, under the premise of physical health.
But it is not regular enough to be accurately predicted, and there is about a week's tolerance, which needs to be prepared in advance. Sometimes the luck is bad and it will flip over (suddenly a few days in advance).
The length, duration, and severity of menstrual cramps vary from person to person. Some people experience them for three days, while others for a week; some people have little or no bleeding, while others have heavy bleeding; some people have no reaction, while others are in so much pain that they need to be taken to the hospital by ambulance. The severity of menstrual cramps can change over time, and it's not necessarily a sign that you'll never have them again if you don't experience them now.
Periods cannot be controlled, and there is blood for 24 hours from the beginning to the end. The only thing that can be done is to use sanitary napkins or sanitary towels to suck blood to prevent it from soaking into clothes, chairs, etc.
Menstrual cramps are mainly caused by the secretion of prostaglandins, and it is effective to relieve the pain of the month when the menstrual cramps have not started. After the menstrual cramps start, it is of no use to take ibuprofen.
Before the period, due to the excessive release of progesterone and the accumulation of blood in the uterus, it is easy to have diarrhea.
If you're around the time of your cycle, you'll probably get a period within two days.
The sanitary pad should be changed once every 2-3 hours, otherwise it is easy to breed bacteria. In addition to the sleeping time, the worst situation is to change it 6 times a day, which is 7 days a month, that is, 42 pieces. If you add the extra ones prepared in advance, there may be 50 pieces, which is not used every month.
(Here, sanitary towels do not need to be changed frequently, about five or six hours, the longest eight hours)
Hormonal changes during the menstrual cycle may cause mood swings, and hormonal changes during ovulation may also cause mood swings, which is very bad for your body.
But the official crime rate data shows that women have a high ability to control their emotions and will not use emotional issues as an excuse.
Menses is not just blood, it includes the shedding of the uterine lining.
The endometrium is the thinnest after the menstrual period, and it gradually thickens afterwards, which can be understood as the uterus being like a house. Every month, a new house is built (the endometrium thickens) to welcome guests. However, the guests do not come, so everything is demolished (menstruation occurs) and a new house is built the next month.
Menstruation is very inconvenient, and has been for several decades, with 24-hour blood flow for several days every month, and abdominal pain and back pain. Who would want to do this?
But people can be born because of his mother's menstruation. Menstruation is to prepare a house for you to live in for 10 months when you first come to this world. We should thank our mothers for their regular and healthy menstruation.
Many things for women have been suppressed in the past, and society has brainwashed women to think that it is dirty, shameful, and everyone thinks that is the way it is, but times have changed.
If someone thinks menstruation is disgusting, thinks that the female body is disgusting for preparing for life, should not say it out loud in public, girls should stand up, don't think about it anymore, they have never experienced it, they will never experience it, and they don't understand men at all. They should not be ungrateful and forgetful of their mothers. How can they face their mothers with such an attitude, and how can they want their own children?
Finally, try the sanitary pads, they are really useful.
Today is the Winter Solstice Festival, and it is disappointing to send the wrong one.
To order extra food for the children to eat
I hope that the store can check the products in the busy season
Is the foot bath basin causing electric leakage?
Choosing an appropriate foot bath can have a good effect on foot care and health. Today, the country's small editor will answer this question, hoping to help friends.
As people's awareness of health care has improved, the bathtubs have become more and more popular with consumers, and a large number of products of different levels have emerged on the market, ranging from hundreds of yuan to thousands of yuan, giving consumers a wide range of choices.
In the relevant data surface, compared with traditional home appliances, health-care home appliances such as bathtubs are selling like hot cakes, but bathtubs do not have a special industry standard, so there is a certain safety hazard.
"It's too dangerous to soak your feet in electricity!"
Mr. Li told the reporter that recently, he bought a foot bath for his father as a birthday gift, but his father felt pain in his feet when he was soaking his feet.
At first, Mr. Li thought it was the vibration function of the bathtub, but he didn't expect that after turning off the vibration function, his father still felt his feet tingling.
Mr. Li tried to use the electric pen, and the electric pen actually lit up. Mr. Li was surprised to find that the water in the bathtub was electrified.
Later, he contacted the store, and the attitude of the store was good, although he still felt dissatisfied.
Because he found that the hot tub, which has been popular for a long time, does not have a clear and detailed industry standard on how to set the highest temperature, which group of people it is suitable for, and what materials are guaranteed to be safe.
However, in general, the bathtub is not likely to have an electrical problem, but it is possible that some products are not strictly inspected at the time of manufacture.
Therefore, when purchasing, choose a partition-style bathtub.
Water and electricity separation has no safety hazards.
You can also take a pen test at any time.
The 13th Provincial Tea Expo opened - Viewpoint - Hunan Daily Net - Huasheng Online
Hunan Daily, December 10, 2019 (full media reporter Zhang Shangwu, Hu Panpan, reporter, Liu Xiaoling, photographer, Li Jian) Today, the 13th Hunan Tea Industry Expo and the New Huzhou Red Tea Promotion Conference were held at the Hunan International Convention and Exhibition Center. The exhibition of the tea industry, the innovation of tea technology, the promotion of tea culture, and the acceleration of the goal of a billion-dollar tea industry.
Vice Chairman of the National Wholesale and Retail Cooperative Federation, Hou Shunjie, and Vice Chairman of the Provincial People's Congress, Ye Hong, attended the opening ceremony.
Professor Liu Zhonghua, a fellow of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, solemnly introduced at the opening ceremony: "The source of Lake Hong is in Nanchang, and the rise of red tea has injected new vitality into the "Five Colors of Xiang Tea".
In recent years, the provincial committee and provincial government have vigorously supported the development of the tea industry, promoted the construction of the billion-dollar Xiang tea industry, and formed the development pattern of "three Xiang and four rivers and five colors of tea".
The tea industry in the province has increased innovation, and the main tea products such as green tea, black tea, and red tea have been rotated to promote the integration of tea tourism in the main producing areas, and to increase the income of the vast number of tea farmers.
The wind turns the water wheel, and red tea makes a comeback.
Experts in the tea industry in the province said that after harvesting green tea, red tea and black tea, tea farmers have income all year round, and the output value of tea gardens has been on the rise.
At the opening ceremony, provincial leaders awarded the fourth batch of enterprises that have obtained the right to use the “Hunan Red Tea” trademark with the “Hunan Red Source”.
At the New Huzhou Tea Museum, Fujian tea merchants fell in love with a high-mountain tea called “Ice in the Spring” and immediately placed an order.
Secretary-General Wang Jun of the Provincial Tea Industry Association said that the current epidemic and other factors have had some impact on the tea market, but from the tea exhibition site, there are many highlights.
The new-made red tea is red, and the connotation of the tea culture is injected. It is popular and the transaction is hot. The Xiang tea industry welcomes a new spring.
If these foods aren't hot, can they be cancelled?
I don't want it because I can't park there and he couldn't deliver it
Metaphysics is the study of questions that cannot be answered directly through perception, but through rational reasoning and logic.
Metaphysics is the basic law of philosophy, aimed at explaining the basic nature of existence and the world.
The Chinese translation of "metaphysics" comes from the "Yi Jing" (Book of Changes), which says, "Those above are called Dao, and those below are called instruments." This phrase was translated by Japanese scholar Inoue Tetsujirō (in the Meiji period) from "metaphysics."
The branch of metaphysics includes ontology, natural theology, and related issues.
Ontology is the study of "what names represent real entities, and what names only represent a concept."
Naturalism in metaphysics is the denial of the existence of God.
Its theoretical basis is that all phenomena can be explained by natural reasons, and it is proposed by philosophers who support science and evolution.
And the method of naturalism is the study method that does not believe in God.
The philosophy of mind is a branch of philosophy that studies the nature of consciousness and its relationship with the body (especially the brain).
Dualism and monism are the two main schools of thought discussing the relationship between the soul and the body.
Epistemology is a branch of philosophy that explores the nature, origin, and scope of knowledge.
Ethics is a discipline that systematically examines and studies human moral life; here, morality is defined as a set of rules that are recognized by a group of people or a culture.
It mainly consists of meta-ethics (abstractly studying the theory of ethics or the essence of criticism) and normative ethics (evaluating various different moral views and providing moral guidelines for correct or incorrect behavior.
It studies what moral behavior standards people should follow, applies ethics (the academic study of applying ethical theories to real-life situations, including biomedical ethics, political ethics, etc.), and describes ethics (collecting information about how people live and summarizing from observed styles).
It is not based on the anticipated theory of ethics, but on the investigation of actual moral agents (moral agents) who make decisions and are observed to do so in reality, which leads to all the moral factors of this decision, and it discusses the moral views held by social groups.
The history of ethics includes Greek and Roman ethics, medieval Christian ethics.
The first part: the ethical thought of humanism, represented by Voltaire and Montesquieu.
The second part: The ethical thought of the Reformation, represented by Calvin.
Part three: Political ethics, represented by figures such as Machiavelli, modern ethics (17-18th century British empiricist ethics, represented by figures such as Hume, 17-18th century continental rationalist ethics, represented by figures such as Spinoza, 18th century French Enlightenment ethics, represented by figures such as Voltaire, 18-19th century German academy ethics, represented by figures such as Kant and Hegel, 18-19th century British utilitarianism ethics, represented by figures such as Bentham and Mill, 19th century British evolutionary ethics, represented by figures such as Spencer and Huxley, 19th century and later, German new Kantian ethics, represented by figures such as Kierkegaard and Nietzsche, 19th century and later, new Hegelian ethics, represented by figures such as Thomas Hill Green).
Logic is a discipline that studies "principles and standards of valid reasoning and proof."
Logic usually consists of three parts: inductive reasoning, abductive reasoning, and deductive reasoning, which can be divided into formal logic and non-formal logic.
Aesthetics is a discipline that studies the essence and meaning of beauty.
#NUMBER# yuan has been received, which is missing food
Che, whose real name is Jiang Bao, was born in the year of the sheep and the month of the sheep. He walked on the grass of the sheep and was suitable for him. He was called Che and was known as “Sheep Uncle”.
Because of publishing works such as "Thai Strange Stories", "Indian Strange Stories", "Japanese Strange Stories", "Korean Strange Stories" and so on, he is known as a "suspense genius" in the industry, and claims to be "good at speaking nonsense in a serious manner."
"The Black Lamp," also known as "Chinese Ghost Stories," is a "suspense and horror" novel written by Yang Xingtao. With his new work, "The Black Lamp," he takes you to explore the essence of Chinese folk customs, those legends that have been passed down to the present day, and the tragic and moving love stories behind them.
"Travellers on a different path" Nan Xiaoluo and Yue Wuhua have once again opened a journey of investigation into murder, and their pasts are about to be revealed.
"The Mystery of the White Hair" whitewashed his hair, accumulated 10 million copies of best-selling books, and offered them as a tribute!
The original Chinese version of "China's Strange Stories" is the new work after "The Secret Code of the Foreigners", the same author, the same protagonist, and the continuation of the unfinished story of "Thailand's Strange Stories" and "India's Strange Stories"!
That's all he gave me, and I had to pay for a whole bottle of mayonnaise.
You call the restaurant to have it delivered.
I just don't want to go downstairs to buy things, so I spend so much money to call for delivery
Ding Zilin: To my friend.
I would like to sincerely thank all of my friends who have provided humanitarian assistance to our family over the past 30 years, especially since I made a personal appeal for humanitarian assistance in January 1994.
Nowadays, most of the deceased's old parents have passed away, and the orphans have grown up to have their own families and jobs.
It is your efforts that have helped us through the most difficult moments of our lives.
The current COVID-19 pandemic is sweeping the world, and most of the donors have already reached retirement age.
Therefore, I earnestly request that you stop giving us the hard-to-get help - the donations of the Tiananmen Mothers Group. This humanitarian aid activity should have ended long ago with a perfect ending.
I will always remember your love and believe that your deeds will be remembered in history.
Due to various reasons, I can only express my wishes in this way, and I hope my friends will understand!
Please accept my sincere blessings.
Tao said: "I would like to take this opportunity to introduce the history of 32 years of humanitarian aid by the International Federation of Chinese Students and Scholars (IFCSS) and the Minnesota Chinese Democratic Foundation (MCDF).
In the process of humanitarian relief, the American Association of Self-Reliance and the Minnesota China Democracy Foundation are parallel organizations, and the implementers of the projects often cross over.
(Apple Daily photo: The Tiananmen Mothers website is managed by a ceramics factory.) pic.twitter.com/UxID9ZGjzm
The relief funds often cannot be delivered smoothly to the hands of the victims of the June 4th Incident.
In 1994, Ding teacher suggested that a special group be established to coordinate and supervise the collection and distribution of relief funds.
In 1998, the MCDF established the "Orphan Education Fund for June 4th Victims", which was executed for 11 years. In 2009, after all the June 4th orphans graduated from university, the MCDF then established the "Special Assistance Fund for June 4th Orphans and Widows", and has been executing it ever since.
The funding for these projects comes mainly from donations made to the campus and society in 1989, from individual generous donations, and from the support of the Democracy Foundation of Tsinghua University.
Since 2018, it has also received support from the Labor Reform Research Foundation.
It was only until last year, 31 years later, that the victims of the June 4 Incident finally received a portion of the donations collected in Hong Kong in the name of the June 4 Incident.
During this period, China Human Rights also independently carried out its humanitarian relief projects.
We understand that Mr. Ding stopped the donations for June 4th, which was for the consideration of the donors, and we are also some retired seniors, our income is not as abundant as before, so we would like to express our gratitude to Mr. Ding for his letter to the donors.
We will respect the decision of the hard-to-get-along-with people and terminate the project within two years, and immediately resume it when needed.
I also express my gratitude and respect to those who have risked their lives to deliver humanitarian aid to those in need for many years.
Brand: mesobiosystem
Origin: Mainland China
Color classification: chip 1, chip 2, chip 3, chip 4, chip 5, chip 6, chip 7, chip 8, double-layer chip
Thank you for choosing our products. Please spend 5 minutes to carefully read the following content before using our chips:
Please check the goods are complete after opening.
If there is any missing information, please contact customer service in time.
The cover plate of the microfluidic chip is made of PC material, and please do not introduce solvents that may react with PC.
Do not use a hand-held syringe to directly inject the chip, otherwise it is easy to leak.
The microfluidic chips with a common base material are tested through pure water at a sampling pressure of 500mbar (100um channel depth) or 300mbar (50um channel depth) before shipment.
The chips on the glass substrate are tested at 800mbar (100um channel) before shipment, and please pay attention not to collide with sharp objects during the use of the glass substrate chip, otherwise the substrate will be damaged.
Please consider the viscosity of the solution during use and do not exceed this range, otherwise it will cause leakage.
For the ordinary base microfluidic microchip, we suggest setting the flow rate of the aqueous phase below 150ul/min and the flow rate of the oil phase below 50ul/min when using the injection pump to inject pure water.
Please consider the actual viscosity of the sample when increasing the flow rate parameter value from slow to fast.
After the experiment is completed, please clean the internal channels of the chip as soon as possible to avoid clogging.
Microfluidic chips are consumables and cannot be reused for a long time.
If the chip is damaged due to long-term use or improper operation, it will not be replaced.
If you need a microfluidic chip with higher pressure or flow rate, please contact customer service for customization.
The normal delivery cycle of chips is within one week, and the inventory has some in-stock parts that can be shipped within 24 hours after placing an order. Please consult with customer service before placing an order.
If you have any questions about how to connect our chip to the sample system, you can refer to the following link https://zhuanlan.zhihu.com/p/60474873, or search for the "Microbial Genomics" public account for more help.
You can also visit our website (www.mesobiosys.com) to download our brochure and view our full range of products.
For more information about our products, please contact our online customer service.
I'm across the street from #PRS_ORG
Hello
What is the reason for the delay in delivery?
How long will it take to get there?
Originally booked for 16:10-16:30
So I'll wait until 7:30 to see if I can get it delivered.
Where does Saint Street go?
Which street in Hong Kong leads to Saint Street?
What is the current situation of the order?
I entered it on December 12.
Therefore, this month can enjoy the discount of $20 by using the #PRS_ORG# RED credit card.
I haven't received the order, can you check if the rider is still on the way?
Hi, can you help me contact the rider and ask if he is still on the road?
I have not received an order, and there is no food in the check, and no one has contacted me to say that the order has been cancelled.
There is always take-out food downstairs, and the management office will call to ask if it is okay to let people in, but the management office has never contacted me
Design is everywhere (Recommended by the "Guide to Reading for Primary and Middle School Students" of the Ministry of Education of the People's Republic of China)
Cambridge Bilingual Level 2 Reading - Fatal Memories (Level 2 Cambridge KET - 800 words or more)
The original version of Cambridge was introduced, and the international award-winning works swept the world for twenty years, and the world's young people read it in unison, and the catalog of national primary and secondary school libraries, the compilation of teachers in key middle schools across the country, and the scanning of the QR code to listen to the English and American sound effects.
[New] A Black Book About Colors for Children Aged 3 to 6, Illustrated by Peng Yixian, with 3 to 6-Year-Old Children's Picture Books Selected for the New Reading Foundation Directory, Pre-school Children's Reading Material, Reclaiming Press Original
The new version of the official version can develop invoices, and the group purchase has a discount.
Descriptive Catalogue of the Writings of Sir Walter
【Children's and Primary School Reading Series】Design Everywhere (Included in the "Reading Guide for Middle School Students and Primary School Students") Ze Xuanran Book
A black book about colours, illustrated by Peng Yixin for children aged 3 to 6, won the Bologna Children's Book Award and was included in the New Reading Basic Directory.
【Can be voided】Original Century Witness Great Translator Danica Seleskovic Biography Autobiography Literature Biography Literature Translators and Teachers of Foreign Languages Reference Books
The original goods, the witness of the century, the great translator Danica Seleskovitch, the biography of the literature, the literature of the literature, the same voice, the language translator, the reference book of the language translator, the research publisher.
【Original Books】【Elementary and Junior High School Reading Series】Design Everywhere (Included in the "Reading Guide for Middle School Students") [Can be invoiced]
There is evidence from #PRS_ORG# to prove that I did not take it, and #PRS_ORG# falsely accused me of taking it.
I reiterate that I ordered delivery.
They did it, and you didn't take it away, and then you blamed me for taking it.
I demand that you cancel immediately or I will call the police
Time-lapse photography is not currently available
Member evaluation
[Effect] Photo effect: Took two sets of clothes, overall it's not bad. I like this set of pictures very much.
[Service] Service details: Because pregnancy is a little uncomfortable when applying makeup, the makeup artist and staff are very considerate. They let me rest for a while and also gave me hot water to drink.
The price of the set: 1000 yuan
Thank you for the review of the rabbit. I originally said that it was not suitable for the ancient style. I didn't expect the finished product to be so beautiful.
Thank you for your recognition, your satisfaction can make us full of energy to continue to move forward, we will continue to work hard!
This photography studio is really great! I strongly recommend all my friends to come here!
No matter from reception, makeup, clothing, lighting, photography to post-production, everything is flawless.
The makeup artist is very delicate, and will match the makeup suitable for you according to your style. The makeup products used are all first-line brands.
Mr. Tian, of course, photography is quite professional.
The whole studio has an artistic atmosphere, and there are two little cats playing around.
We are working in Beijing, and the good movie theaters in Beijing need to be queued up for half a year in advance. Some of my colleagues have been to Beijing to shoot, and after watching the film, they felt that it was just so-so.
I specifically sought out this studio, a place with soul and attitude.
Our facial expressions are not very good, and this is also a common shortcoming of most people. Photographer Liangge will take pictures and record the natural and wonderful moments.
Makeup artist, photographer, post-production design, a fine team.
We and everyone around us are praising the film.
I have already recommended it to my friends, and my friends who have seen the film are also full of praise.
I hope this kind of studio won't be buried, and more people will find it and make it their own style, not the same as everyone else.
Thank you very much for the five-star review from Zhao Ying and Jing Ling. Both of them are very creative and have great ideas. We are the creative studio, and we will do our best to complete 100% of the customer's requirements. We are grateful for the opportunity to meet each other.
The sweet and caring assistant, the lively and cheerful photography teacher, everyone in the team is super nice and beautiful. It is a very memorable experience, and the effect of the shooting is much better than I imagined. Thank you all for your hard work. 😘😘
Thank you for your review. Getting to know you is also a matter of fate. From Hohhot to Qinhuangdao, the trust you have placed in us is like a journey of thousands of kilometers. I am very happy to have met you and hope to come to Qinhuangdao again in the future.
How do I give money?
The re-sent meal has already been delivered.
No riding experience required
Now the restaurant staff are calling me.
A programmer who wants to share his personal experience.
If you are planning to enter this industry, you can choose to go to a place for training, but if you don't have this idea, it is better to learn by yourself, because the cost of training is very high and you need to spend 6 months to learn.
But if you are planning to enter this industry, training is a very good choice, especially for those who lack self-confidence and have weak self-discipline.
If you have a strong self-discipline, you can choose to self-study, but it will be more tiring.
Of course, choosing a good training institution is very important.
First, we need to look at the strength of the teaching staff of this institution. If the teaching staff is not strong enough, then this training institution has no meaning. Of course, some newly established training institutions do not have very strong teaching staff.
Secondly, before choosing a training institution, it is best to inquire about the training institution, and it is best to inquire about the students who have graduated from the training institution, because only the students of the training institution know how good or bad the training institution is, and the courses taught are good or bad.
Hello, I don't know how to answer your question because I haven't introduced my personal situation. Learning this thing and one's personal situation have a lot to do with each other.
For example, your profession, age, the language you want to learn, and even the city you want to live in are all related to the industry you want to work in.
If you are a student and have not graduated yet, or if you are a graduate in computer science, I personally recommend self-study. This is the most efficient and cost-effective way. Nowadays, many offline and online training institutions are actually very good, but the cost of learning is high and the investment of time is relatively large. You need to concentrate on training for 3-6 months.
But if I say these situations, self-study is very convenient now, and many learning resources on the Internet are free, or there are many training resources on bilibili. If you don't know where to find resources, you can contact me through the introduction and get free resources, or you can consult in detail.
In addition, there are some classic books that can be combined with videos for comprehensive learning.
If you are not a computer professional, but can afford to pay a certain amount of learning cost and time cost, then I suggest you go to a training institution to learn. This way, you don't have to spend too much effort, and the teacher's explanation is very detailed. If you have any questions, there are people who are specially assigned to answer them. In addition, there is also help with learning planning or supervision.
And now many training institutions will sign employment agreements, with internship places, and recommend students to go to the company after they finish their studies. This can save a lot of trouble when it comes to job interviews in the future.
That's what I have to say, because I don't know your situation, so I only roughly introduced it and didn't go into detail. If you have any other questions, you can contact me at any time for consultation and communication.
I said I got there before 1 p.m. and I saw it on the app
What is it called?
I haven't finished, what are you doing?
This person accepts various (installation, cleaning, maintenance), wall-mounted water heaters, water purifiers, washing machines, air conditioners, toilets, stoves, smoke machines, lighting fixtures, professional beautification, and household services.
Thank you to those who have silently given me a thumbs up. Life is hard, but we have to keep going.
Life will not disappoint those who work hard, so please pay attention to me. Thank you to those who silently gave me a thumbs up.
Life is like this, others only see the results, but alone to carry the process, face life, we are not only strong, but also continue, there is no choice, the road can be turned back to see but not to go back...
Cleaning is a job, and a responsibility, and life is beautiful because of service, and service is wonderful because of care.
Although cleaning is the dirtiest job, we will use the most serious attitude to clean every corner of the customer's house, and see the customer's satisfied smile and raise the thumb, knowing that all the hard work is worth it and there is a reward!
My daily work
- Your requests, my services.
Heartfelt service, heart-felt cleaning, and leaving behind a beautiful memory.
Your concerns are our top priority, and we strive to provide you with the best service possible. We want to make your life as comfortable and stress-free as possible, so that you can focus on the things that matter most to you and your family.
The family is clean, the family government is carved, the service is in place, and the family is clean.
Indoor and outdoor cleaning, my daily work
Although the crystal lamp is beautiful, it will become dull and dark if it is not cleaned for a long time. Only after cleaning can it be released in full glory. Life is also like this
To succeed, one must do things with heart; to shape things with detail, one must be meticulous. We are serious about our craft.
I will give you the opportunity to be satisfied, quality speaks for itself, because professionalism deserves to be trusted, your recognition is my encouragement!
It's not a good time to be in any industry right now!
But I always believe that as long as you have a serious attitude, perseverance, and hard work, you will be better than others, at least better than complaining."
The plan for the day begins in the morning, and all the good things begin in the morning. I hope you carry happiness, luck, health, and success with you, and start a new day with a good mood. Good morning.
As a child, happiness was something to be had, and having it made you happy; as you grew up, happiness became a goal, and achieving it made you happy; as you matured, you discovered that happiness was a state of mind, and understanding it made you happy.
Be the most real and kindest version of yourself, follow your heart, and regret nothing in this life; there is only one path in life, walk your own path; the two greatest treasures in life are a healthy body and a happy heart, and live a beautiful life until old age!
Every stage of life will face different challenges.
Often, what holds you back is not your ability, but the courage to face it.
Since we can't avoid it, we might as well face it head-on.
The more you fear, the more you will be knocked down; if you face the difficulties head-on, the problems will eventually be resolved.
Chinese curator co-organizes Saudi Arabia's first contemporary art biennial - Xinhua News Agency
On December 12, 2019 (reporter Wang Haizhou, Hu Guan), the first Saudi Arabia contemporary art biennial — — the Diriyah Contemporary Art Biennial, officially opened to the public in the JAX Art Zone in the northwest of Riyadh, Saudi Arabia. A total of 64 artists from Saudi Arabia, China and other countries participated in the exhibition.
The dual-year exhibition was jointly planned by the Saudi Diriyah Biennale Foundation and the UCCA Yuan Contemporary Art Center in China. Tian Feiyue, the director of the UCCA Yuan Contemporary Art Center, served as the artistic director.
According to the curatorial team, the theme of this two-year exhibition is "Crossing the River by Touching the Stone," which refers to the reform strategies adopted during the period of social and economic transformation in Saudi Arabia, and also reflects the current situation of Saudi social and cultural development.
The exhibition covers an area of nearly 12,000 square meters, and the exhibition hall spans six interconnected buildings, presenting six units: "Crossing the River by Touching Stones," "Tradition as Experiment," "Edge Thinking," "Towards the Public," "Beautiful New World," and "On the Spirit of Art."
Among them, the number of works by 27 Saudi artists accounts for more than 40% of the total number of exhibits, including painting, installation art and performance art in various forms; 12 Chinese artists' works are also highly valued, and some artists use recycled materials in a novel way, such as Xu Bing in the series of "Behind the Story" (2014), which reconstructed a classic landscape painting with discarded materials.
Diriyah Biennale Foundation CEO Barclay said he hoped the biennial would establish an international dialogue, allowing global audiences to learn about the cultural industry and creative community in Saudi Arabia's rapid development, and strengthen exchanges and interactions.
Tian Feiyue said, "The goal of the biennial is double, both to allow Saudi contemporary art to participate in the global dialogue and to allow Saudi audiences to integrate into the world of contemporary art."
It is understood that a series of lectures will be held during the opening week of the two-year exhibition, and artists, curators and leaders in the creative industry will discuss cross-cultural communication, the development of contemporary art and other topics.
I ordered a hatchet.
The restaurant told me that the riders can't deliver bones.
Want to know the reason clearly
Bones can be picked up and transported by the restaurant.
However, the system is not very convenient, and we use another room.
I'm at #ADDRESS#, the branch of #COMPANY# in #CITY#.
I'm far from there
100+ Practical Business English Conversation Scenarios and Business English Vocabulary Encyclopedia (with multiple learning gifts)
Speak fluently with zero foundation in just 10 minutes a day!
The common business themes are covered in full, and the commonly used business English expressions are all included, and the business English communication skills are fully explained!
Free download of oral simulation practice + foreign teacher reading audio + free download of useful business common sense, easy to improve business English speaking skills!
Practical Business English Conversation Scenarios 100 by Wang Hui-li, Zhang Lili, Wang Yu-cui, published by China Aerospace Publishing House, can be issued with regular electronic invoices, and any problems can be contacted online at any time!
English bedtime 5 minutes, those classic works of classic works, Yang Chunli, Cheng Yingcui, Song Bing, translation 9787512415812 Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics Press
The original book, electronic invoice, after-sales service, any questions can be consulted online customer service.
The woman who wears handmade shoes, written by Adriana Trigiani, translated by Dong Yanshan and Chen Huijie, 9787513306645, Xinxiang Publishing House.
The original book, directly supplied by the publisher, is issued with a regular electronic invoice, and you can contact the online customer service at any time if you have any problems!
Beautiful Confidence Hundred Percent [DE] Kompvelt【Original Book】
In-store discounts, up to 100% off, plenty of discounts, welcome to buy!
【Wenxuan Original】Business English Conversation Scenarios 100
New World Bookstore (Jiangsu, Chengdu, Hubei, Tianjin) four warehouses nearby delivery, 75% of the city can be delivered the next day!
Together, let's talk about autism and 55 closely related questions (plus) Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittaney Jean Brittan
Beautiful English, those beautiful letters (letter set) (800 pieces of expanded knowledge, 1000 pieces of authoritative English, 2000 pieces of classic quotes, 3 copies of the original book)
Yunnan: Coordinated to standardize the management of rural public welfare positions - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Kunming, December 12 (Reporter Lin Bifeng) On December 12, Xinhua News Agency reported (reporter Lin Bifeng) In recent years, Yunnan Province has issued relevant policies to promote the management of rural public positions in rural areas, and help promote the comprehensive promotion of rural revitalization.
The relevant person in charge of the Yunnan Provincial Department of Labor and Social Affairs introduced that at present, Yunnan has developed 448,300 rural public service positions, which are used to employ rural disadvantaged groups such as poverty-stricken labor force, and have played an important role in helping the poor achieve employment growth, consolidating the achievements of poverty alleviation, and effectively improving the capacity of rural public services.
The new regulation was jointly issued by seven departments including Yunnan Human Resources and Social Security, Rural Revitalization, Finance, etc. It mainly unifies the scope of recruitment of rural public welfare personnel at the grassroots level, the management of funds, the development of posts, and the management of posts.
In terms of job development, the new regulations are clear, and they are set up according to the principles of "job-based development, job-based use, dynamic management, total quantity control," "who develops, who uses, who is responsible," and "one person, one job, voluntary disclosure, unified management."
The recruitment process must follow the steps of announcement, application, review, announcement, hiring, pre-employment training and placement.
In addition, the new regulations also clearly specified the specific responsibilities of the main development departments of rural public welfare positions, the subsidy standards and subsidy methods of rural public welfare positions, and required the development departments of rural public welfare positions to purchase commercial insurance for the resettlement of rural public welfare positions. It also required relevant departments to regularly supervise the subsidy disbursement situation of rural public welfare positions.
The address was wrong
Hello
Can I cancel the order?
I re-ordered
Has it been cancelled?
Second, although the rightists have had a time of glory in history, it is not long, so it is short because it is given a little sunshine, and it sweats when it is given a little water; when it has a little success, it is admired by the people of Shu, and when it is hit, it is attached to Wu.
But in the process of social progress, rightists have played an active role.
From defining the standard of truth at the end of the Cultural Revolution to developing the economy, improving science and technology, and promoting the institutionalization of politics and human rights protection, the positive significance of the rightists should not be denied.
Three, although I do not fully agree with some of Li Weidong's statements, I am very concerned about his statements and highly respect Li Weidong as a person; because he is serious, he is serious about China, and he takes China's social problems seriously.
But I oppose his anti-communist theory, and I think that the revolution is not necessary, and that the revolution will inevitably lead to social instability, the loss of people's livelihood, and the chaos of political groups, and that foreign powers will take advantage of the opportunity.
Fourth, to change or improve China, one must have patience and a responsible attitude towards the country and the people. Political opportunists who try to take advantage of the situation, those are not rightists, they are idiots.
Let's talk about left.
On the left, it's actually a bunch of orphans of time and politics.
If the right has positive significance for society, the Communist Party will listen to some right-wing opinions and analyze their thoughts when needed. However, the left has no such thing, because the left's goal is to get rid of the rubbish that the Communist Party has thrown away!
Five, I recently saw some friends arguing with the rebels and rejecting the left-wing lunatic, which was quite lively. I think it's not necessary.
Don't try to reason with the Chinese collaborators and the leftists, they are all a bunch of nonsense.
Don't try to prove that we are right, and don't think about making the traitors and leftists admit it, why should you?
I told my friends, "When the scoundrels insult you for five cents, when the leftists insult you for your right dog, it just proves that our middle road is right!"
Many people have ideals when they are young, but as they grow older, they forget their ideals, or pursue their ideals, but become eccentric.
And the ideal gradually fades away, and even the dragon-slaying youth eventually becomes a dragon.
I think left and right generally refer to constraints and freedom, and China's overall trend should be left-leaning due to its innate gene of historical culture.
The right-wing libertarians in China focus on efficiency and development, while the left-wingers strengthen supervision and pay more attention to fairness and safety.
In today's society, people generally hope to pay more attention to fairness, while China and the United States are in competition, and the left is definite, and it is estimated that it will continue for many years.
Although I don't understand it, just click the like button and it's done.
What can I say, flowers are just like that
In the past two years, the United States has blocked and encircles Huawei's chips, not only making Huawei fall into an unprecedented predicament, but also making "American" enterprises suffer huge losses.
The United States has suppressed China's chip industry, and requires its own enterprises and allies to simultaneously block China's chip industry, which directly leads to the impact on the orders and profits of global chip suppliers, resulting in the reduction of research and development investment and the decline of production capacity of chip production enterprises, which has caused the shortage of the global chip supply chain.
Nowadays, the “chip shortage” has affected all major industries in the world, such as car manufacturers, mobile phones, and almost all industries that use chips have been affected.
In order to master the “chip” self-reliance, more and more technology giants in more and more countries are starting to take the road of “de-Americanization”.
To firmly control the global semiconductor control, to restrain the development of China's semiconductor industry, recently, the United States has taken action frequently. It has hosted the "Chip Summit" and invited 64 major companies from around the world to establish a semiconductor alliance. It has also provided financial support to American domestic technology giants, such as Intel, which is trying to regain its leading position in the chip industry by investing $20 billion in building two wafer fabrication plants in Arizona and opening up chip manufacturing services to overseas customers.
When most people thought that Intel's move would have a certain impact on TSMC and may even steal TSMC's "bowl of rice."
The reason why it is so certain is that Intel, as a veteran technology giant in the United States, has been deeply engaged in the semiconductor field for several decades, and has a large team of talents and technical reserves. It must be able to quickly rise and defeat TSMC in the short term.
However, for Intel's decision, TSMC founder Zhang Zhongmou did not care.
At the "2021 Master Think Tank Forum" held in April this year, Zhang Zhongmou made a shocking statement, and for Intel's decision to invest in building a semiconductor factory, Zhang Zhongmou said without hesitation: Intel's decision to build a chip foundry is very ironic.
Zhang Zhongmou's disdain for Intel's entry into the semiconductor field is because Zhang Zhongmou still has a grudge against TSMC and Intel from over 30 years ago.
In the 1960s and 1970s, Intel was the shining star in the American manufacturing industry, occupying the pinnacle of the global market, and was the hegemon of the world's semiconductor industry.
By the 1980s, the world's top-end chips had been monopolized by a few strong players.
At that time, the semiconductor industry was characterized by the IDM model, in which chips were designed, manufactured, and packaged by a single factory. Intel was the representative of that era.
However, this model has made it difficult for some small enterprises to bear the burden, and many semiconductor entrepreneurs can only stand aside due to the huge cost of building production lines.
After entering the 1980s, the chip industry began to see the phenomenon of cooperation in division of labor, and in 1984, Zhang Zhongmou heard that there was a company specializing in chip design, so he thought that since there was a company specializing in design, then he could establish a factory specializing in wafer manufacturing.
Not long after, Zhang Zhongmou's idea became a reality, and Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Company (TSMC) was born.
TSMC has focused its main business on "chip fabrication" and has not engaged in design, only providing contract manufacturing services for the fabrication of wafers.
When TSMC was just established, it was just a small fry in front of Intel, the giant.
In order to obtain capital support, Zhang Zhongmou once approached Intel for investment, but when Intel heard that TSMC only does the manufacturing process of the semiconductor industry, it was obviously very arrogant and looked down on TSMC, so it decisively refused to invest in TSMC.
Zhang Zhongmou also recognized that Intel at that time did not look down on the service of wafer fabrication.
I didn't expect that the giant of chip manufacturing services that I looked down on last year would also start to do chip subcontracting.
So, Zhang Zhongmou thought it was ironic that Intel entered the foundry business.
Today, TSMC's market value has surpassed Intel's.
In the face of TSMC's strong offensive, Intel is also unwilling to be complacent.
Today, TSMC is rushing towards 3nm chips, while Intel is still stuck at 14nm from 7 years ago.
It is not easy to catch up.
No way
Placed an order at 19:06 and it's been 2 hours already 😅
Today, we'll take a look at some "strange hot searches."
What is normal public opinion?
Randomly select three hot searches: February 2nd Dragon Rising, the price increase of Hualeiyou, and the incident of Hualala. The public opinion spreads and forms a peak, and then the index drops (smooth curve) and finally dissipates. If there is a secondary public opinion, there will be a small peak again.
They look exactly like the "network sentiment evolution model" displayed on the website of the Ministry of Industry and Information Technology.
What is abnormal public opinion?
Randomly select six hot searches in the same event, and present them in the form of a "peak", a "sawtooth" and a "cliff".
【The shape of a peak】 refers to self-heating and quickly rising to the top of the hot search rankings, attracting public attention; 【The shape of a sawtooth】 refers to periodic heating, ensuring that the topic remains on the hot search rankings; 【The shape of a cliff】 refers to collective withdrawal, where the hot search has fulfilled its “function”, and is ready to receive a new task and move to a new battlefield.
As shown in Figure 9, the heat wave peak of one event exactly coincided with the trough of another event, and the time difference was only a few seconds. It must be that the unified water army received the task and launched a new offensive.
The professionalism of black public relations is evident: dozens of hot searches are listed at the same time, and which ones attract attention, which ones are responsible for popularization, which ones provoke war, which ones divert attention, which ones affect cognition, which ones mislead judgment, which ones incite emotions, and which ones bind decision-making. Black-owned accounts are divided into batches and nodes to fight in a fine-grained manner, almost considering all the elements of the spread of public opinion.
Propaganda is a science, and it is impossible to escape from the objective data without taking into account the subjective factors of position, emotion and so on. Even black public relations will have nowhere to hide.
Anyone who has passed by must leave a trace, and these traces we will dig out together.
Data source: Hot search time machine.
The first cases of infection with the Omicron strain were found in countries such as Mauritius - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Beijing, December 12 (Xinhua) - A comprehensive report by Xinhua News Agency's overseas reporters showed that Mauritius, Cyprus and Malawi recently reported the first cases of infection with the new coronavirus mutant virus Omicron.
Mauritius reported its first two cases of the Omicron variant on December 10.
According to the introduction by the Minister of Health of Mao, a visitor from South Africa who arrived in Mauritius on November 27, and another local resident who had contact with a person who had recently returned from South Africa, both tested positive for COVID-19 on November 30.
After being isolated at the hospital, the two infected people's nucleic acid test results turned negative, and they have now returned to their respective places of residence.
Cyprus's health ministry announced on Monday that it had confirmed three cases of infection with the omicron variant.
The three are all students who returned from a trip abroad in the first few days of this month and were not admitted to the hospital due to their mild symptoms.
In order to prevent the spread of the Omicron variant, the government has continued to increase its prevention and control efforts.
From December 6 to January 10, all 12-year-old and above passengers who arrive by plane will need to pay for a nucleic acid test at the airport upon arrival.
On the 10th, the Ministry of Health also announced that it would start vaccinating children aged 5 to 11 in the country against COVID-19.
Malawi's health minister, Khumbize Chiponda, said on Monday that the country had recorded its first three cases of the Omicron variant.
The country's health department conducted gene sequencing on 12 samples collected from November 9 to December 2, and found these three cases of infection.
Takeaway never delivered
All the rider's phone numbers were fake
I have already re-ordered.
Will the refund be made for the previous single?
If not, please cancel the order and refund.
Thinking about eating early, can eat early, but now it's already 7 o'clock and I haven't eaten anything yet.
I don't understand what you're saying...
Is your Chinese translation or do you prefer to use English?
That was sent to
Should I call him?
Dear valued customer,
Thank you for choosing to dine at Sky Cloud Restaurant. Our mission has always been to bring happiness and satisfaction to our customers through delicious food and excellent service. We strive to provide you and your family with more delicious and convenient dishes, and better service. Your satisfaction and praise are our driving force for continuous improvement and growth!
Thank you for the five-star review, I love you so much!
Thank you for choosing to dine at Cloud Restaurant. I apologize for any inconvenience this may have caused you.
At the same time, I would like to thank you for your real experience evaluation. We will find out the shortcomings in time and take effective measures to improve them. We will strictly control the quality and quantity of the dishes. My phone number is 18912251735, and my WeChat is synchronized. I look forward to meeting you again.
Dear customers, thank you for choosing to dine at Sky Cloud Restaurant. We apologize for any unpleasant dining experience caused by the menu. We have communicated with the kitchen to strictly control the menu, and thank you for your understanding and support. I am Little Cloud of Sky Cloud Restaurant. I look forward to seeing you again!
Come to the banquet and leave with a good mood!
Dear customers, thank you for your evaluation and support for our "Xiao Yun". When our heart-made dishes are recognized by you, it is the happiest moment for us!
Looking forward to meeting you again
Dear little master, first of all, I would like to thank you for your recognition and evaluation, and I will try my best to do better!
Secondly, we would like to thank you for your support and likes in the busy time, and wish you a happy meal and a good mood every day!
I don't think this is going to help!
It's a belly full of money
The order is a claw
Okay, phone is #PHONENUMBER#.
Do I need to stay in the conversation?
I called your staff to explain to them.
Your rider told me the address was too far
Da Mei 360 integrated home furnishing
Address: 156, No. 12, Floor 12, Happy Garden, South Ring Road
At first, it was introduced by a friend because of trust, so I chose to take a look at the initial budget of 70,000 for basic renovation.
As soon as you enter the store, a series of tricks begin.
I went to the store for the first time just to show them my floor plan. They didn't measure the house, but they were able to give me a quote saying that my 135 square meter house could be done for 700,000. They showed me their materials, but I didn't know what brand of materials they were.
Their second trick is that you will be dragged to the store and forced to pay the deposit (once you've paid the deposit, you'll never be able to get it back, unless you have enough experience and are willing to fight theoretical battles with them).
When I was hesitating whether to pay the deposit, they would invite their so-called manager to tell me that if I paid the deposit today, we could give you a certain discount.
This is a big pitfall. I was cheated alive. I paid a deposit of more than 10,000 yuan when I was in a hurry.
He gave me a quote with many problems. The price was 700,000 without water and electricity renovation, and did not include any doors and cabinets. The bathroom was not included in the basic cost.
They charge more for their service points than other companies.
I lost trust in this company, and I signed a contract without knowing anything.
When I went to get my money back, they acted like they had a lot of experience and had a dedicated team to deal with me.
No matter what, it is the customer's problem, and they are completely at fault.
There are many excuses, and there are many details that I don't want to say. In short, don't choose them, because my friend found that the quality of the house they renovated was not good, and they would charge you various fees in the later stage.
They are the original scam decoration, and now they have become big and beautiful, as if they have collapsed and changed into something else.
So, everyone should not choose such a bad decoration company.
In the future, everyone should pay more attention when choosing, because the renovation is not a small amount of money.
To ask a question to the merchant, please log in or register first.
Prohibited to publish various forms of business reviews, please see the merchant inclusion statement for details
The popular点评 Kunming decoration design channel provides you with the latest merchant information such as the address, phone number and business hours of Da Mei 360 integrated home furnishing, and helps you find a decoration company.
If it doesn't arrive within 30 minutes, please cancel the order!
Is there no other way? Like, changing the address?
Okay, then you won't cancel this conversation. If I don't get my money back within 5 to 10 days, I'll definitely pursue it.
I asked if it was possible to cancel in less than 15 minutes.
The chicken should be cooked, but I received raw meat, so I can't eat it.
The starry sky has about 丨The 14th of the lunar calendar is the peak of the Gemini meteor shower - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Tianjin, December 12 (Reporter Zhou Runjian) As the last large-scale meteor shower of this year, the Geminid meteor shower, one of the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere, will reach its peak on December 14. People who like meteor showers can observe it after midnight on that day.
Beijing Astronomical Enthusiasts Anju took pictures of the Gemini meteor shower in Qinghai on December 13, 2018.
Most of the parent bodies of the meteor showers are periodic comets, but the parent body of the Taurid meteor shower is 3200 Phaethon, an Apollo-type asteroid.
The Gemini meteor shower is also the second known meteor shower that is not produced by a comet.
Mr. Xiu Lipeng, a council member of the Tianjin Astronomical Society and an expert in popularizing astronomy, introduced that like the end-of-year blockbuster, the Geminid meteor shower usually appears at the end of the year, and the “screening period” can last from December 4th to 17th.
This meteor shower is known for its large and stable flow, and is together with the Orionid meteor shower and the Geminid meteor shower, known as the three major meteor showers in the northern hemisphere.
One of the distinctive features of the Gemini meteor shower is that the meteoroids move slowly, have rich colors, and are not rare. It is suitable for beginners to observe and photograph.
Yang Jing, a stargazer in Tianjin, took a picture of the Gemini meteor shower on December 13, 2020 in Tianjin, China.
The forecast for the Geminid meteor shower is that it will peak around 15:00 on December 14, with a ZHR (the number of meteors visible per hour under ideal viewing conditions, when the radiant point is directly above the observer's head) of 150.
The Gemini meteor shower index chart.
"Last year, the "falling stars" of the twin-peaked meteor shower left a deep impression on people, but this year's twin-peaked meteor shower will be affected by the moonlight, and the level of excitement will be slightly reduced.
On the 14th, it is the 11th day of the 11th lunar month, and the moon is in the full moon phase. The bright moonlight will interfere with the observation. Fortunately, the moon will set in the latter half of the night. At this time, the radiant point of the Gemini meteor shower will also rise relatively high.
Friends who like meteor showers can observe them in this few hours after the moon sets in the late night, but they should pay attention to keep warm and keep warm. "
How can we observe more meteors?
"It is not recommended to observe in the city. You can choose a place with a high altitude, low light pollution, and a wide view to the northeast, and then patiently wait for the moon to fall, and then observe with the naked eye.
It is worth noting that the flow of the Gemini meteor shower is very large in all directions, and it is not necessary to stare at the radiant point of the Gemini meteor shower all the time when observing.
Friends who like photography should choose a wide-angle lens with a large aperture, and use high ISO and the maximum aperture when shooting.
Based on the consideration of stability and continuity, a tripod, a spare battery, and a shutter line are also indispensable. ”
Li Shizhu pointed out.
What is the difference in market positioning between laser TV and traditional TV?
In my understanding, the traditional TV referred to by the questioner should be the liquid crystal TV, and the differences in market positioning between the laser TV and the liquid crystal TV are mainly as follows:
First, laser TV is more focused on the large screen market.
Compared with the market positioning of liquid crystal televisions, the laser television is obviously more focused on the large screen market, or the laser television itself is a product born for large screens.
Currently, the mainstream size of liquid crystal televisions is between 55 inches and 65 inches, and the size of laser televisions is generally above 75 inches, with the largest exceeding 100 inches, fully meeting the demand of users for large-screen color TVs.
In recent years, the proportion of global shipments and sales of laser TVs has continued to increase, and the proportion has exceeded 60% in the overall TV sales volume of 80 inches and above.
According to the prediction of Zhongyi Kang, the sales volume of laser TV in 2020 will grow by more than 140%, and continue to maintain a high growth rate.
The reason why it has achieved such good results in the big screen market is mainly due to the excellent performance of laser TV in eye protection.
The imaging principle based on laser television reflection, the light emitted by the laser light source does not directly enter the eyeball, compared with the backlight source of the liquid crystal television, the imaging process is closer to the imaging process of objects under natural conditions, and the stimulation to the eyes is also smaller.
The Xi'an Laboratory of the Electronic Technology Standardization Research Institute of China and the experts of the Ophthalmology Department of Peking Union Medical College conducted a strict comparison test under the same conditions for 144 groups of people to watch the laser TV and the liquid crystal TV, and obtained 144 sets of test data.
The data proves that the laser TV does have a very strong eye protection effect, and even has a certain improvement effect in some aspects.
In the current attention paid to eye health, the laser TV not only attracted more and more users with its eye protection advantage, but also opened up another breakthrough in the color TV market.
Second, laser TV is more focused on the high-end market.
While the price of LCD TVs continues to fall, the current market price of laser TVs is mostly above 10,000 yuan, and the price gradually rises with the upgrade of size and light source.
Why are laser TVs so expensive?
It's a good reason.
With the continuous development of light sources and technology, laser TV has many advantages that cannot be achieved by liquid crystal TV and projection.
With the super-short focal length projection technology, the projection distance of the laser TV is shorter than that of the traditional projection device, and it can achieve the experience of a 100-inch screen in a short distance, and the required space is small, and the host is small and occupies little space.
In terms of brightness, high-end laser TVs can reach over 2000 lumens.
In addition, the heat dissipation is lower, and the loss of the equipment is small, and the service life of the television is also longer.
In addition, many high-end laser TV models are equipped with many cutting-edge technologies such as true 4K ultra-high-definition picture quality, artificial intelligence systems, and biomimetic screens, which can provide users with a more immersive visual and auditory experience.
It is not a fake demand, but a product of fine-grained demand. In terms of picture quality and input-output ratio, the laser TV is not a dish for audio-visual players. If you want to balance the big screen and the viewing environment, you can try it. Everything has its advantages and disadvantages, and it is up to you to weigh the pros and cons and make your own judgment. Don't be swayed by one-sided words.
In short, the super wide-angle close-focus projector - laser TV - has to use expensive super wide-angle lenses and mirrors in order to get close to the screen, which does not conform to the best optical design.
To shield some of the ambient light, a micro-structured Fresnel screen is used, which is expensive, and the price of an 80-inch screen is about the same as that of a 65-inch LCD.
There is one more thing I particularly dislike, and that is that the projection manufacturers use the fact that the reflected light on the screen is good for the eyes as a selling point, please, the light on the screen that can be seen by the eyes is the direct light, if you reflect the light on the ceiling, the eyes can't see it, and if it is a true liquid crystal TV, it also shines directly on the ceiling, and if you open the TV, the ceiling will also be lit up.
And if the projection screen is not a mirror, it will not become an image.
The hot spot effect of the high gain screen (light spot) was ignored, and the large amount of light reflected to the eyes at a certain angle was the real suffering.
The Wenxi Visual Aesthetic Photography Museum has selected the best quality stores temporarily, and there are no branches at present.
After adding the WeChat appointment date, the little sister arranged the time for me to choose, and the reply was very timely~
Before going, I watched the works in the store, which were mostly outdoor wedding photos, and they were very beautiful. There were many shooting styles involved.
After the day was over, I simply communicated with the little sister about my thoughts. She was very patient and helped me try on two sets of clothes that I was indecisive about. In the end, we decided to start makeup and styling. Before the photographer took pictures, he would arrange some props and guide the actions. He was very meticulous about every detail.
But maybe because I didn't communicate the specific shooting ideas with him, the style of the photos I took was not what I wanted, but it should be good.
After the photo is taken, the photographer will help to choose the photos, communicate the post-processing style, and feel that he is very careful.
The repaired film takes about half a month, and waits for the effect~
The second time I won the banquet activity of photography. Almost all the clothes on the scene can choose one to shoot.
Finally, she chose a black skirt and tried different styles.
The whole shooting process takes about 2 hours, including makeup and shooting. The photographer in charge of the shooting is the younger brother of 95 years old. I feel a little shy. I hope that in the future, I can give more suggestions on how to guide customers during the shooting process. The shooting process is quite pleasant.
Wen-Xiang Visual Aesthetic Photography Museum Preferred Quality Shop Reply
The homepage is up, come and take a look at Queenie~
When I arrived, I filled in my name and phone number and then chose my clothes. I could choose a wedding dress, and I was patient enough to try on three or four sets of clothes. After that, I put on makeup for a long time, and the service attitude was also good. Later, they taught me how to pose for the photoshoot, and it felt like my face was too big. The store said it would take half a month to get the final product, but I received it in just three or four days. I felt like there was no difference between it and the original film.
【Environment】Overall, it was okay.
There are many optional clothing items.
There are three makeup rooms, and there is a photography studio inside.
【Service】is very warm and meticulous.
The sculptors have been very patient.
The photographer will also teach you the poses very seriously.
If you are not satisfied, the photographer will also proactively propose to re-shoot.
【Experience】The shape may be a bit out of date, and the original double eyelids were pasted with three eyelids.
The eyebrows have also been shaved, which is a bit awkward for those who don't draw their eyebrows every day.
The photos have been taken for more than ten days, but the P effect is not very satisfactory. I feel that the double eyelid stickers are still very obvious.
Because I wasn't sure what style I wanted, I tried two sets. In the end, I chose the black formal dress. The saleswoman said that this set was quite retro.
After choosing the clothes, I started to do makeup. The hairstylist and makeup artist are very patient. The effect is very satisfactory.
After doing my makeup, I started taking pictures. The photographer was with me throughout the process and gave me instructions on how to pose. The whole process was very relaxed and harmonious.
After the filming, he carefully selected four of his favorite ones, and the little brother said that the 15-minute film was completed, and the ending was very satisfactory.
No reply for 3 days... Because your system cannot recognize my credit card, I cannot join the #PRS_ORG# plus monthly plan!
The most bizarre thing is that I used the same credit card every time I paid.
I now have to pay for delivery every time
Can I be exempted from paying my monthly fee until you finish your investigation?
Is it worth buying umbrella insurance?
Umbrella is an insurance broker platform on the Internet.
From the setting conditions, according to the "Insurance Brokerage Institution Supervision Regulations (Revised in 2015)", to become an insurance broker, it must meet three keywords: shareholders, the founder has no major violations in the past three years, the minimum capital is RMB 500 million, and it must be approved by the China Insurance Regulatory Commission.
These three are actually quite strict, and in summary, it is necessary to have strength, to be approved by the national authority of the China Insurance Regulatory Commission (which regulates all insurance companies and banks in the country), and the shareholders must have a good reputation. As a small umbrella insurance company, the policyholders do not need to worry about whether the small umbrella insurance is legitimate or not, because there are these three thresholds. Not all insurance companies can meet them.
At this point, it is good, and it is worth trusting.
From the perspective of insurance products: Small umbrella insurance is like an insurance supermarket, and many companies' star illness insurance are sold on this platform, such as the newly launched and泰超级玛丽5号重疾险, the underwriter and the reinsurer are both and泰寿险, and Small umbrella insurance is just a third-party intermediary, there is no need to question its credibility.
From the perspective of payment mode: Internet platforms' products are generally more cost-effective because they do not have the operating costs of physical stores and the cost of business employees, and the payment mode is flexible and supports monthly payments, which relieves the pressure on policyholders to pay premiums, and at the same time maximizes the leverage of insurance.
That's a very good thing.
It can be considered.
From the perspective of professionalism: This is particularly important, because insurance is a highly professional industry, and many internet product customers can purchase insurance themselves. This will lead to many misunderstandings, especially in the areas of health and career, where non-insurance professionals tend to add their own subjective awareness when applying for insurance, thinking that they are healthy or meet the requirements. This can result in many hidden risks of claim denial, and there is a risk of being denied coverage.
I myself have worked as an insurance sales agent for "Tencent Micro Insurance" (just like Xiaoyu Umbrella, which is also an Internet insurance brokerage platform), and I am very responsible in telling everyone.
Internet insurance is true and reliable, and the unreliable is people. The Internet channel does not have professional staff, and there are many sales misleading.
For example: 1 yuan insurance covers 600,000 yuan, and you can get a mobile phone for free, and receive 60,000 yuan for serious illness. These marketing strategies are not wrong, but they are evasive and do not tell the policyholders that the first month is 1 yuan, and the second month is charged at normal rates, which can range from 20 to 200 yuan. Many customers do not know what they have purchased after deducting the premium for a few years.
They thought they could spend one yuan, and the insurance company paid 600,000 yuan (the whole cake fell).
Free mobile phones are only given out to those with special policy numbers such as 6666 or 8888, and if you win a text message, you don't exchange it or no one reminds you.
(This is another pitfall for the policyholder) Free 600,000 yuan coverage for serious illness is short-term. If you only rely on this, without any other commercial insurance, what can 600,000 yuan do if a serious illness occurs? It won't solve the problem, and your life will start to become bare bones.
The state is also cracking down on the misleading of internet insurance sales.
So, in summary, the platform is fine, the product is fine, but the problem is the professionalism and professional ethics of the sales staff.
The topic main should comprehensively consider, in fact, the products of many offline insurance brokers are more comprehensive, and there are more opportunities and products for customers to choose from, and the cost performance of some products is better than that of Internet products.
I have helped 59 internet customers to purchase offline products, and saved 2000-3000 yuan/year for each customer.
If you have any questions, please feel free to contact me.
I am a Mingya insurance agent with 3 years of experience in enterprise management training. I have served more than 1,000 enterprise users and cooperated with more than 100 insurance companies. Before purchasing insurance, I will start from the customer's needs and tailor-make insurance products for customers. During the purchase process, I will try my best to obtain the best underwriting results for customers by comparing quotes from three insurance companies. After the purchase, I will handle the insurance certificate processing and policy management for customers, allowing them to rest assured and worry-free.
Grow with each customer for a lifetime.
I hope my answer can help the questioner!
According to the definition of insurance supervision department, internet insurance is insurance business that can complete all insurance procedures autonomously after the policyholder clicks the insurance purchase link.
In this process, the policyholder does not need to sign, and the insurance advisor does not need to sign. All steps can be completed by the policyholder autonomously.
While the online insurance purchase does not have much "ceremony", it may not even have a printed paper contract, but this does not affect the validity and legal effect of the electronic contract.
This pattern is somewhat similar to the "telemarketing" type of routine work, but there is a fatal flaw in buying insurance in this way, which is that the follow-up service may not be able to keep up.
Insurance is usually a long-term contract that lasts for decades. When we buy insurance, should we think carefully about the "intermediary" we choose, whether it is an "insurance intermediary" who can accompany us for a long time and provide services to us in the future?
How can I contact the delivery person?
It's already almost 3 p.m.
Is that compensation for me?
I said I would knock on doors to deliver goods
But the rider left the bike in front of the door, and then the people left.
And sent the wrong one.
Your rider has already taken my order #NUMBER# but is still telling me to wait
The rider received my delivery at 19:25, but still refused to leave
After I buy it, do I want to order other takeout?
What to do
Where did your rider go?
And wait?
I'm sending the bill
Well, if you don't cancel, I'll call the police
But my food will have safety and hygiene issues
Classic Sword and Saber Appreciation Guide Gold-Bound Collector's Edition [Authentic Book, Worry-free after-sales]
【Original books, lightning delivery, worry-free quality, can be invoiced】
Classic Emblem Appreciation Guide + Classic Sword and Saber Appreciation Guide + Classic Military Uniform Appreciation Guide Gold-Plated Collector's Edition 3 Volumes World Military Books Classic Military Equipment Emblem Performance Introduction Military Uniform Sword and Saber
Nine Lectures on Chinese Painting Appraisal and Collection Strategy [Original book, lightning delivery]
【Full-price discount, fast delivery, can issue invoices, original books】
Western swords and daggers: appreciation and collection [Original book, lightning delivery]
Piano Technique Practice Guide [Original Book, Lightning Delivery]
Industrial Design Sketchbook Creative Implementation + Industry Guide + Performance Luo Jianli, Liu Weilun, Liang Jun, Qinghua University Press [Original book, lightning delivery]
The essence of Chinese antique auction: English version of porcelain【Lightning fast delivery】
Nine Songs Map【Original book, fast delivery】
The Red Plum Dream of the Red Plum Dream【Original book, lightning delivery】
Chinese Painting History【Original book, lightning delivery】
Woodblock Prints of Birds and Flowers【Original book, lightning fast delivery】
Realism and Chinese movies in the 1980s [Official book, lightning delivery]
China's logo design 1【Original book, lightning delivery】
Grass-roots flower poetry anthology【Original book, lightning delivery】
Sword Art Online 02: Aincrad [Official Book, No Worry After-sales Service]
Song Jianfeng - Miniature Works of Art by a Master of Portraiture【Original book, lightning delivery】
Good Law and Good Governance - Institutional History and Public Administration
“The 20th Anniversary of the History and Culture Lecture Series for Middle-Level Party Cadres” is a collection of the essence of the 20th anniversary of the History and Culture Lecture Series for Middle-Level Party Cadres. Wang Chunyu, Zhang Daxie, Xiong Zhaozheng, Ge Jianxiong, Deng Xiaonan and other 14 scholars of history and culture, as well as cultural celebrities and well-known scholars, gave a public lecture to middle-level party cadres.
All you need to do is to re-enter the discount code.
No problem, remember not to arrange for re-delivery, I have already bought it separately and don't want to waste it
Thank you for helping
From before to now, I have always opposed any form of defamation and abuse, and I cannot accept such personal attacks.
In a civilized society, we can accept everything, but we must eliminate this kind of scoundrel.
If you don't look at the political parties and factions, the first thing you should resist is this kind of uncivilized behavior.
From the moment you started sending me friend requests on Facebook, I have taken a non-responsive attitude towards you. Then, you tried to publish my home address and my father's name on social media, which prompted me to take an even more non-responsive attitude.
After that, you continued to tag me at a higher frequency than six meals a day, and continued to discuss some hidden, humiliating remarks about me on Facebook with your so-called friends, such as my appearance, figure, upbringing, what kind of fruit I like to eat in bed, whether to insert or not, and so on. I... I'm fed up with it.
How did I know that later, more of my friends would send me photos and comments on your Facebook friend's account with sexual harassment content?
I'm sorry, as a woman, I can no longer remain silent.
After I reported the news, you didn't calm down at all, but became more and more arrogant.
I don't care what your political background is, or what your social status is, in our society, it is necessary to respect both sexes.
Yes, you can continue with this kind of teasing, ambiguous, humiliating, insulting, and abusive language. You can continue to say that you only care about and pay attention to me, and you can continue to believe that this is not harassment. You can even continue to deny that it is your picture or continue to publish all kinds of offensive remarks.
Yes, I can't and I don't have the ability to stop you.
I don't know you, I don't want to know you, my appearance and build don't need your approval.
I don't think there's any woman out there who would willingly humiliate herself for the sake of fame.
A friend asked me, "Are you okay?"
I said I wouldn't believe it.
I don't think any one of those girls would have been able to say they were okay after what happened to them.
No matter in work, society, politics or business, only those who have no basic moral standards will choose to hurt any woman in this way.
I believe that justice is in the hearts of all people.
I have cut off some comments for everyone to review
Your own posts shouldn't be able to be impersonated, right?
I can only say you are an enemy of civilization
A smile is a face-saver.
Vietnam News - Prime Minister Pham Minh Chinh attends the 3rd Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum
During the third Vietnam National Digital Technology Enterprise Development Forum, two major conferences were held to discuss topics around digital technology enterprises and national digital transformation, digital technology enterprises and the COVID-19 pandemic and post-pandemic economic recovery and development.
Minister of Information and Communications Nguyen Manh Hung said that in 2021, although the COVID-19 epidemic continued to spread, the number and revenue of digital technology enterprises in Vietnam continued to grow, reaching nearly 10%.
In 2021, Vietnam's typical digital products were cultivated and concentrated to solve the major problems faced by Vietnam, and many digital products have left the country. Vietnam's digital technology ranking has also improved.
Minister Ruan Mengxiong called on digital technology enterprises to assume the responsibility of developing digital transformation platforms for developing countries, and the task of developing these digital platforms is to fulfill the mission of the country.
In the forum, leaders of various departments and state-owned enterprises are studying, developing, applying, and transferring digital technology enterprises, organizations, and individuals to mobilize and gather all social resources to develop Vietnamese technology enterprises, and work together to promote the digital transformation of the country and the economic recovery after the epidemic.
Premier Fan Minzheng emphasized in his speech at the forum that digital transformation is the world's inevitable path and is an objective demand for development.
Digital transformation has become a global issue, and digital transformation services are universal. Therefore, it is necessary to mobilize the participation of the people.
People and enterprises are the core, subject, target and driving force of digital transformation.
Therefore, all policies must be for the people and enterprises.
Premier Wen Jiabao emphasized that digital transformation should reflect the national spirit, should be led by internal strength, strategic, long-term and decisive factors, and external factors are important and breakthroughs.
He also believes that digital transformation needs to drive vertical development and sustainable development, participate in the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic, economic recovery and development, and adapt to changes after the epidemic, overcome the phenomenon of resource depletion, and promote green transformation and development of green energy.
Digital transformation requires participation in the establishment of databases to protect and promote national cultural values, historical traditions, national landscapes and folk customs, and promote the digital transformation of banks, taxation, land management and development, and logistics, etc.
The ultimate goal of digital transformation is to make people happier and the country more prosperous and developed.
Premier Fan Minzheng requires that all levels of government, all levels of agencies, and all enterprises should increase their leadership and guidance in the development of digital technology, raise their awareness of digital transformation, continue to formulate and perfect the institutional framework for digital transformation, strengthen national management and supervision, and promote the development of digital technology enterprises with a spirit of respect, communication, listening, proactivity, and initiative.
During the forum, Prime Minister Phạm Minh Chính attended the 2021 “Vietnamese Made” Excellent Digital Product Award Ceremony and the opening ceremony of the “Vietnamese Made” Digital Product.
I have reported it and have attached pictures, but there has been no reply
What kind of cow, no cow
It's chicken soup with fresh meat.
There's no way to eat it.
You're making sure it's fresh, not old?
unacceptable
They had already placed an order early in the morning.
It was said to have been delivered at around 7:30 p.m.
Why remake it?
It's ridiculous
The 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Talent Summit opened - rolling news - Hubei Daily Net - Voice of China
Hunan Daily, December 10, 2021 (Full media reporter Zhou Zhiheng) On the 9th, the “Zhihui Xiangxiang” 2021 China International Rail Transit and Equipment Manufacturing Talent Summit opened in Zhuzhou.
Wang Cheng, a member of the Standing Committee of the Provincial Committee and the Director of the Organization Department of the Provincial Committee, attended the launching ceremony and delivered a speech.
Wang Cheng pointed out that holding the talent summit is an important measure to implement the spirit of the Central Talent Work Conference and the 12th Provincial Party Congress, and it shows that Hunan attaches great importance to talents, is eager for talents, and makes good use of talents.
Hunan has a good tradition of loving and respecting talents, a broad platform for talent development, and a favorable environment for realizing a beautiful life. In recent years, it has implemented the talent-led development strategy in depth, with the Fuyong Talent Action Plan as the driving force, and built up a comprehensive talent development chain, which has become a fertile land for talent growth, a hotbed for innovation and entrepreneurship, and a cozy and prosperous place to live and work.
At present, Hunan is comprehensively implementing the strategic positioning and mission tasks of “three highs and four new”, and will further open the door of talent introduction and recruitment, and issue more preferential policies, concentrate more resources, and create better conditions for talent innovation and entrepreneurship. We hope that outstanding talents from all walks of life will join forces to help Hunan achieve high-quality development.
The exhibition hall of Changsha, Zhuzhou and Xiangtan was set up in the venue, and the exhibition hall of the Hunan Free Trade Pilot Zone was set up. The Ministry of Science and Technology, the Ministry of Industry and Information Technology and the Ministry of Human Resources and Social Security released the list of advanced manufacturing-related industrial technological innovation needs, the list of intelligent manufacturing industry talent demand, and the list of doctoral and postdoctoral talent mobility station intelligent manufacturing industry youth talent demand.
48 large enterprises such as China CNR Corporation, China Light and Power, and Yunda Technology gathered talents on the spot, and nearly a thousand relevant professional graduates and social talents participated in the talent project docking.
Hello
Just placed an order, the rider was shown waiting in the restaurant, but the restaurant said the order was ready and no rider was seen
Can you follow up on this, because I'm quite urgent, thank you
It is possible to be late by half an hour without any reason
In fact, do you have a solution to the problem?
The editor brings you what is the best brand of Yalihan?
1) 【Wine factory direct sales】Ningcheng Bailiang Old Cellar 42 degrees 500ML concentrated type high-grain original white wine, mouth feel soft and old wine, four bottles in a box
Reasons for recommendation: Selected high-quality sorghum as raw material, using traditional technology to brew, white wine from the plateau of Inner Mongolia, the taste is more classic, concentrated and sweet, with a little bit of sweetness, layered and rich, using the traditional solid-state fermentation white wine process, retaining its original flavor and not losing its original flavor, so that the wine body has a rich and thick taste.
This is a level 1 product with a capacity of 500, and the storage method is at room temperature, cool, dry, and ventilated. It is packaged with other products, and the alcohol content is 42. The fragrance is strong and fragrant. It is produced in Inner Mongolia, China, and the product weight (kg) is 2.9. Currently, there are 4 reviews, and it has a 100% positive rating.
2. Ningcheng Bailihan old cellar big pot white wine 52 degrees old cellar grain white wine [10 kg]
Recommendation: After years of aging, it has become more concentrated and more transparent, and is loved by Inner Mongolian pastoral nomads. The fragrance is inherited from traditional brewing techniques, and it has won the trust of Chinese and Western people. It is an excellent choice for various banquets or for use at home.
The capacity is 5000ml, the packaging is in a jar, the product weight (kg) is 8, the fragrance is strong and fragrant, the storage method is ventilated, the province is Inner Mongolia, the grade is first-class, the alcohol content is 52, and there are currently more than 50 reviews, with a 95% approval rate.
3, 【Wineries Direct Sales】Ningcheng Bailihang Old Cellar 42 degrees 500ML strong aroma sorghum raw grain white wine, mouth feel smooth old wine, whole box six bottles.
The reason for recommendation: This white wine is made from high-quality sorghum ecological brewing, and the aroma is coordinated, fermented in the cellar, and aged in the wine. The taste is more fragrant.
The white wine from the plateau of Inner Mongolia has a more classic taste, and the rich and fragrant taste flows over the guests' lips, making them happy to drink.
Reasons for recommendation: Selected high-quality sorghum, processed through unique techniques, allows you to enjoy a feast and a small glass of wine with your friends and family.
The high-speed train is actually home
Address: No. 555, North 1st Ring Road, High-speed Railway Check the map
The home appliances here are quite complete, with many brands and well-known brands.
On the twelfth day of the twelfth lunar month, he went to the "Houston" water purifier store to see the water purifier, and the store was doing an activity, and the price was relatively preferential.
Actually, the house has a total of 11 floors, from the basement to the 9th floor, and the 1st and 2nd floors are all parking lots, and parking is free during the day!
The surroundings are not good, and there are few shops in the hotel. The food in the hotel is average.
This elevator is also very useless, just like a person with a serious illness, going up and down two floors, back and forth, never stopping at my floor, from the emergency passage to the first floor, it is also very useless, directly leading to a furniture store, the furniture store is closed, and I can't get out of the emergency passage!
The house is still not up to standard, and there are many places that have not been developed.
Address: No. 555, North 1 Road, High-speed Railway North Road, convenient transportation, large parking lot, free during the day.
Environment: The store is spacious, with 8-9 floors, and you can buy furniture, household appliances, and various small things... There are many well-known brands in the store, such as MUJI, H&M, IKEA, Zara, Adidas, Nike, Puma, Levi's, Uniqlo, GAP, Victoria's Secret, Calvin Klein, Armani, Prada, Gucci, and many more. It is a good place to buy products. If you get tired, you can sit on the sofa and take a rest.
Recently, I wanted to buy a set of comfortable sofas, and my friend said that there are many sofas to choose from here. I looked at Gujia Home and Mikem, and I felt that it was okay, but the price was a little expensive, so I was still hesitating.
For the latest merchant information, such as the address, phone number, business hours, etc., of the Urumqi home selling channel of Taobao Dianping, you can find a decoration company by searching on Taobao Dianping.
Already sent to my guests, #PRS_ORG# can't be completed.
It's over, it's over
If it can be delivered within 20 minutes, it will not be cancelled.
The Yangtze River mainstream achieves full coverage of green comprehensive service areas - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency Wuhan, Dec. 11 (Reporter Wang Xian) - The Chongqing Fuling Water Green Comprehensive Service Zone was put into operation on Dec. 10, according to Xinhua News Agency. This is the second water green comprehensive service zone in the upper reaches of the Yangtze River after the Fuzhou Water Green Comprehensive Service Zone in Sichuan Province was put into operation on Dec. 8.
At this point, the water-based green comprehensive service area has covered the upper, middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River.
The deputy director of the Yangtze River Navigation Management Bureau of the Ministry of Transport, Qiu Jianhua, introduced that previously, 10 green integrated service areas had been built in the middle and lower reaches of the Yangtze River in provinces such as Hubei, Hunan, Jiangxi, Anhui and Jiangsu, which were well received by the majority of ship crews and played an important role in promoting the high-quality development of Yangtze River shipping.
The comprehensive service area covering the entire water area of the Yangtze River is another milestone event in the construction of the Yangtze River green shipping, which significantly improves the pollution receiving and navigation service capacity of the Yangtze River ships.
According to reports, the water-based green comprehensive service area is an important facility for providing comprehensive production and living services to the vast number of ships and seafarers, and helping seafarers solve the "urgent, difficult and anxious" problems.
This time, two water-based green integrated service areas were built and put into operation on the upper reaches of the Yangtze River, which integrated life services, production services and public services into one, with green and environmental protection as the theme, and ship repair and ship emergency rescue services as its specialty, so as to achieve "one-stop docking and multiple services" for ships sailing on the Yangtze River, which will make the work of sailors on the Yangtze River more efficient and their lives more convenient.
The US has gathered three aircraft carriers in the waters around China, and the most powerful weapons in the US Navy have rarely visited the island of Taiwan. According to a report by Chinese media, the latest satellite images show that three US aircraft carriers are gathering in the waters around China. The US media also revealed that the most powerful weapon in the US Navy's arsenal, which is rarely seen visiting the island of Taiwan, has visited the island. This move is seen as releasing an important signal to the allies and enemies of the United States in the Indo-Pacific region.
According to the South China Sea Strategic Situation Awareness Platform of a Chinese think tank, on January 9, a US Navy aircraft carrier, the USS Carl Vinson, was found near the Bab al-Mandeb Strait.
The Bab-el-Mandeb Strait connects the South China Sea and the Gulf of Aden, and is a strategic location on the first island chain of the Western Pacific.
The platform is expected to deploy the "Carl Vinson" in the South China Sea.
This is the first deployment of the USS Carl Vinson aircraft carrier with F-35C fighter jets and CMV-22 "Osprey" carrier-based transport aircraft.
The US Navy's aircraft carrier, which is currently sailing in the Pacific Ocean, is in addition to the USS Carl Vinson, which departed from the United States on January 3, the USS Abraham Lincoln (USS Abraham Lincoln), which departed from the United States on January 3.
The USS Lincoln also carried the first F-35C carrier squadron, which belongs to the 314th Fighter Attack Squadron of the United States Marine Corps.
In addition to the two aircraft carriers mentioned above, the US Navy currently deployed the “Ronald Reagan” (USS Ronald Reagan) aircraft carrier, which is docked in Yokosuka, Japan.
The carrier battle group also includes the guided missile cruiser "Shangri-La" and the guided missile destroyer "Stockdale".
On January 17, the "South China Sea Strategic Situation Awareness Platform" released the latest satellite images, showing that the three US aircraft carriers were gathering in the vicinity of China.
(weibo @ South China Sea Strategic Situation Awareness) On January 17, 2022, a US Navy transport aircraft CMV-22B took off.
(Weibo @Nanhai Strategic Situation Perception) According to a report by CNN on January 17, the most powerful weapon in the US Navy's weapons depot visited Guam for the first time over the weekend.
The Ohio-class nuclear submarine USS Nevada, carrying 20 Trident missiles and dozens of nuclear warheads, docked at the Naval Base Guam on Saturday (Jan. 15).
The US Navy's three aircraft carriers have gathered in the waters around China, and the most powerful weapons have rarely visited the island of Guam. Analysts said that this was a signal to allies and enemies in the increasingly tense situation in the Indo-Pacific region.
This is the first visit to Guam by a U.S. ballistic missile submarine since 2016 and the second public visit to Guam since the 1980s.
The US three aircraft carriers have gathered in the waters around China, and the most powerful weapons have rarely visited the island. In recent years, China has built a large number of military facilities in the South China Sea.
The picture shows Yongshui Island in the South China Sea.
(The South China Sea Research Forum) The U.S. Navy said in a statement that the Ohio-class nuclear submarine "Nevada" visited Guam this time, which strengthened cooperation between the United States and its allies in the region, demonstrated the United States' capabilities, flexibility, readiness, and commitment to the security and stability of the Indo-Pacific region.
Ballistic missile submarines are usually called "boomer submarines".
The whereabouts of the 14 U.S. Navy "Sea Dragon" submarines are usually strictly confidential.
The secret around the submarine of ballistic missiles has made the "Thunder Submarine" become the most important survival weapon in the nuclear three-body system, and this system also includes the launch tube of ballistic missiles located in the United States, as well as the B-2 and B-52 bombers that can carry nuclear bombs.
Talking to friends about Meta's recent 26% drop and market cap evaporation of $251 billion, Zuckerberg responded, "Facing unprecedented competition." What's the reason?
Meta (formerly Facebook) is essentially an advertising company, with most of its revenue coming from advertising. Today's profitable advertising companies have their own traffic channels.
Facebook, Instagram, WhatsApp and other functions are all Meta's traffic channels.
Not only that, Meta is the largest “advertising alliance”, and many apps use Meta’s advertising platform to achieve monetization.
But times have changed.
First, because of the adjustment of Apple's privacy policy, Meta is difficult to obtain user data information, which affects the efficiency of advertising placement.
Apple's current privacy policy is very friendly to users, and it will clearly prompt users whether to allow the app to access their information. Most people's normal reaction is definitely not to allow it.
If Google were to strike again, the impact on Meta's revenue would be even greater.
Second, the China factor in Meta's revenue growth has weakened (the proportion of this factor is uncertain, but it does exist).
Everyone knows that Meta has no business in China, but this understanding is not accurate.
At least 10% of Meta's revenue comes from China every year, mainly from companies that do business in China.
Meta has a few hundred employees in its Hong Kong office, and several large agents on the mainland.
Chinese companies want to expand their overseas markets, and Meta is an advertising channel that cannot be bypassed. Most of the money they burn is given to Meta.
It is interesting that now ByteDance's TT is one of Meta's main competitors, but in the past two years, Meta has made a lot of money from ByteDance.
Domestic agents are all helping Byte to advertise on Meta, and the performance of Meta's Greater China region is also very good.
I haven't specifically looked into it, but I'm sure it won't be better than before.
The stage of Chinese companies in overseas large-scale burning of money has passed.
Third, the expansion of new traffic channels is not smooth.
Facebook is getting older, and new platforms such as TT are not in Meta's hands.
The biggest problem is not just income decline, but lack of growth expectations.
Capital markets are not just looking at income, they are also looking at expectations for the future.
It is obvious that Meta's expectations are not enough.
To tell a new story to the market, Zuckerberg spoke of the "metaverse."
The metaverse is indeed one of the directions of the future, but the implementation cycle of the metaverse is relatively long, and this story should not be able to support Meta's market value in the next two to three years.
So the next two years should be a difficult time for Meta.
Don't look at the current Facebook, which is very beautiful, and it has an annual income of 100 billion to 200 billion US dollars. In fact, Facebook now has a very strong sense of crisis, and there is no good and safe moat compared with other Internet companies and high-tech companies.
Although his several social software now have relatively high daily active users, they are also mainstream social software, such as Facebook, WhatsApp, etc., but in front of the rapid development of tiktok, Facebook does not have much confidence, and the only way to compete is to rely on their own strengths.
And the concept of the metaverse, which is far-fetched and unattainable, has no hope of success in the short term, so Facebook is very dangerous, which is why Zuckerberg is constantly changing his company's name and is constantly looking for new tracks. But I think his track selection is wrong, it is a dead end. These are my thoughts, for reference.
Article 17. The State shall implement a registration and licensing management system for registered fire engineers.
The personnel who have obtained the first and second level registered fire engineer qualification certificate can be registered as a fire engineer in the corresponding level by the registration agency.
Article 18 The Public Security Bureau Fire Department is a registration approval department for first-level registered fire engineers.
The provincial, autonomous region, and municipal public security fire departments are the registration and approval departments for the second-level registered fire engineer qualification, and they are responsible for the preliminary review of the first-level registered fire engineer qualification.
Article 19 Personnel who have obtained the qualification certificate for first-class and second-class registered fire engineers and apply for registration shall be employed by a fire technology service institution or a fire safety key unit that has been approved by the competent authority, and shall submit their registration application materials to the public security fire department in the place where the employing unit is located (if the employing unit is a private enterprise, the registration application materials shall be submitted to the public security fire department in the location where the enterprise is registered).
Article 20. The public security firefighting agencies of provinces, autonomous regions and municipalities directly under the central government shall, upon receiving the registration application materials of the applicant, inform the applicant in writing of all the contents that need to be rectified within 5 working days, and shall not inform the applicant in writing within the specified period. If the public security firefighting agency fails to inform the applicant in writing within the specified period, the application shall be deemed to have been received from the date of receipt of the application materials by the public security firefighting agency.
For registration applications accepted or rejected, a written certificate with the official seal of the local public security fire department and the date should be issued.
From the date of receipt of the application for registration of the first-level registration of fire engineers, the fire departments of provinces, autonomous regions, and directly-administered cities shall complete the preliminary review of the application materials for the first-level registration of fire engineers and the registration approval of the second-level registration of fire engineers within 20 working days, and submit the application materials for the first-level registration of fire engineers and the preliminary review opinions to the Public Security Fire Department for approval.
The Public Security Bureau should make a decision on whether to approve or not within 20 working days from the date of receipt of the application materials and the preliminary review opinions submitted by the provincial public security bureau.
If a decision cannot be made within the stipulated time, the applicant should be notified of the extension of the time limit and the reasons for the extension.
When a decision is made not to approve the application, a written explanation of the reasons should be provided and the applicant should be informed that he or she has the right to appeal to the Administrative Appeal Board or to file an administrative lawsuit according to the law.
Article 22. The registration approval department shall issue and deliver the corresponding level registration certificate within 10 working days from the date of making the approval decision.
Article 23 The registration certificate shall be valid for 3 years.
The registration certificate is a professional certificate of the registered fire protection engineer, which is kept and used by the registered fire protection engineer himself.
Article 24. Applicants for initial registration shall submit their applications within one year from the date of obtaining the first-level and second-level registered fire engineer qualification certificate.
Applicants who apply for initial registration after the deadline must meet the continuing education requirements stipulated in this provision.
The specific methods of registration management, including initial registration, continuation registration, change of registration, cancellation of registration and non-registration, shall be specified by the Ministry of Public Security.
Section 25. Continuing education is a mandatory condition for renewal of registration, re-registration and late initial registration of registered fire engineers.
Each level of registered fire engineer should complete the corresponding continuing education according to the regulations within the period of registration.
Article 26 The registration approval department shall promptly publish the registration of fire protection engineers to the public, establish a register of fire protection engineers, and implement credit management for their professional activities.
Article 27. The registration management departments of various levels shall strictly implement the relevant provisions of the “Administrative License Law of the People’s Republic of China”.
The exam information shared today will end here. I hope it can help you.
Everyone must work hard to prepare for the fire engineer exam and strive to pass as soon as possible!
Real-time sharing of financial/accounting/construction latest exam information.
I cancelled... I waited for a long time
You keep pushing it back.
But the whole box of chicken is raw meat, so I can't eat it. Can I get a refund?
No pineapple, no eggs, no steamed buns, #PRS_ORG# has withdrawn #NUMBER# yuan.
But is the chicken soup refundable?
Because I can't eat it.
Can I cancel if I want to?
The joint exercise “Peace Rescue-2021” between the Chinese and Vietnamese armies has ended successfully - Xinhua News Agency
Xinhua News Agency, Hanoi, December 12 (Zhou Na, Teng Huijian) On the morning of December 12, all the participating teams of the Chinese People's Liberation Army (PLA) in the "Peace Rescue-2021" joint exercise with the Vietnam People's Army successfully returned to China's Guangxi, marking the successful completion of the 7-day training mission.
This joint operation focused on the humanitarian medical rescue, which was closely linked with the mission of rescue and relief of casualties, and completed the content of joint command, joint on-site rescue and batch treatment of wounded personnel according to the standard of practical application. It effectively improved the capability of the two armies in providing medical support.
The exercise results were praised by the Chinese and Vietnamese armies.
The director of the Vietnam People's Army Logistics Department and the deputy commander-in-chief of the Vietnam People's Army, Nguyen Xuan Son, said at the closing ceremony of the exercise that through this exercise, the Vietnamese military doctors learned the knowledge of exercise organization and professional activities from the Chinese military doctors, and also saw the medical and supporting equipment of China.
The results of the exercise proved the professional capabilities of the military medical forces of the two countries in the fields of medical assistance and epidemic prevention and control.
The head of the guidance and coordination group of the Chinese side and the deputy director of the Health Bureau of the Logistics Support Department of the Central Military Commission, Chen Chunming, said that this exercise is another breakthrough and innovation practice based on the successful holding of the joint medical service activity in 2018, with very important milestone significance.
During the exercise, the Chinese People's Liberation Army donated medical protective masks, medical protective clothing and rapid nucleic acid detection instruments to the Vietnamese People's Army for health and epidemic prevention supplies.
